


what does a misanthrope believe and how do they get this way?

what do most misanthropes believe?


------



https://www.quora.com/Who-are-some-famous-misanthropes-either-real-or-fictional
Who are some famous misanthropes, either real or fictional?
	11 Answers
	Abhinav Maurya
	Abhinav Maurya, PhD Student (Machine Learning, Public Policy) at CMU
	Updated Jul 24, 2012 · Author has 540 answers and 1.4m answer views

    Ludwig Wittgenstein: regarded to be one of the most important philosophers of the twentieth century
    Friedrich Nietzsche: another well-known philosopher
    Martin Heidegger: philosopher
    Søren Kierkegaard: philosopher
    Jean-Paul Sartre: writer and philosopher; known to have said "Hell is other people."
    Franz Kafka (author): highly regarded German writer
    Oscar Wilde (author): well-known English writer; known to have said "Other people are quite dreadful. The only possible society is oneself."
    Patricia Highsmith: American novelist and short-story writer whose works have been adapted into movies like Strangers On A Train (1951), The Talented Mr. Ripley (1955), Ripley's Game (1974) and Edith's Diary (1977).



Nietzsche and Heidegger gets cited by them a lot


Kierkegaard and Sartre? might have seen in that context


they like Wilde


	...The first person who comes to mind is Jonathan Swift, whose classic Gulliver's Travels is one of the finest, most brilliant satires on the human condition. In fact, as it progresses through Gulliver's adventures in Lilliput to his travails in the land of the Houynhnhms, his misanthropy is confirmed as it culminates in absolute disgust with the debased humans called the Yahoos. In a letter to another famous misanthrope, Alexander Pope, he is believed to have said,'I hate and detest that animal called man'


Johnathan Swift

Alexander Pope didnd't sound like that from his wiki page anyway


someone says Nikola Tesla (they like him)


	...George Carlin, one of the greatest stand up comedians who was never afraid to say things like they are. Even if he was wrong SOMETIMES, he was spot on a hell of a lot more. It's too bad he died way before his time, while many of the planet's worst scumbags are still alive today (and in hiding).


reddit likes Carlin for some reason


	...Sir Isaac Newton, it seems. The following article claims Newton was a "misanthrope" and a "loner": It wasn't just gravity that got Newton down...: A LITTLE HISTORY OF SCIENCE BY WILLIAM F. BYNUM 


Issac Newton?


	...Mark Twain, writer. Kurt Vonnegut, writer. Pat Robertson, preacher. Christopher Hitchens, writer. Jerry Falwell, preacher. (Most of the preachers do not refer to themselves as misanthropes, but many of us regard them as so


Mark Twain is interesting, might be one of their agents (for reasons)


Pat Robertson and Jerry Falwell suspicious

Christopher Hitchens


	...Tao Yuanming, the Jin poet. He wrote many idyllic poems in solitude. One of his famous quotes is ‘I would not bow for five dous of rice’ (dou is a unit of weight in ancient China).



	...Arthur Schopenhauer and Emil Cioran were known for their misanthropic outlooks.



what useful info in studying this?


the misanthropes that are exalted in media would probably make good recruiting tools

like say "see everyone rescpects this guy and he hates humanity"


there's a difference between hating humaiting and thinking it would be better with them gone than actually carrying that out...

some of these are worse and creepier like Heidegger



------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Misanthropy
	Martin Heidegger has also been said[13] to show misanthropy in his concern of the "they"—the tendency of people to conform to one view, which no one has really thought through, but is just followed because, "they say so". 


https://www.worldcat.org/title/reading-heideggers-black-notebooks-1931-1941/oclc/926820993
	Reading Heidegger's Black Notebooks 1931-1941

	"For more than forty years, the philosopher Martin Heidegger logged ideas and opinions in a series of notebooks, known as the "Black Notebooks" after the black oilcloth booklets into which he first transcribed his thoughts. In 2014, the notebooks from 1931-1941 were published, sparking immediate controversy. It has long been acknowledged that Heidegger was an enthusiastic supporter of the Nazi Party in the early 1930s. But the notebooks contain a number of anti-Semitic passages--often referring to the stereotype of "World Jewry"--written even after Heidegger became disenchanted with the Nazis themselves. Reactions from the scholarly community have ranged from dismissal of the significance of these passages to claims that the anti-Semitism in them contaminates all of Heidegger's work. This volume offers the first collection of responses by Heidegger scholars to the publication of the notebooks. In essays commissioned especially for the book, the contributors offer a wide range of views, addressing not only the issues of anti-Semitism and Nazism but also the broader questions that the Black Notebooks raise"--Jacket.  Read less 


------


Highsmith had rough childhood, was depressed and bit of an oddball

she liked snails and brought them with her in her purse to a party


comes off as one of the good guys. Until...



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Patricia_Highsmith
	When she was living in Switzerland in the 1980s, she used nearly 40 aliases when writing to various government bodies and newspapers deploring the state of Israel and the "influence" of the Jews.[65] Nevertheless, many of the women she became romantically involved with as well as friends she valued were Jewish,[60] such as Arthur Koestler, whom she met in October 1950[66] and with whom she had an unsuccessful affair designed to hide her homosexuality, believing that Marc Brandel's disclosure that she was homosexual would hurt her professionally.[67]



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Arthur_Koestler
	Arthur Koestler, CBE (/ˈkɛstlər, ˈkɛslər/; German: [ˈkœstlɐ]; Hungarian: Kösztler Artúr; 5 September 1905 – 1 March 1983) was a Hungarian-British author and journalist. Koestler was born in Budapest and, apart from his early school years, was educated in Austria. In 1931 Koestler joined the Communist Party of Germany until, disillusioned by Stalinism, he resigned in 1938.

	...In 1968 he was awarded the Sonning Prize "for [his] outstanding contribution to European culture" and in 1972 he was made a Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE).


Koestler involved in other weird things that might be worth looking into


then there's this:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Patricia_Highsmith
	In 1955, Highsmith wrote The Talented Mr. Ripley, a novel about Tom Ripley, a charming criminal who murders a rich man and steals his identity. Highsmith wrote four sequels: Ripley Under Ground (1970), Ripley's Game (1974), The Boy Who Followed Ripley (1980) and Ripley Under Water (1991), about Ripley's exploits as a con artist and serial killer who always gets away with his crimes. The series—collectively dubbed "The Ripliad"—are some of Highsmith's most popular works and have sold millions of copies worldwide.

	The "suave, agreeable and utterly amoral" Ripley is Highsmith's most famous character, and has been critically acclaimed for being "both a likable character and a cold-blooded killer."[84] He has typically been regarded as "cultivated," a "dapper sociopath," and an "agreeable and urbane psychopath."[85]

	Sam Jordison of The Guardian wrote, "It is near impossible, I would say, not to root for Tom Ripley. Not to like him. Not, on some level, to want him to win. Patricia Highsmith does a fine job of ensuring he wheedles his way into our sympathies."[86] Film critic Roger Ebert made a similar appraisal of the character in his review of Purple Noon, Rene Clement's 1960 film adaptation of The Talented Mr. Ripley: "Ripley is a criminal of intelligence and cunning who gets away with murder. He's charming and literate, and a monster. It's insidious, the way Highsmith seduces us into identifying with him and sharing his selfishness; Ripley believes that getting his own way is worth whatever price anyone else might have to pay. We all have a little of that in us."[87] Novelist Sarah Waters esteemed The Talented Mr. Ripley as the "one book I wish I'd written."[88]

	The first three books of the "Ripley" series have been adapted into films five times. In 2015, The Hollywood Reporter announced that a group of production companies were planning a television series based on the novels.[89] The series is currently in development.[90]



get people to think wealthy con-artists are cool?



------


https://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2007/05/21/atheists-with-attitude
	The felling of the World Trade Center in New York, on September 11, 2001, brought its share of religion. Two populist preachers, Pat Robertson and Jerry Falwell, called it divine punishment (though both quickly withdrew their remarks)


this is pretty weird


	It’s possible to wonder, indeed, where plain speaking ends and misanthropy begins: Hitchens says that the earth sometimes seems to him to be “a prison colony and lunatic asylum that is employed as a dumping ground by far-off and superior civilizations.” He certainly likes to adopt the tone of a bemused Martian envoy hammering out a report for headquarters. (We hear of “a showbiz woman bizarrely known as Madonna.”) In a curious rhetorical tic, Hitchens regularly refers to people whom he wishes to ridicule by their zoological class. Thus the followers of Muhammad are “mammals,” as is the prophet himself, and so are the seventeenth-century false messiah Sabbatai Zevi and St. Francis of Assisi; Japan’s wartime Emperor Hirohito is a “ridiculously overrated mammal,” and Kim Il Sung, the father of North Korea’s current dictator, is a “ludicrous mammal.” Hitchens is trying to say that these people are mere fallible mortals; but his way of saying it makes him come across as rather an odd fish.


anthony gottleib says Hitchens sounds like a martian

whoever Gottleib is, I guess he though Hitchens went too far too...


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/09/11/books/review/dream-of-enlightenment-anthony-gottlieb.html

Gottleib former executive director of "the economist"

	...“The Dream of Reason,” the first volume in a history of Western philosophy by Anthony Gottlieb, a former executive editor of The Economist, appeared in 2000, and took us from the ancient Greeks to the Renaissance. The new work starts with Descartes and ends on “the eve of the French Revolution.” 


they like the French revolution I think because it was based on all the enlightenment ideas they don't like then went to shit and created war and dictatorship

not sure about Gottleib except that he's into the stuff they are into

https://twitter.com/n10egottlieb?lang=en

https://twitter.com/nfergus/status/918449296596496384
	 Anthony Gottlieb Retweeted
	Niall Ferguson
	‏Verified account @nfergus
	12 Oct 2017

	Anthony Gottlieb's thoughtful review of The Square and the Tower: https://www.theguardian.com/books/2017/oct/12/the-square-and-the-tower-by-niall-ferguson-review …


https://twitter.com/GuardianBooks/status/918364279631372288
	 Anthony Gottlieb Retweeted
	Guardian Books
	‏Verified account @GuardianBooks
	11 Oct 2017

	The Square and the Tower by Niall Ferguson review – a new understanding of global history?

chummy with Niall Ferguson?


https://twitter.com/N10Egottlieb/status/828229341167366144	
	Anthony Gottlieb
	‏ @N10Egottlieb
	5 Feb 2017

	Philosophy of Wine seminar on the Principle of Sufficient Riesling


https://twitter.com/N10Egottlieb/status/695369354565685248
	Anthony Gottlieb
	‏ @N10Egottlieb

	Now that Bezos will hook one up, can Uber be far behind?


	[Your package with Cocaine was delievered]


this says it all

he's one of them


https://twitter.com/N10Egottlieb/status/665261788942979072
	Anthony Gottlieb
	‏ @N10Egottlieb
	13 Nov 2015

	"Polls don't take the pulse of democracy; they raise it." Wise and fascinating piece by Jill Lepore on polls http://goo.gl/07G4SN


https://twitter.com/NateSilver538/status/667562395364143105
	 Anthony Gottlieb Retweeted
	Nate Silver
	‏Verified account @NateSilver538
	19 Nov 2015

	About 25% of Americans identify as Republican. Donald Trump's getting about 25% of that 25% in the polls. Why is this impressive to people?



is it unusual for him to be this interested in U.S. politics? from Nov 2015


other things I guess is interested in according to his twitter: Brexit, theories that universe is simulation, jews, his own books



https://twitter.com/N10Egottlieb/status/783718415366230016
	Anthony Gottlieb
	‏ @N10Egottlieb
	5 Oct 2016

	"Dozens of..myths get their comeuppance in this..fast-moving book," says Guardian:


"Myth" as in Sally Marks "myth"?


https://www.theguardian.com/books/2016/oct/05/dream-enlightenment-anthony-gottlieb-review
	Gottlieb concludes with an affectionate portrait of David Hume, who, as he observes, has become the role-model of choice for philosophers in the 21st century. Hume was a “naturalist”, it seems, who took pleasure in presenting human beings as little more than animals with an inflated sense of their own importance. He also had an enviable talent for “disturbing the peace”, philosophically speaking. But his principal achievement was that he never took himself too seriously: he performed high-risk philosophical manoeuvres with unflagging good humour, and was always willing to concede that his hard-won theoretical convictions might turn out to be ridiculous foibles. If you are upset by abstract arguments, he said, then you should get out a bit more and engage with “common life”, and after a while you will be able to relax as you watch them all “vanish like smoke”.




------


Davide Hume misanthropic? Gottleib likes him anyway


http://www.nybooks.com/articles/2016/05/26/who-was-david-hume/
	Who Was David Hume?
	Anthony Gottlieb	

	...As James Harris drily notes in his fine new biography, Hume’s private letters show that “he was not very good at being serious about religion.” His lack of piety and the decorously veiled attacks on theism in his published writings may play some part in his current academic popularity. Most professional philosophers today are atheists—73 percent of them, according to the 2009 survey. Perhaps Hume’s cheerful wit and enjoyment of life also help to make him a model for today’s philosophers, who do not like to think of themselves as unduly serious when off-duty. 


if he's trying to to same thing as Hitchens he's right that he's better at it


	...Still, it is probably the rise of so-called “naturalism” in philosophy that best explains Hume’s newfound appeal. Naturalism has several components, all of which were prominent in his work. Hume stressed the similarities between people and other animals: a century before Darwin’s Descent of Man, he argued that there is no great difference between the minds of humans and the minds of some creatures in zoos. (Hume also anticipated Darwin in implying that certain mental traits function to aid reproduction.) He treated religion as a natural phenomenon, to be explained in psychological and historical terms—which tended to annoy the pious—and he argued that the study of the mind and of morals should be pursued by the same empirical methods that were starting to cast new light on the rest of nature. Philosophy, for Hume, was thus not fundamentally different from science. This outlook is much more common in our time than it was in his.

	Philosophers now regard Hume’s account of reason not as a mischievous plot to undermine it but as an attempt to explain how it works. As Harris puts the matter, he was developing “an entirely new theory of rationality.” Hume treats humans as clever animals whose beliefs about most things are based on “custom,” in the form of a propensity to expect the future to resemble the past—a propensity, he argued, that is essential for the conduct of life, but cannot be provided with any sort of independent justification. This thesis has come to be known as “the problem of induction,” though Hume himself did not regard it as presenting much of a problem. He played up the importance of what he called “experimental” or “probable” reasoning in human knowledge, and played down the significance of mathematical and quasi-mathematical deductions. This was a considerable novelty after some two thousand years in which philosophers, still enthralled by Greek geometry, had mostly done the opposite. Hume’s emphasis on the sort of empirical and fallible beliefs that humans share with some lesser creatures was all too easily interpreted as a denigration of the powers of the human mind.


Hume was early thinker to say Humans are like animals

Gottleib points to him being kindof rebel or persecuted for that


	...Hume’s life may therefore seem to have been a drama in two very different acts. In the first, he tried unsuccessfully to make his mark in philosophy. In the second, he produced lighter works in order to make money and become famous. Hume the philosopher thus became Hume the popular historian and essayist.


can see why Gottleib likes him


	...This was an exaggeration. Not only had the Treatise been fairly widely and promptly reviewed, but the zealots murmured against it loudly enough for him to issue an anonymous pamphlet defending it against various charges. These charges were, among other things, that the Treatise advocated “Universal Scepticism,” and that it sapped “the Foundations of Morality, by denying the natural and essential Difference betwixt Right and Wrong,” all of which sounded rather impious.


in Gottleibs account, Hume was persecuted for his bold questioning of morality


	...The Treatise had itself been published anonymously, which was not unusual for controversial works by new authors. It was no real secret who had written it, though. Anonymity in such cases was as much a conventional expression of modesty as an attempt to escape the consequences of censure. But the first time Hume acknowledged in print that he was in fact the author of the Treatise was when he emphatically disowned it as juvenilia. Almost as soon as he had published it, Hume rued the fact that he had rushed into print too early. He omitted the Treatise from editions of his collected writings and begged the public to judge him only by his other works.


actually is kindof sad

I think they would like this story though for recruiting, true or otherwise

the story of a bold genius questioning religion and morality and getting persecuted by the raving masses who don't understand his genius

so can use for:

- appeal to arrogance

- religious people equated with moral people and used as prop to turn recruits off both

- I guess argue that moral people (most people) are stupid? or just in general make it easier to hate them. Introduce a misantrhopic disposition and worldview.


reminds me of the story of hypahtia and the Christians that Zeilinski liked (https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/hypatia-ancient-alexandrias-great-female-scholar-10942888/)


	...Far from being a watered-down presentation of his fundamental ideas, the new essays were in several respects bolder than the Treatise. For one thing, they made the antireligious implications of his thought more explicit, though they did so with tact. Hume included in the essays a discussion of miracles that he had omitted from the Treatise. This discussion drew on his analysis of probabilistic reasoning to argue that reports of religious miracles should always be disbelieved. He also argued that the ever-popular “design argument,” which infers the existence of God from apparent signs of intelligent design in nature, jumped to an unwarranted conclusion.

	As always, Hume presented his impious ideas as if they were directed only against “false religion,” not the vague “true religion” to which, for the sake of decorum, he feigned adherence. The enemy, he pretended, was superstition and “enthusiasm”—that is, zealotry—not religious faith itself. 


is that true he was pretending?

article comes off as co-opting a bit, doubtful hume an agent of theirs


according to wiki at least Hume questioned, theres a debate on his religious views but don't say he was "feigning adherence" https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Hume#Religious_views


	...Another British visitor to d’Holbach’s salon, Hume’s young admirer Edward Gibbon, reported that they “laughed at the scepticism of Hume,” though this seems to have been a good-tempered affair. By “scepticism” Gibbon meant what would now be called “agnosticism.” The principles of Hume’s philosophy implied that the question of God’s existence cannot be settled definitively either way, so he was in one sense an agnostic. However, since he does not seem to have entertained any belief in God, it is probably also fair to call him an atheist—just not a campaigning one.


	...The manuscript was indeed so artfully written that people who are unfamiliar with eighteenth-century conventions of “theological lying,” as it has been called, still sometimes think that Hume ended up endorsing the idea that design in nature points to the existence of a God.*


a little off

could be that Gottleib really likes Hume and also really dislikes religion so is conflicted

"theological lying" thing suspicious

its like this:

some of the dumbest, most contemptable people in history and modern times have been supersticious, hypocritical christians

this by most accounts appears to be an important recruiting tool, kindof like christianity (or some version of it) is to their ideology as HUAC is to communists

so if it turns out that some philospher that they respect also had christian or religious beliefs (unremarkable given how popular it was), that's damaging to their narrative that religion (equated with moralty) = dumb and athiesm and amorality = smart.


Gottleib called out Patt Robensen and Fallwell for the 9/11 thing while calling out Hitchens for sounding like a martian. If he understands Robenson and Fallwel as spies that colors what he says here.



https://www.theguardian.com/books/2016/oct/05/dream-enlightenment-anthony-gottlieb-review
	...After a while, the jovial put-downs start to sound mean-spirited. It is fine to be diffident about one’s own powers, but there is something sneaky about being diffident on behalf of others, and Gottlieb risks undermining his defence of the great philosophers by depicting them as incorrigible fantasists, lost in their dreams of reason and enlightenment.


Gottleib emphasizes that in his write-up of Hume too, like that humans are like animals and human reasoning not different from passion


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christopher_Hitchens
	Christopher Eric Hitchens (13 April 1949 – 15 December 2011) was an Anglo-American[9] author, columnist, essayist, orator, religious and literary critic, social critic, and journalist. Hitchens was the author, co-author, editor or co-editor of over 30 books, including five collections of essays on culture, politics and literature. A staple of public discourse, his confrontational style of debate made him both a lauded intellectual and a controversial public figure. He contributed to New Statesman, The Nation, The Weekly Standard, The Atlantic, London Review of Books, The Times Literary Supplement, Slate, Free Inquiry and Vanity Fair.

	Having long described himself as a social democrat, a Marxist and an anti-totalitarian, he began to break with the established political left after what he called the "tepid reaction" of the Western left to the Satanic Verses controversy, followed by the left's embrace of Bill Clinton and the antiwar movement's opposition to NATO intervention in Bosnia and Herzegovina in the 1990s. His support of the Iraq War separated him further. His writings include critiques of public figures such as Bill Clinton, Henry Kissinger, Mother Teresa and Diana, Princess of Wales. He was the elder brother of the conservative journalist and author Peter Hitchens.


kinda all over the place

marxist then pro-iraq war

but against NATO in Bosnia 

attacks kissinger


brother Peter Hitches was in "international socialists" and a moscow correspondant


	...In the 1960s, Hitchens joined the political left, drawn by disagreement over the Vietnam War, nuclear weapons, racism, and oligarchy, including that of "the unaccountable corporation." He expressed affinity with the politically charged countercultural and protest movements of the 1960s and 1970s. He avoided the recreational drug use of the time, saying "in my cohort we were slightly anti-hedonistic...it made it very much easier for police provocation to occur, because the planting of drugs was something that happened to almost everyone one knew."[21] Hitchens was inspired to become a journalist after reading a piece by James Cameron.[18]

	Hitchens joined the Labour Party in 1965, but along with the majority of the Labour students' organisation was expelled in 1967, because of what Hitchens called "Prime Minister Harold Wilson's contemptible support for the war in Vietnam".[22] Under the influence of Peter Sedgwick, who translated the writings of Russian revolutionary and Soviet dissident Victor Serge, Hitchens forged an ideological interest in Trotskyism and anti-Stalinist socialism.[16] Shortly after he joined "a small but growing post-Trotskyist Luxemburgist sect".[23]


became trotskyist in 60's

leaning toward him not being witting in any vast conspiracy, but maybe there could be people influencing him

I think he had a fall from grace later


	Journalistic career in the UK (1971–1981)

	Hitchens began working as a correspondent for the magazine International Socialism,[24] published by the International Socialists, the forerunners of today's British Socialist Workers Party. This group was broadly Trotskyist, but differed from more orthodox Trotskyist groups in its refusal to defend communist states as "workers' states". Their slogan was "Neither Washington nor Moscow but International Socialism".


	...Around that time, the Friday lunches began, which were attended by writers including Clive James, Ian McEwan, Kingsley Amis, Terence Kilmartin, Robert Conquest, Al Alvarez, Peter Porter, Russell Davies and Mark Boxer. At the New Statesman Hitchens acquired a reputation as a left-winger, reporting internationally from areas of conflict such as Northern Ireland, Libya, and Iraq.[25]


suspicious associations


	In November 1973, Hitchens's mother committed suicide in Athens in a pact with her lover, a defrocked clergyman named Timothy Bryan.[16] The pair overdosed on sleeping pills in adjoining hotel rooms, and Bryan slashed his wrists in the bathtub. Hitchens flew alone to Athens to recover his mother's body, initially under the impression that his mother had been murdered.


thought his mother was murdered


goes on about his work as a journalist


	...Hitchens met Carol Blue in Los Angeles in 1989 and they married in 1991. Hitchens called it love at first sight.[43] In 1999, as harsh critics of Clinton, Hitchens and Carol Blue submitted an affidavit to the trial managers of the Republican Party in the impeachment of Bill Clinton. Therein they swore that their then-friend, Sidney Blumenthal, had described Monica Lewinsky as a stalker.


involved in some active measures?


	...Hitchens did not leave his position writing for The Nation until after the September 11 attacks, stating that he felt the magazine had arrived at a position "that John Ashcroft is a greater menace than Osama bin Laden."[53] The September 11 attacks "exhilarated" him, bringing into focus "a battle between everything I love and everything I hate" and strengthening his embrace of an interventionist foreign policy that challenged "fascism with an Islamic face."


that's weird


	...Hitchens was an antitheist, and said that a person "could be an atheist and wish that belief in God were correct," but that "an antitheist, a term I'm trying to get into circulation, is someone who is relieved that there's no evidence for such an assertion."[83] He often spoke against the Abrahamic religions. In a 2010 interview at New York Public Library, Hitchens stated that he was against infant circumcision. When asked by readers of The Independent (London) what he considered to be the "axis of evil", Hitchens replied "Christianity, Judaism, Islam—the three leading monotheisms."[84]


that's a little much...

does he do this on purpose or is that just his personality?

sounds like a liar, it's weird for a left-wing marxist to support the Iraq war


religious people can be used as a prop to make people misanthropic

like sometimes believe in mystical things and look really stupid. At the same time they moralize and this tends to anger sociopaths.

christopher hitchens comes off as taking this too far though, like he would damage this narrative and cause people to rethink it.




https://books.google.com/books?id=8kgjU4wbM5oC&pg=PA81&lpg=PA81&dq=Hitchens+%22a+prison+colony+and+lunatic+asylum+that+is+employed+as+a+dumping+ground+by+far-off+and+superior+civilizations%22&source=bl&ots=nP9yvTwyyp&sig=LyHyxzhQ5jhRvBF3ec_xZlYAOeo&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiF06q01PvZAhVC1IMKHYXCD9AQ6AEIMTAB#v=onepage&q=Hitchens%20%22a%20prison%20colony%20and%20lunatic%20asylum%20that%20is%20employed%20as%20a%20dumping%20ground%20by%20far-off%20and%20superior%20civilizations%22&f=false
	...When the bones of prehistoric animals began to be discovered and scrutinized in the ninetheenth century, there were those who said that the fossils had been placed in the rock by god, in order to test our faith. This cannot be disproved. Nor can my own pet theory that, from the patterns of behavior that are observable, we may infer a design that makes planet earth, all unknown to us, a prison colony and lunatic asylum that is employed as a dumping ground by far-off and superior civilizations. However, I was educated by Sir Karl Popper to believe that a theory that is unfalsifiable to that extent is a weak one.


in context comes off more like a joke

seems proud he was student of Popper

Popper's theoery that "an unfalisifiable theory is weak" has been proven false--in math there will be theorems that are true but cannot be proven

Popper seems like he was a good guy

weird things going on with him though? involved with socialists for a bit

George Soros was also a student of Popper...



...



https://www.salon.com/2013/06/23/christopher_hitchens_lies_do_atheism_no_favors/
	Christopher Hitchens’ lies do atheism no favors



someone else saying Hitchens went too far



https://www.quora.com/What-was-Christopher-Hitchens-trying-to-say-with-his-last-words?share=1


converted to American capitalism on his deathbed? (??)

some quora comments are weird like they can't handle it

something fishy going on


shit

Christopher Hitchens the Pat Robenson of athiesm?

question of was this deliberate or not


https://www.salon.com/2013/06/23/christopher_hitchens_lies_do_atheism_no_favors/
	And what of Hitchens himself? Where is his conscience when he knowingly falsifies the history of religious and philosophical ideas? Is he not himself an example of how conscience is about what suits one’s purposes? Personal ethics tend to reflect cultural ethics, and cultural ethics usually follow tribal interests. For Hitchens, too, has a tribe: the “reasonable,” the clean, the well-spoken, the “right sort,” the Oxford men, the ones who know and revel in their difference from the ignorant, the slaves, the Baptist rubes, the ones who don’t go to Cambridge and don’t eat good lunches. Hitchens was of the oligarchs and shared their most intense privilege: the right not to have to take seriously their own lies and misdeeds.

	This is all debatable, of course, and a worthy debate it would be. What’s appalling is that none of this seems important to Hitchens. Our sense of “decency” is innate. Period. Have it your way, but I thought the truths you were interested in were based on evidence, and you have none.

	As Nietzsche wrote in "Beyond Good and Evil," “No one is such a liar as an indignant man.”


https://www.quora.com/What-were-Christopher-Hitchens-biggest-flaws?share=1
	In terms of personal judgment he was often too Manichean in outlook. Hitchens also let his judgment of character color everything else. He hated Clinton and Kissinger as people so his view of everything about them was purely negative. On the flip side, he felt Paul Wolfowitz was an honorable man and that led him to believe in a misbegotten cause like the Iraq War. Furthermore he was something of a romantic always looking for a great cause, a good versus evil conflict that he could take part in.


honest about hating these people? they way he hates on people/things is impressive and comes off as genuine


	...I read that he had a habit of being very rude to people, much to the embarrassment of those with him. In fact, I think I heard Martin Amis say in one interview that Hitchens actually enjoyed being rude to people.

	One time, when he was very sick with cancer, he got into a taxi in Washington DC, I think with Ian McEwan, and upon finding out that the taxi driver did not know how to get to the natural history museum, he stormed out of the cab, saying in disgust to the driver that he shouldn't be in this country if he didn't know where the natural history museum was. They then got into another taxi, this time with a Hitchens-approved driver.

	Another instance I read about was when he was in a Greek restaraunt in London having lunch with Martin Amis. They were sitting, eating at their table, when they noticed two entitled-looking upper class people at the doorway of the restaurant. Clearly they were going to ask hitchens and amis to move.

	One of them came over to their table, crouched down, and pouting up to the two, said "you're going to hate us for this". Hitchens replied, in all seriousness - "we hate you already".

	He had a sharp wit, and was rightly vicious to many of his opponents, but it's not going too far to say that being so rude to people for such trivial reasons was a character flaw of his.


a theory:

Hitchens was recruited as an agent (I think involved in active measures in Clinton thing, support for Iraq war, and brother comes off as a propagandist for them)

but he wasn't always a good one (Gottleib rebuke) and was very angry, which he wasn't always good at hiding. Maybe his anger or disdain for certain people was his motivation


this would mean its good to study him and get a sense of his disposition, since it could reflect ideas used to recruit other agents


https://www.quora.com/Why-do-I-find-Christopher-Hitchens-so-likeable?share=1
	Why do I find Christopher Hitchens so likeable?

	In all likelihood because he was saying something you were already inclined to agree with and was saying it with charm, wit, and more than a little righteous (or possibly self-righteous) anger that made your views seem important - gave you a justification for them you may not have possessed otherwise. He made your opinion feel like a crusade, a battle that needed to be fought. He made you feel a little bit superior to those people who thought differently or looked at things in a different way. He made you feel they were a little less than you.


...


http://blog.skepticallibertarian.com/2014/09/30/christopher-hitchens-freedom-of-speech-means-freedom-to-hate/
	This is a lightly edited transcript of the late Christopher Hitchens’ remarks at University of Toronto’s Hart House Debating Club in November 2006. The motion being debated was: “Freedom of speech includes the freedom to hate.”


	...It is very often forgotten that what he was doing in that case was sending to prison a group of Yiddish-speaking socialists, whose literature was printed in a language most Americans couldn’t read, opposing President Wilson’s participation in the First World War, and the dragging of the United States into this sanguinary conflict, which the Yiddish-speaking socialists had fled from Russia to escape.

	In fact it could be just as plausible argued that the Yiddish-speaking socialists, who were jailed by the excellent and over-praised judge Oliver Wendell Holmes, were the real fire fighters, were the ones who were shouting fire when there really was fire in a very crowded theatre, indeed.


aren't those the guys who were trying to sabotage U.S. industry? I think one of them was caught for firing a bazooka at someone


	...But before they do that, they must have taken, as I’m sure we all should, a short refresher course in the classic texts on this matter, which are: John Milton’s Areopagitica — “Areopagitica” being the great hill of Athens for discussion and free expression; Thomas Paine’s introduction to the Age of Reason; and I would say John Stuart Mill’s essay On Liberty.

	In which it is variously said — I’ll be very daring and summarize all three of these great gentlemen of the great tradition of, especially, English liberty, in one go. What they say is, it’s not just the right of the person who speaks to be heard, it is the right of everyone in the audience to listen and to hear. And every time you silence somebody, you make yourself a prisoner of your own action, because you deny yourself the right to hear something.

	In other words, your own right to hear and be exposed is as much involved in all these cases as is the right of the other to voice his or her view. Indeed as John Stuart Mill said, if all in society were agreed on the truth and beauty and value of one proposition, all except one person, it would be most important — in fact, it would become even more important — that that one heretic be heard, because we would still benefit from his perhaps outrageous or appalling view.


sounds honest in his support of free speech


	In more modern times this has been put, I think, best by a personal heroine of mine, Rosa Luxemburg, who said the freedom of speech is meaningless unless it means the freedom of the person who thinks differently.


Rosa Luxemberg a "personal hero" of his


	...It’s always worth establishing first principles. It’s always worth saying, what would you do if you met a Flat Earth Society member? Come to think of it, how can I prove the earth is round? Am I sure about the theory of evolution? I know it’s supposed to be true. Here’s someone who says there’s no such thing, it’s all intelligent design. How sure am I of my own views? Don’t take refuge in the false security of consensus, and the feeling that whatever you think you’re bound to be okay, because you’re in the safely moral majority.


Hitchens appreciates dissidents

	
	One of the proudest moments of my life, that’s to say, in the recent past, has been defending the British historian David Irving, who is now in prison in Austria for nothing more than the potential of uttering an unwelcome thought on Austrian soil. He didn’t actually say anything in Austria. He wasn’t even accused of saying anything. He was accused of perhaps planning to say something that violated an Austrian law that says, “Only one version of the history of the Second World War may be taught in our brave little Tyrolean Republic.”


https://www.quora.com/Did-Christopher-Hitchens-enable-holocaust-denial
	Did Christopher Hitchens enable holocaust denial?

	I'm not sure what "enable" implies here, but even if Christopher Hitchens did not enable Holocaust denial, he certainly made an incredibly shoddy argument that David Irving's brand of Holocaust denial should be counted as legitimate. His defense of Irving gave him a sheen of honesty he certainly did not deserve.

	Consider Hitchens's 1996 Vanity Fair article Hitler's Ghost.

	Hitchens's argument boils down to this, Irving is the unseen, unwelcome opposite side to modern Holocaust historians:


    [Daniel] Goldhagen [author of Hitler's Willing Executioners] is involved in an argument with an unseen opponent, and so are all the other experts on the platform, including Christopher Browning, whose book Ordinary Men anticipated Goldhagen by four years. This unseen opponent is David Irving, a British historian with depraved ideas about the whole narrative.

	Don't let that "depraved" throw you off, it is just one of the many red herrings Hitchens so loved to toss about. Hitchens really thinks that Irving is a good historian:

	    His [Irving's] studies of the Churchill-Roosevelt relationship, of the bombing of Dresden, of the campaigns of Rommel and others, are such that you can’t say you know the subject at all unless you have read them. And, incidentally, he has never and not once described the Holocaust as a “hoax.”


	This is simply hyperbole: Irving would have to be a truly exception historian to range over such a breadth of subjects, each of which have been covered in exhaustive detail in many histories. And Irving is on record as describing the Holocaust as an "invention" so either Hitchens was either indulging in rhetorical tricks (surprise!) or was ignorant of the problems with Irving's scholarship. 


this is weird

I guess Hitchens right that he should have gone to prison

but to say that Irving was legit is weird


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Irving
	David John Cawdell Irving (born 24 March 1938) is an English Holocaust denier[1] 


http://beforeitsnews.com/strange/2017/09/david-irving-not-a-holocaust-denier-2469103.html
	David Irving – Not a Holocaust Denier


http://beforeitsnews.com/alternative/2016/12/the-demonization-of-david-irving-3452921.html
	The Demonization of David Irving


might be Hitchens added fuel to fire of active measures  


https://www.quora.com/Did-Christopher-Hitchens-enable-holocaust-denial
	Hitchens himself notes:

	    I have caught David Irving out, just by my own researches, in one grossly anti-Jewish statement and one wildly paranoid hypothesis and several flagrant contradictions. But I learned a lot in the process of doing so. It’s unimportant to me that Irving is my political polar opposite. If I didn’t read my polar opposites, I’d be even stupider than I am.


the article by Hitchens:

https://www.vanityfair.com/news/1996/06/hitlers-ghost-christopher-hitchens
	Harris could have added that his own brilliant book Selling Hitler—describing the 1983 forgery of “the Hitler Diaries,” which hoodwinked a large chunk of the British establishment (including historians of the caliber of Hugh Trevor-Roper, author of The Last Days of Hitler)—was made possible in part by Irving’s finding that those nasty papers were indeed a fake. Irving rendered another service by unmasking some spurious documents connecting Churchill and Mussolini. He speaks faultless German. He has, in the most recent case, been the first historian to see some 75,000 pages of diary entries by Joseph Goebbels, held in secrecy in Moscow from 1945 to 1992. His studies of the Churchill-Roosevelt relationship, of the bombing of Dresden, of the campaigns of Rommel and others, are such that you can’t say you know the subject at all unless you have read them. And, incidentally, he has never and not once described the Holocaust as “a hoax.”

	I have caught David Irving out, just by my own researches, in one grossly anti-Jewish statement and one wildly paranoid hypothesis and several flagrant contradictions. But I learned a lot in the process of doing so.


this is technically right

can learn a lot from studying what these guys say



	...There is, of course, another answer to the question I never asked. Goldhagen is involved in an argument with an unseen opponent, and so are all the other experts on the platform, including Christopher Browning, whose book Ordinary Men anticipated Goldhagen’s by four years. This unseen opponent is David Irving, a British historian with depraved ideas about the whole narrative.

	...HITLER’S SPIN ARTIST was the headline on a typical column, by Frank Rich in The New York Times, raising the alarm about the mere idea of Irving’s being published. The Washington Post was not laggard, saying that Irving “routinely refers to the Holocaust as a hoax.” Jonathan Yardley, a cultural critic of some standing, wrote a whole article that positively sighed with satisfaction at the idea that, having neither read nor seen the book, he could now safely counsel others to do likewise. Nary a voice was raised, in American publishing or academe or journalism, to ask if David Irving had anything to contribute as a chronicler.


kindof reminds me of Milo Yiannapolis (this article from June 1996)


can only guess what's going on with this kind of thing

get people to hate freedom of speech by abusing it?


http://flavorwire.com/599121/why-men-arent-funny-or-how-spectacularly-wrong-christopher-hitchens-was-about-women-and-comedy
	This conflation of humor and sexual attraction was perhaps best — and by best I mean just the absolute worst — demonstrated in a much-derided Christopher Hitchens essay in Vanity Fair, “Why Women Aren’t Funny.” (Hitchens doesn’t get nearly enough credit as an early, model troll.)


http://blog.skepticallibertarian.com/2014/09/30/christopher-hitchens-freedom-of-speech-means-freedom-to-hate/
	...Now, I don’t know how many of you don’t feel you’re grown up enough to decide this for yourselves, and think you need to be protected from David Irving’s edition of the Goebbels diaries, for example — out of which I learned more about the Third Reich than I had from studying Hugh Trevor-Roper and A.J.P. Taylor combined when I was at Oxford.

	...Somebody said that antisemitism and Kristallnacht in Germany was the result of 10 years of Jew-baiting. Ten years?! You must be joking! It’s the result of two thousand years of Christianity, based on verse of one chapter of St. John’s Gospel, which led to a pogrom after every Easter sermon for hundreds of years, because it claims that the Jews demanded that blood of Christ be on the heads of themselves and all their children to the remotest generation [ed. note: actually Matthew 27:25, though John 18-19 belabors it].



http://nymag.com/nymag/features/868/
	The Boy Can't Help It 

	..."I've been thinking of just turning up at Sidney's and walking in when they open the door for Elijah," Hitchens says. It's hard to tell for a moment whether he's joking or he's serious, since this shambling, tousle-haired British journalist, an agent provocateur columnist for Vanity Fair and The Nation, delights in the dramatic gesture, in impishly courting controversy. Then he adds, looking wistful, "I've decided it would be too theatrical."

	It's been two months since Hitchens threw the grenade that bounced back to explode his own life. A week before the final vote of President Clinton's impeachment trial, Hitchens and his wife, Carol Blue, both left liberals, took the startling step of cooperating with House Republicans and ratting out their dear old friend Blumenthal. Both signed affidavits saying that the Clinton aide had told them over lunch that Monica Lewinsky was a stalker -- a smear that the White House had denied spreading.

	...In the grand tradition of Washington enemies lists, Hitchens, too, is keeping score. He tells me he's furious at New York Times columnist Maureen Dowd for describing him as "snitchens" and a "canary." "That little cow," he fumes. "And I've always been fond of her." He's amazed, rightly so, at the venom of a series of unrelated personal attacks on his character: Edward J. Epstein charged Hitchens, in a widely circulated e-mail, of being a Holocaust denier. (He's not.) Alexander Cockburn implied in his own column that Hitchens makes drunken passes at male friends. ("I've certainly never tried to jump his bones," Hitchens says with a mischievous laugh.) L.A. Times columnist Bob Scheer even dragged up an old scandal, attacking Hitchens on TV for leaving his pregnant first wife, Eleni Meleagrou, for Blue.

	But the worst insult of all? "The New York Times called me a 'Washington insider,' " he says in a tone of mock outrage. "Do you think I can sue them for libel?"

	As he pauses to light one in a never-ending series of cigarettes -- making the point of telling me they're unfiltered -- it's clear he's putting on a show, with the intent to amuse. 


https://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=5498172
	Christopher Hitchens, Literary Agent Provocateur

	...But he's best known for focusing his unforgiving pen on the likes of Henry Kissinger ("war criminal, liar without conscience, pseudo-scholar, pseudo-academic, pitiless sponsor of dictators abroad"); Mother Teresa ("friend of poverty, enemy of the poor, fundamentalist fanatic"); and Bill Clinton ("a man who was in politics for therapy who wasted eight years of America's time").

	Despite the abundance of his copy, his prose usually sparkles, infuriates — or both. And though he objects to the label, he's often called a contrarian.

	...Perhaps, long after Christopher Hitchens has gone, those with the luxury of reflection will judge him charitably. I have a feeling they will.


sounds like the guy was a troll like Yiannapolis

whatever his motive, whether this guy joined up in some secret organization or not, he seems like a pretty unique guy (besides comparison to Yiannapolis). Probably not representative of ideology used for recruitment.

maybe thought religious people fun to troll

some call him troll others really angry



------


http://philosophicalenmity.blogspot.com/



------


Peter Singer with arguments against humanity:

https://opinionator.blogs.nytimes.com/2010/06/06/should-this-be-the-last-generation/?_r=0

	...The 19th-century German philosopher Arthur Schopenhauer held that even the best life possible for humans is one in which we strive for ends that, once achieved, bring only fleeting satisfaction. New desires then lead us on to further futile struggle and the cycle repeats itself.

	Schopenhauer’s pessimism has had few defenders over the past two centuries, but one has recently emerged, in the South African philosopher David Benatar, author of a fine book with an arresting title: “Better Never to Have Been: The Harm of Coming into Existence.” One of Benatar’s arguments trades on something like the asymmetry noted earlier. To bring into existence someone who will suffer is, Benatar argues, to harm that person, but to bring into existence someone who will have a good life is not to benefit him or her. Few of us would think it right to inflict severe suffering on an innocent child, even if that were the only way in which we could bring many other children into the world. Yet everyone will suffer to some extent, and if our species continues to reproduce, we can be sure that some future children will suffer severely. Hence continued reproduction will harm some children severely, and benefit none.


	...Here is a thought experiment to test our attitudes to this view. Most thoughtful people are extremely concerned about climate change. Some stop eating meat, or flying abroad on vacation, in order to reduce their carbon footprint. But the people who will be most severely harmed by climate change have not yet been conceived. If there were to be no future generations, there would be much less for us to feel to guilty about.

	So why don’t we make ourselves the last generation on earth? If we would all agree to have ourselves sterilized then no sacrifices would be required — we could party our way into extinction!

	Of course, it would be impossible to get agreement on universal sterilization, but just imagine that we could. Then is there anything wrong with this scenario? Even if we take a less pessimistic view of human existence than Benatar, we could still defend it, because it makes us better off — for one thing, we can get rid of all that guilt about what we are doing to future generations — and it doesn’t make anyone worse off, because there won’t be anyone else to be worse off.


	...I do think it would be wrong to choose the non-sentient universe. In my judgment, for most people, life is worth living. Even if that is not yet the case, I am enough of an optimist to believe that, should humans survive for another century or two, we will learn from our past mistakes and bring about a world in which there is far less suffering than there is now. But justifying that choice forces us to reconsider the deep issues with which I began. Is life worth living? Are the interests of a future child a reason for bringing that child into existence? And is the continuance of our species justifiable in the face of our knowledge that it will certainly bring suffering to innocent future human beings?

	What do you think?


this is pretty weird

doesn't seem like anyone believes it?


------


https://www.vox.com/2017/8/17/16140846/nietzsche-richard-spencer-alt-right-nazism
	That’s how white nationalist leader Richard Spencer described his intellectual awakening to the Atlantic’s Graeme Wood last June. “Red-pilled” is a common alt-right term for that “eureka moment” one experiences upon confrontation with some dark and previously buried truth.

	For Spencer and other alt-right enthusiasts of the 19th-century German philosopher Friedrich Nietzsche, that dark truth goes something like this: All the modern pieties about race, peace, equality, justice, civility, universal suffrage — that’s all bullshit. These are constructs cooked up by human beings and later enshrined as eternal truths.

	Nietzsche says the world is in constant flux, that there is no capital-T truth. He hated moral and social conventions because he thought they stifled the individual. In one of his most famous essays, The Genealogy of Morality, which Spencer credits with inspiring his awakening, Nietzsche tears down the intellectual justifications for Christian morality. He calls it a “slave morality” developed by peasants to subdue the strong. The experience of reading this was “shattering,” Spencer told Wood. It upended his “moral universe.”


alt-right likes Nietzche and Spencer says upended his ideas


	...Nietzsche made these same arguments more than 100 years ago. The story he tells in The Genealogy of Morality is that Christianity overturned classical Roman values like strength, will, and nobility of spirit. These were replaced with egalitarianism, community, humility, charity, and pity. Nietzsche saw this shift as the beginning of a grand democratic movement in Western civilization, one that championed the weak over the strong, the mass over the individual. 

	The alt-right — or at least parts of the alt-right — are enamored of this strain of Nietzsche’s thought. The influential alt-right blog Alternative Right refers to Nietzsche as a great “visionary” and published an essay affirming his warnings about cultural decay.

	...People often say that the Nazis loved Nietzsche, which is true. What’s less known is that Nietzsche’s sister, who was in charge of his estate after he died, was a Nazi sympathizer who shamefully rearranged his remaining notes to produce a final book, The Will to Power, that embraced Nazi ideology. It won her the favor of Hitler, but it was a terrible disservice to her brother’s legacy.

	Nietzsche regularly denounced anti-Semitism and even had a falling-out with his friend Richard Wagner, the proto-fascist composer, on account of Wagner’s rabid anti-Semitism. Nietzsche also condemned the “blood and soil” politics of Otto von Bismarck, the Prussian statesman who unified Germany in 1871, for cementing his power by stoking nationalist resentments and appealing to racial purity.


involved in wierd ways in rise of Nazis


	Nietzsche as a mirror

	Nietzsche liked to say that he “philosophized with a hammer.” For someone on the margins, stewing in their own hate or alienation or boredom, his books are a blast of dynamite. All that disillusionment suddenly seems profound, like you just stumbled upon a secret that justifies your condition. 


author know something?


...


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...One of the most powerful impressions on me after reading Spinks was just how pervasive Nietzsche’s ideas have become, woven into the most unlikely commonplaces, like television drama, art critique, literature, political debate, and even advertising, but mostly without explicitly acknowledging that parentage. This pervasiveness makes it easy to respond to direct contact with his unadulterated ideas with an indifferent shoulder shrug. Until it is recalled he originated these now normalised concepts when they might have been seen as revolutionary, and that his ideas have become enormously influential despite a common, naïve condemnation of his work as ideological justification for fascist excesses.


	...Another powerful impression on me now is that Nietzsche never wrote a definitive work, nor did he develop a cohesive set of principles. Instead he iteratively re-visited the same themes and concerns over a lifetime, amending and refining his conceptions in a process of continuous bringing-into-being that ceased when his sanity gave out, leaving us with an interrupted work in progress. I see it as more difficult than with some other writers to nail Nietzsche down on any specific proposition. That is particularly the case because he changed his expository style too, moving from the conventional form of narrative essay to an increasingly lyrical, poetic prose that requires significant effort to inculcate and evaluate.

	His iterative style also presents an expository difficulty. Many of his ideas are tightly interwoven, and explaining one relies on understanding another. Yet not even an unconventional narrative structure can explain all his ideas at once, and this narrative settles for an artificial sequence, based on the chronology of Spinks’s book. In doing so, though, it is worth remembering that almost none of Nietzsche’s major ideas can be well understood in isolation from the others.


If Nietzche hard to read, confusing, and considered evil, how did he get so influential?


	...For further clues on Nietzsche’s unfinished oeuvre, I think, you can look at Schopenhauer behind him, Kierkegaard running in parallel, and Camus with Sartre in his future. 


	...He was a child during the revolutionary period that swept continental Europe in 1848, in which Richard Wagner played some part. The revolutionary tide was aimed at overturning an old aristocratic order. The tide created the second French republic, but failed to gain a foothold in the German states, where the aristocrats forced many of the revolutionaries into exile. Wagner and the legacy of the failed revolutions were to leave an impression on Nietzsche that I suspect strongly informed his hostility to Christian conservative orthodoxy.

	In an Austrian-dominated German Confederation, Christian meant predominantly Catholic orthodoxy, creating internal tensions between North and South, with the North being more heavily Protestant, and Nietzsche himself belonging to that North.


author suspects Catholic-Christian tensions influenced Nietzche's hostility to Christians


	...It is my further speculation that psychologically Nietzsche may have been a prodigy, but tending towards sociopathy, and later on, towards megalomania, regarding himself as a kind of prophet of a new era. This is an essentially personal response, based on a myriad small observations which might be summarised by looking the at the table to contents for Nietzsche’s autobiography, Ecce Homo, which he lists the first three chapters as ‘Why I Am So Wise’, ‘Why I Am So Clever’, and ‘Why I Write Such Excellent Books’. 


tended towards megalomania later (was this after some noticed his work?)


	...His suggestions that self-control and asceticism might not be the virtues they were thought to be, and in fact harmful to the vitality of people and their cultures, is not likely to have endeared him with the Prussian martinets any more than the dour Lutherans or the Machiavellian Catholics in the Germany of his times.

	Worse, he challenged the philological orthodoxy of historiographical cause-and-effect reasoning about social and cultural development, and an entrenched snobbery about Greek perfection in aesthetic and intellectual qualities. The controversy he caused may have been small, limited as it was to a narrow academic circle, but it appears to have been fierce and bitter. Former revolutionary and composer Richard Wagner took Nietzsche’s side in the ensuing public exchange of vitriol. The friendship based on that skirmishing probably injected into Nietzsche’s outlook the influence of the 1840s revolutionary idealism, even if the two men fell out in the 1870s, not least because Wagner became an anti-Semitic Christian.


Nietzche was controversial but Wagner took his side and befriended him until 1870s when he became "anti-Semitic Christian"

	
	Looking back on Birth of Tragedy today, it seems to me that the most interesting insight arising from it is Nietzsche’s prescient critique of how Greek culture and society was weakened as the emphasis of its performance art shifted from the universal and grand to the individual and banal. Today we might liken this to the contemporary arts having largely abandoned any grand vision for human purposes in favour of a focus on the petty, neurotic ineffectiveness of individuals obsessed with the insipid. Most sit coms, but especially reality television, celebrate an execrable focus on stunningly ineffective, embarrassingly stupid people pursuing solely banal objects. Big-budget Hollywood shoot-em-up ‘blockbusters’ can be seen as vicarious reactions to a similar ineffectiveness, portrayed as powerlessness against two-dimensional ‘bad guys’. Pop music seems similarly obsessed with a unitary focus, albeit on a narcissistic, onanistic obsession with sexuality as social currency. Worst of all, the fourth estate has become a circus freak show, emphasising fear, scandal, and Schadenfreude as perverse titillation for a bourgeoisie with a need to find self-affirmation for its morally vacuous pettiness in being able to self-righteously disapprove of the ethical deficiencies in others.

	It would be easy to make an argument along Nietzschean lines that the culture which celebrates such mythification, and the societies that consume them, are weak and slavish rather than strong and vigorously independent.


I guess Nietzche was the kind of guy who could get you to hate culture for being weak (author seems to get this)



	...Nietzsche proposes that truth is a metaphor ‘invented to lend authority to particular forms of thought and styles’:

    … Nietzsche simultaneously broadens his argument by claiming that all of the concepts we employ to represent the ‘true’ structure of the world — such as ‘space’, ‘time’, ‘identity’, ‘causality’ and ‘number’ — are metaphors we project on to the world to make it thinkable in human terms. What we call ‘pure’ truth is produced by the interchange of poetic figures — ‘concepts’ — whose origin in metaphor has been forgotten. (p.38.)

	Much of what Nietzsche had to say about truth was a condemnation of religion, its ethics and constraints, and its effects on his society. Nevertheless, his arguments resonate because they have been re-cast many times after his death, most conspicuously in Marxist materialist critique, and the French existentialism that finally laid to rest any need to grapple with, or to reject religion at all, as having something to say about human consciousness and conscience. 


Nietzsche thought truth was made up and condemmed constraints of ethics on society while arguing that


	...Spinks suggests that Nietzsche is not necessarily opposed to the metaphorical abstraction of reality into human truths, but rather to the forgetfulness that these are abstractions, not literal truths, and the human tendency to allow metaphors to ‘ossify’ into rigid doctrines (p. 43). Nietzsche’s fear in all of this is that such confected truths serve as the justification for mediocre people to overturn the rightful authority of their superiors.


kindof like this:


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	12. Our right lies in force. The word "right" is an abstract thought and proved by nothing. The word means no more than: Give me what I want in order that thereby I may have a proof that I am stronger than you.    

	13. Where does right begin? Where does it end?    

	14. In any State in which there is a bad organization of authority, an impersonality of laws and of the rulers who have lost their personality amid the flood of rights ever multiplying out of liberalism, I find a new right - to attack by the right of the strong, and to scatter to the winds all existing forces of order and regulation, to reconstruct all institutions and to become the sovereign lord of those who have left to us the rights of their power by laying them down voluntarily in their liberalism.


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...In some senses other frameworks for critical thinking have displaced Nietzsche’s critique of truth, particularly Marxist and post-Marxist materialist approaches that follow the trail of money to illuminate what kind of interests are being represented in transactional discourses. The reason Nietzsche has been thus displaced could well be that he was wilfully disdainful of existential priorities; he doesn’t seem to care about social cohesion, economic boundary conditions, inevitable legal constraints, and, to a large degree, the psychology of ostracism associated with challenging orthodoxy. That tendency is not just an indicator of sociopathy as discussed above, but could be a signpost that Nietzsche’s intention was not to prescribe a manifesto for action by the masses so much as to address an imagined elite, fit to rule over the masses by the merit of intellectual superiority.


author postis Nietzsche addressing some sociopathic elite because he was disdainful of legal constraints and social cohesion and other things (?)


sounds like he's onto something:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Antichrist_(book)
	Nietzsche claimed in the Foreword to have written the book for a very limited readership. In order to understand the book, he asserted that the reader "... must be honest in intellectual matters to the point of hardness to so much as endure my seriousness, my passion."[3] The reader should be above politics and nationalism. Also, the usefulness or harmfulness of truth should not be a concern. Characteristics such as "Strength which prefers questions for which no one today is sufficiently daring; courage for the forbidden"[3] are also needed. He disdained all other readers.[4]


hehe ok this says a lot about him...


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...Morality

	I have read nothing in Nietzsche that rejects ethics or ethical behaviour. When he talks of a master perspective as pre-moral, all he says is that it is a position from which an original, authentic analysis is possible, the way it is not under the ‘slave’ mentality of having already and uncritically absorbed an existing moral code, together with its prescriptions for human ends. He regarded the latter as servitude by those who obey, to those who are served by that obedience. It is individual and independent critical analysis Nietzsche calls for, and whose lack he laments, when he condemns uncritical, self-effacing obedience of imposed ethics.


in author's account, Nietzche said that "masters" haven't blindly adopted "slave mentality" of morality yet


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Master%E2%80%93slave_morality
	Master–slave morality is a central theme of Friedrich Nietzsche's works, in particular the first essay of On the Genealogy of Morality. Nietzsche argued that there were two fundamental types of morality: 'Master morality' and 'Slave morality'. Master morality values pride, strength, and nobility, while slave morality values things like kindness, humility, and sympathy. Master morality weighs actions on a scale of good or bad consequences (i.e. classical virtues and vices, consequentialism), unlike slave morality which weighs actions on a scale of good or evil intentions (e.g. Christian virtues and vices, Kantian deontology).


	...Nietzsche defined master morality as the morality of the strong-willed. Nietzsche criticizes the view, which he identifies with contemporary British ideology, that good is everything that is helpful, and bad is everything that is harmful. He argues proponents of this view have forgotten the origins of its values, and is based merely on a non-critical acceptance of habit: what is useful has always been defined as good, therefore usefulness is goodness as a value. He continues explaining, that in the prehistoric state, "the value or non-value of an action was derived from its consequences,"[1] but ultimately, "There are no moral phenomena at all, only moral interpretations of phenomena."[2] For strong-willed men, the 'good' is the noble, strong, and powerful, while the 'bad' is the weak, cowardly, timid, and petty.



so for him "good" = strong, "bad" = weak, "master" morality is calculating based on ends



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	I would go further to propose that obedience, without the freedom or power to consider and judge is not ethics at all, but a robotic parsing of a set of instructions. Unlike Nietzsche, though, I see no inevitable conflict between independent thinking and a rational acceptance of the compromise rules necessary for social groups to function: a modicum of externalised vérité, or honesty, to make it possible to trust or rely on people in everyday exchanges and agreements; a degree of predictability about norms, reactions, and restraints (pp. 63–65). But not the cretinous demands for policed thought made by religionists, lawyers, and populists. It is important here to mention that when I refer to religionists I include those who adhere to secular religions, like ideologies that assume and insist on a priori values.


author says Nietszchie saw "inevitable conflict" between free thinking and accepting slave morality, but author disagrees.

Author thinks conventional morality should be rationally accepted for social groups to function, but not to follow "policed thought" of "religionists, lawyers and populists" (how do lawyers and populists fit in here?)


	...An underlying theme in Nietzsche’s work is an extended self-critique, or perhaps a critique of the orthodox academic wisdom of his era, specifically in his own field of philology. In that vein, a specific component of Nietzsche’s focus on genealogy is a concern to question the uses or utility of history. He probably accepted that the mark of an educated, civilised person is knowledge of history, and particularly that of the classical antiquity so idolised in the 19th century European academy (p. 75). But he questioned whether this knowledge didn’t turn into a kind of idolatry that kills off creativity and the capacity to invent a present not enslaved to the past.

	...‘the meaning and function of historical institutions will be determined by those who impose their will on circumstances and organise events in order to advance their own interpretation of life’ 


Nietzche thought knowledge of history could be stifling

if propagandist historians bought into Nitzche's ideas of truth and history they could see it as justifying what they do (Herwig identified some pro-Nazi ones)


	...As with so much else in Nietzsche’s thinking, this idea has been appropriate by post Marxists as dialectical materialism — a tool used to synthesise thesis with antithesis to reconcile what are thought to be contradictions inherent in the relations of production.


a lot of Nietzche ideas incorrporated into marxist thought?


	...It is possible I had internalised this Nietzschean warning to create a constant subconscious, but relentlessly nagging unease I felt during my recent master’s degree studies, giving rise to my persistent critiques: a sole focus on the asinine fantasy that science and mathematics offer an objective truth, capable of constructing a human future not chained to the mistakes of the past.


author took Nietzchie to heart? but is also criticizing him and evaluating him in this article

passage about "externalised vérité" makes it sound like author is a sociopath himself

also dislikes technocrats and silicon valley, drops "perpetuate power structure" and "wall-street casino capitalism"

author has read marxist stuff and I guess is exposed to all that and has thought of it


	...Once we accept the historical constitution of historical ‘truth’, it becomes possible to see our values as an effect of the will to power of dominant social groupings such as the church, aristocracy or the ruling class. These values no longer appear ‘natural’ or ‘timeless’, but rather the consequence of violence, conflict and a struggle for authority between competing interpretations of life. The task for us now, Nietzsche insists, is to move beyond the exhausted and declining Judaeo-Christian vision of existence and create a new interpretation of life for the future. (p. 86.)



https://roundersandrogues.wordpress.com/2012/02/19/nietzsche-and-truth/
	...On the relativity of truth, Nietzsche said, “Only that which has no history can be defined.”  By that he means, because man-made concepts called “truths” are subject to interpretation, whether that be cultural, psychological, sexual, religious or insitutional, there is no way to determine any such notion of real truth.  Nietzsche believed that the perpetual interpretation and reinvention of conceptual originality, causes truth, in its original sense, to be obscured.  Like people, concepts of truth are in a constant state of becoming, which means they are relative to individual or societal understanding, which by their very nature, makes them in a certain sense, irrelevant and un-real.

	...The other problem one must consider regarding truth is that our means of articulating these concepts, is our vocabulary, which is created by man, and is subject to man’s inherent interpretation.  These truths are the ideas of man, because the very function we use to communicate them, is also an idea of man.  Anything being created is subject to interpretation, and therefore can only be explained with a subjectivity that leans heavily on language.  In conclusion, since no two men necessarily can agree on the meaning of a word, and words can often mean different things to different people and cultures, then one has to accept how unlikely it is that man can also agree on a concept expressed as truth. 



https://timlshort.com/2013/06/17/nietzsches-on-truth-and-lying-in-a-non-moral-sense-summary/
	...1.  Deception and falsehood are ubiquitous and necessary in human existence.

	...“the question as to which of these two perceptions of the world is quite meaningless, since this would require them to be measured by the criterion of the correct perspective

	Perspectivism is Nietzsche’s important doctrine, developed in GM, that there is only truth from a perspective.

	“It is our needs that interpret the world; our drives and their For and Against.  

	Every drive is a kind of lust to rule; each one has its perspective that it would like to compel all the other drives to accept as a norm.  The Will to Power, §481 (1883-1888)’’


I think he's saying there's not "truth" except that imposed by institutions, people, culture

I guess this philosophy would make it easier for propaganadists to swallow going out and lying about history, or lying about anything. Like they could tell themselves "well that's just the way of things" and "there is no truth anyway"

did Nietzche impugn motive to truth? I think I've seen that before (maybe Marxist? like "all your history is just capitalist class forcing their ideas on you") that every explanation purporting to be truth is just someone with ulterior motives imposing their interpretation (roughly). I guess this would be the mindset of the propagandist and justifies doing propaganda.

This would appeal to sociopaths, who might often findthemselves speaking not for the sake of truth but to get something.


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Nietzsche reached in these considerations a metaphysical leap of faith that led him to propose a mode of life transcending morality altogether. An ‘aristocratic’ or ‘noble’ mode of thought that rejects values as proposed by others and determines its own will in a return to a pre-moral, life-affirming vitality in which all things are possible rather than governed by set rules.

	Nietzsche next leap is to suggest that an internalised conscience, creating in people a sense of obligation to adhere to values at all, is essentially a commercial, transactional prerequisite that succeeds the power of an arbitrary exercise of force by the strong (pp. 67–70). Marx might have called this the relations of production, with a domination of capital over labour, and the systematic exploitation of labour to produce surplus value while preventing labour from recognising the exploitation as that, instead accepting it as a rigid, given social order.


Neitzche and Lenin say similar things:


https://espressostalinist.com/2013/08/11/v-i-lenin-on-communist-morality/
	In what sense do we reject ethics, reject morality?

	In the sense given to it by the bourgeoisie, who based ethics on God’s commandments. On this point we, of course, say that we do not believe in God, and that we know perfectly well that the clergy, the landowners and the bourgeoisie invoked the name of God so as to further their own interests as exploiters. Or, instead of basing ethics on the commandments of morality, on the commandments of God, they based it on idealist or semi-idealist phrases, which always amounted to something very similar to God’s commandments.

	We reject any morality based on extra-human and extra-class concepts. We say that this is deception, dupery, stultification of the workers and peasants in the interests of the landowners and capitalists.

	We say that our morality is entirely subordinated to the interests of the proletariat’s class struggle. Our morality stems from the interests of the class struggle of the proletariat.


I think Nietzsche saying that a conscience and morality is something imposed on the "slave" by "masters"?

these days we know moral reasoning comes from a certain part of the brain, and its part that and part learning social norms. I guess Nietzsche thought morality was all learned and picked up from environment. For a sociopath, this is necessarily true since they don't have an innate conscience or one not working as strongly.


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...It doesn’t help that he argued forcefully that ‘goodness’ and the restraint from violence were inventions by the weak to restrain the powerful as opposed to ‘an ideal and timeless standard of moral virtue’ (p. 65). He seems to rule out a civilised state of keeping civil strife at bay with rules that benefit the tribe. That Nietzsche did not more clearly spell out his intentions in making these assertions has assisted successive generations of totalitarians to misappropriate his ideas as literal commandments rather than as ideas to be discussed and contextualised in specific circumstances.



author dislikes that Nietzsche "argued forcefully" that goodness was invented by weak to restrain the strong. Author sees ethical rules as keeping society together. He says Nietzsche's ideas helped totalitarians. 



	...Christianity and bad conscience

	Nietzsche’s conception is that punishment was originally an expression of immediate anger and the power to exert force. It then became an exchange convenience whereby essentially economic transactions were guaranteed by the threat of violent retribution for defaulting on promises. That arrangement acquired, over time, an ethical status as a moral good in itself.

	The ultimate expression of this arbitrary, not in itself ‘good’ power to punish, Nietzsche argues, has been formalised in Christianity, which has extended the idea of a commercial debt, subject to settlement by payment or punishment, as inevitable and insoluble for all humans.



Nietzsche has a history of ethics and punishment which is that it was invented to make business transactions work then evolved into Christianity

I guess that helps assign a motive to ethics, rules, and Christianity, like "it's just there to keep you down, man"

this is familiar


	...That Nietzschean perspective has significant subversive consequences for a consideration of justice and law in in Western societies. It suggests that the law is not about administering justice or retribution, but about the particular way it is used under specific circumstances for the benefit of a distinct group of people. Spinks quotes Nietzsche thus:

    … people think punishment has evolved for the purpose of punishing. But every purpose and use is just a sign that the will to power has achieved mastery over something less powerful, and has impressed upon it its own idea of a use function; and the whole history of a ‘thing’, an organ, a tradition can to this extent be a continuous chain of signs, continually revealing new interpretations and adaptations, the causes of which need not be connected even amongst themselves, but rather sometimes just follow and replace one another at random. (p. 72.)


also familiar

saying law is just another form of exerting power, and I think this was used to argue mafia-style extortion no different from enforcing law (roughly)

like here:


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	4. What has restrained the beasts of prey who are called men? What has served for their guidance hitherto?    

	5. In the beginnings of the structure of society, they were subjected to brutal and blind force; afterwords - to Law, which is the same force, only disguised. I draw the conclusion that by the law of nature right lies in force.


protocols and Nietzche talk about same history of the law (Nietzsche was big on how the history of concepts develop) and both reach the same conclusions



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Spinks makes an aside that is nevertheless irresistible: was Nietzsche anti-democratic?

	    The establishment of altruism as an absolute moral virtue also forms the basis for political movements like social democracy, which Nietzsche depicts as a conspiracy of the weak against those strong and noble natures capable of asserting their will to power and imposing their own values on the world. (p. 90.)

	As I read him, though, Nietzsche would not be opposed to a much more rational conception for social democracy: that of maximising the capacity of its citizens to contribute towards noble ends if they were unconstrained by the depredations of grinding poverty, ignorance, illness, and the petty crime inherent in systems that abandon those without means to their own devices. 



http://www.fsmitha.com/h3/h45-ph4.htm
	Another writer opposed to democracy and materialism who was to have an influence on the twentieth century was Friedrich Nietzsche. He saw steps toward democracy as decay. Nietzsche despised liberalism as a "pig philosophy." Nietzsche was skeptical about claims that good times were ahead, especially as influenced by public opinion. He despised mediocrity and the masses. Liberalism, he believed, led to revolution, bloodletting and crime. 



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	...    26. In all corners of the earth the words "Liberty, Equality, Fraternity," brought to our ranks, thanks to our blind agents, whole legions who bore our banners with enthusiasm.

    And all the time these words were canker-worms at work boring into the well-being of the GOYIM, putting an end everywhere to peace, quiet, solidarity and destroying all the foundations of the GOYA States. As you will see later, this helped us to our triumph: it gave us the possibility, among other things, of getting into our hands the master card - the destruction of the privileges, or in other words of the very existence of the aristocracy of the GOYIM, that class which was the only defense peoples and countries had against us.

	...    20. The word "freedom" brings out the communities of men to fight against every kind of force, against every kind of authority even against God and the laws of nature. For this reason we, when we come into our kingdom, shall have to erase this word from the lexicon of life as implying a principle of brute force which turns mobs into bloodthirsty beasts.    


	...6. Political freedom is an idea but not a fact. This idea one must know how to apply whenever it appears necessary with this bait of an idea to attract the masses of the people to one's party for the purpose of crushing another who is in authority. This task is rendered easier of the opponent has himself been infected with the idea of freedom, SO-CALLED LIBERALISM, and, for the sake of an idea, is willing to yield some of his power. It is precisely here that the triumph of our theory appears; the slackened reins of government are immediately, by the law of life, caught up and gathered together by a new hand, because the blind might of the nation cannot for one single day exist without guidance,and the new authority merely fits into the place of the old already weakened by liberalism.


	...	16. Out of the temporary evil we are now compelled to commit will emerge the good of an unshakable rule, which will restore the regular course of the machinery of the national life, brought to naught by liberalism. The result justifies the means. Let us, however, in our plans, direct our attention not so much to what is good and moral as to what is necessary and useful.


	...    13. We have demonstrated that progress will bring all the GOYIM to the sovereignty of reason. Our despotism will be precisely that; for it will know how, by wise severities, to pacificate all unrest, to cauterize liberalism out of all institutions.    


I see a pattern here




https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...That said, I nevertheless see very clearly how accurate Nietzsche was in condemning the association of ‘virtue’ with ‘pity and selflessness’ (p. 90) when I look at all forms of political correctness, and the rise of a victim culture, or the ‘a cult of pity’ (p. 91) which effectively outlaws words, phrases, and behaviours inan attempt at socially engineering obedience. The pity-virtue mind-set leads to witch-hunts against individuals as readily as does totalitarianism, as has been demonstrated quite recently on American and British university campuses with ‘demonstrations’ against all manner of vigorous debate of tough questions.


I guess both author and Neitzche dislike "PC thought police"

kinda relates to most people being uncomfortable talking about certain things, and sociopaths tending to not having that quality, and I guess they cite this as a reason to feel superior to most people.

so the whole PC and "safe space" propaganda could just be something to make themselves feel better, like they need someone to feel superior too so they created someone

maybe they see it as a recuirting tool

reaction to PC pushes people to alt-right, and I guess eventually to a Nietzchie mindset


	Spinks observes:

    … the morality of pity is not selfless but rather embodies a weak and reactive will to power intended to subordinate the strong to the weak and preserve a degenerating form of life. For the feeling of pity always involves a degree of contempt for the person pitied; and this pleasurable experience of superiority enables the ‘altruistic’ individual to believe itself more powerful than before. (pp.90–91.)


maybe Neitzche was upset at people calling him out for not showing sympahty to others


	...Aristocratic values

	There is in Nietzsche an undisputable admiration for elitism. This may be a reflection of Nietzsche’s own narcissism, or of his Germanic romanticism (adherence to which he would have denied).

	Nietzsche sees a division among men (where that term is the German gender-neutral ‘Mensch’) defined as the difference between aristocratic or noble mentalities on the one hand, determining their own values and purposes independently of tradition, law, or peer approval, and slave mentalities on the other hand, defined by their envious subversion and subjugation of their betters with morality and law (pp. 92–93) justifying and reinforcing their solely reactive natures, and yet incapable of any real creativity or innovation (p. 95).


Nietzsche saw two classes, noble and slave, where "slave" held back superior people with morality and law, while "noble" could think outside that and come up with their own way of doing things

I think he's describing difference between neurotypical and sociopath but assigning values to their tendencies. Like he sees all these differences and concludes that soicopath is better and has all these reasons to argue that.

Machiavelli was similar, saying there were two classes of "princes" and everybody else, and assumed the business of the prince was to grab power and wrote his theories of how to best do that.

If Neitzche were a sociopath and I guess spent a lot of his time succesfully manipulating people around him, that would make it easier to conclude these people are inferior and like "slaves." It's hard to say how much of Nietzche's conclusions came from observing history or his interactions with people around him.

Machiavelli I guess assumed that powerful people have no morals from looking at history (at least he concluded that it's better to be evil and feared if you want power)


	...But, as I have suggested before, I do not see this as a manifesto calling for superior people to dominate and enslave their inferiors. Nietzsche explicitly demanded that a mark of ‘nobility’ is not just a capacity to command and control, but also one for self-control and restraint from violence or domination where this is not required to attain independence from subjugation by the mediocre (p. 94).


from spinks:

	Nietzsche is unequivocal that violence and domination are funda-
	mental to both the health of a noble society and to the development of
	a ‘higher existence’ (1990a: 193). An aristocratic society needs slavery
	‘in some sense’ because the generation of a pathos of distance between
	master and slave produces ‘ever higher, rarer, more remote, tenser,
	more comprehensive states’ and a type of ‘man’ who can overcome
	morality and live beyond good and evil (p. 192). Only this elevated type
	can endure the burden of ‘greatness’ which demands extraordinary self-
	discipline and the continual transformation of weakness into new states
	of hardness and strength.

	...Nevertheless, Nietzsche’s great politics also leaves troubling
	questions in its wake. Is it possible to go ‘beyond’ morality (or good
	and evil) by moral exhortation? Why, in other words, should we follow
	Nietzsche’s example? To what extent can politics escape making
	moral claims upon us (Ansell-Pearson 1994: 154)? How do we relate
	Nietzsche’s immoral politics of domination to the idea of self-cultiva-
	tion and restraint, and what marks the point of transition between the
	two?

	...This chapter examines one of Nietzsche’s most important and enigmatic
	formulations: will to power. Of all of Nietzsche’s terms, ‘will to power’
	is the one most closely associated with his name in the popular imagi-
	nation, where it is generally taken to describe a vision and a justification
	of life conceived as the violent domination of the weak by the strong.
	Like most clichés, this reading conceals a residue of truth, but it only
	highlights the most dramatic element of what Nietzsche claims to be an
	entirely new theory of life.


author and spinks in disagreement

I guess Nietszche is saying elites need slavery to sharpen themselves into ubermenches


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/nietzsche/1886/beyond-good-evil/ch09.htm
	257. EVERY elevation of the type "man," has hitherto been the work of an aristocratic society and so it will always be--a society believing in a long scale of gradations of rank and differences of worth among human beings, and requiring slavery in some form or other. Without the PATHOS OF DISTANCE, such as grows out of the incarnated difference of classes, out of the constant out-looking and down-looking of the ruling caste on subordinates and instruments, and out of their equally constant practice of obeying and commanding, of keeping down and keeping at a distance--that other more mysterious pathos could never have arisen, the longing for an ever new widening of distance within the soul itself, the formation of ever higher, rarer, further, more extended, more comprehensive states, in short, just the elevation of the type "man," the continued "self-surmounting of man," to use a moral formula in a supermoral sense. To be sure, one must not resign oneself to any humanitarian illusions about the history of the origin of an aristocratic society (that is to say, of the preliminary condition for the elevation of the type "man"): the truth is hard. Let us acknowledge unprejudicedly how every higher civilization hitherto has ORIGINATED! Men with a still natural nature, barbarians in every terrible sense of the word, men of prey, still in possession of unbroken strength of will and desire for power, threw themselves upon weaker, more moral, more peaceful races (perhaps trading or cattle-rearing communities), or upon old mellow civilizations in which the final vital force was flickering out in brilliant fireworks of wit and depravity. At the commencement, the noble caste was always the barbarian caste: their superiority did not consist first of all in their physical, but in their psychical power--they were more COMPLETE men (which at every point also implies the same as "more complete beasts").

	258. Corruption--as the indication that anarchy threatens to break out among the instincts, and that the foundation of the emotions, called "life," is convulsed--is something radically different according to the organization in which it manifests itself. When, for instance, an aristocracy like that of France at the beginning of the Revolution, flung away its privileges with sublime disgust and sacrificed itself to an excess of its moral sentiments, it was corruption:--it was really only the closing act of the corruption which had existed for centuries, by virtue of which that aristocracy had abdicated step by step its lordly prerogatives and lowered itself to a FUNCTION of royalty (in the end even to its decoration and parade-dress). The essential thing, however, in a good and healthy aristocracy is that it should not regard itself as a function either of the kingship or the commonwealth, but as the SIGNIFICANCE and highest justification thereof--that it should therefore accept with a good conscience the sacrifice of a legion of individuals, who, FOR ITS SAKE, must be suppressed and reduced to imperfect men, to slaves and instruments. Its fundamental belief must be precisely that society is NOT allowed to exist for its own sake, but only as a foundation and scaffolding, by means of which a select class of beings may be able to elevate themselves to their higher duties, and in general to a higher EXISTENCE: like those sun- seeking climbing plants in Java--they are called Sipo Matador,-- which encircle an oak so long and so often with their arms, until at last, high above it, but supported by it, they can unfold their tops in the open light, and exhibit their happiness. 


I guess he's saying artistocrat sociopaths need to step on everyone else to become "more complete men"

says the aristocracy has to sacrifice a lot of people, supress them and reduce them to slaves and instruments for its own sake. Socioety is not allowed to exist for its own sake, according to Neitzche, but exists for aristocrats to use them as scaffolding to become ubermenches.

I think he's also saying class differences and looking down on the slave class helps the inspire the noble to want to elevate themselves even more




https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Ressentiment

	Nietzsche’s use of the term ressentiment is difficult to simplify and pin down as an exact definition. Spinks offers the following:

    	Where aristocratic values were bred from the experience of the natural plenitude and self sufficiency of the noble spirit, slavish life can only create a moral vision by saying ‘No’ to everything outside itself. Because slavish being is unable simply to affirm its own life and values, it is compelled to redirect the ‘evaluating glance’ of moral judgement outward on to a world it finds hostile and superior to itself (p. 21). Ressentiment describes the movement in which this reactive and resentful denial of higher life begins to create its own moral system and vision of the world. Slave morality is a form of moral recoil from life; it can only create a vision of existence by first projecting an ‘opposing, external world’ that represses the weak and vulnerable. Like every manifestation of ressentiment, slave morality ‘needs, physiologically speaking, external stimuli in order to act at all — its action is basically a reaction’ (p. 22). [The page numbers inside the quotation refer to the 2000 Cambridge University Press edition of Nietzsche’s On the Genealogy of Morality: A Polemic.] (pp. 96–97.)


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ressentiment
	(T)he problem with the other origin of the “good,” of the good man, as the person of ressentiment has thought it out for himself, demands some conclusion. It is not surprising that the lambs should bear a grudge against the great birds of prey, but that is no reason for blaming the great birds of prey for taking the little lambs. And when the lambs say among themselves, "These birds of prey are evil, and he who least resembles a bird of prey, who is rather its opposite, a lamb,—should he not be good?" then there is nothing to carp with in this ideal's establishment, though the birds of prey may regard it a little mockingly, and maybe say to themselves, "We bear no grudge against them, these good lambs, we even love them: nothing is tastier than a tender lamb."
	—Friedrich Nietzsche, On the Genealogy of Morality


I guess Nietszche sees morality as a jealous reaction to superior beings trying to get their ubermensch on

I think Nietszche is saying "ressentiment" is the phenomenon of "slaves" being angry at "nobles" for dicking them over

this is a little sly

if sociopaths take Nietzche to heart, they are going to spend their lives stepping on people, and those people are going to be pissed and might come at them. Nietzche is putting an idea in their head that whenever this happens, it's an affirmation of the others weakness, so if and when the Nietzcheite gets knocked down they'll learn nothing and stay elitist.


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	It is almost amusing how Nietzsche develops his argument. He says injustice is never found in ‘unequal rights’, but in claims for equal rights, because such rights are impossible to be defined according to any universal law rather than the imposition of demands based on envy, and that, as such, they resemble the ideologies of Christianity and anti-Semitism ‘which, he claims, develop “from weakness, from envy, from vengefulness”’ (p. 97).


Nietzche says there's no such thing as rights and asking for them is motivated by weakness and envy


	I find it irresistible to speculate whether much of what has passed as post-war conservatism is not in fact a kind of impotent reactionary longing for the imagined glories of a fictionalised past rather than a genuine concern to preserve institutions and practices whose utility is regarded not yet to have been diminished sufficiently to warrant their abandonment. In any case, such ineffective longing for an imagined (or real) vitality of the past fits precisely into Nietzsche’s critique about a weak or slave mentality unable to revitalise its thinking and circumstances the way a noble or aristocratic mentality can and does.

	In those terms the kind of reactionary ‘conservatism’ entrenched into the Western polity by Reagan and Thatcher is properly defined as nihilistic ressentiment, sapping the vitality and creativity of Western civilisation as a whole, and sustainable for only as long as the declared and silent enemies of the West (radical Islam and remnant Stalinists) are even less effective.


author pins Reagan and Thatcher as being slave-mentality according to Nietzche

what does that say about him? I guess he values some of Nietszchie's worldview, but uses it to justify left-wing viewpoitns (or at least attack right wing)

weird I guess since Nietzchie was originally thought-leader for Nazis

I think I read somehwere that there's a lot of different interpretations of Neitzche and debates about what he really meant


	...He suggests that free will is an invention, not an objective state of being (pp. 99–100). OK. I’m on board. For there to be free will, there must be an absence of coercion or negative consequences for giving form to will. The immediate objection has to be that such an absence might turn free will into the exercise of anti-social, criminal activities. Nietzsche went on to suggest that inventing free will permits the further artificial determination that any action is a freely chosen moral decision for which responsibility accrues.


http://www.informationphilosopher.com/solutions/philosophers/nietzsche/
	Nietzsche vigorously attacks the "free will" of the theologians that is designed to make men "guilty" in the eyes of God. He sees man as "natural" as any other animal, and thus lacking the "free will" and "responsibility" invented by the theologians and philosophers to distinguish man from other animals.

	    Today we no longer have any pity for the concept of "free will": we know only too well what it really is — the foulest of all theologians' artifices, aimed at making mankind "responsible" in their sense, that is, dependent upon them. Here I simply supply the psychology of all "making responsible."
	    (Twilight of the Idols, The Four Great Errors, 7)

	    We have become more modest in every way. We no longer derive man from "the spirit" or "the deity"; we have placed him back among the animals....

	    Descartes was the first to have dared, with admirable boldness, to understand the animal as machina: the whole of our physiology endeavors to prove this claim. And we are consistent enough not to except man, as Descartes still did: our knowledge of man today goes just as far as we understand him mechanistically. 


apparently Neizsche thinks free will is just an invention by the slave class so they can blame the ubermench and hold him down


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	...French existentialist champion Jean Paul Sartre, who incorporated much of Nietzsche’s anti-religious will to self-determination in his own thinking, was much more clear about acknowledging that if there is no a priori law, and we create our own purposes, we are nevertheless absolutely responsible for what we choose.


Sartre built of Nietzche. He decided people are reponsiple for their actions


	...My conclusion about Nietzsche’s conception of will is still reserved, but it strikes me as quite similar to the ill-defined demands by 1960s hippies for freedom from convention and responsibility, but without clear ideas of what would replace orthodoxy, or why people invested in orthodoxy should see advantage in acceding to vague demands.


hippies somehow got similar ideas to Neitszche


	...More interesting than the supine religionist asceticism, and a more exalted one Nietzsche saw flowing from an enlightened self-discipline, was Nietzsche’s conception of the consequences for Western civilization in pursuing the Christian conception of truth. He argued convincingly that the very methods whereby the Church imposed doctrine by resort to a dishonest lionisation of ‘truth’ led inevitably to the liberation of conscience from the Church in turning to scientific truth instead. Spinks summarised it thus:

	    Scientific conscience, he declares in the Genealogy, is ‘the awe-inspiring catastrophe of a two-thousand year discipline in truth-telling, which finally forbids the lie entailed in the belief in God’ (2000: 114). (p. 104.)

	It seems to me the irony here is overwhelming. After centuries of being ‘forced’ to tell the truth in the service of grotesque lies, the sheep thus trained finally turned on the lies with the catechism of being obliged to tell the truth according to their new scientific insights.



https://www.quora.com/What-did-Nietzsche-think-about-scientists-and-science


Neitszche flunked out of physics class?


https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	The Übermensch

	Without voiding all other popular interpretations, my own response to Nietzsche’s Übermensch is plainly dismissive. I see in it, particularly as it is propounded in Thus Spake Zarathustra, a fearfully reactive defence of a type of sociopathy Nietzsche should have dismissed as reactive and weak even as he embarked on its defence.

	All the talk about strength and discipline in overcoming the meanings and projects of others is valid, but talking nonsense about overcoming to end up nowhere at all, other than messianically exalted for purposelessness, is just fatuous. It seems to me this is Nietzsche enthralled with megalomania, seeking to lionise his own looming insanity as genius. Is there a clue in his preface to Thus Spake Zarathustra: ‘I have with this book given mankind the greatest gift that has ever been given it’? Or this from Ecce Homo: ‘Why do I know a few things more than other people? Why in fact am I so clever?’ Indeed! What does one say to a man so singularly convinced of his own genius?


Nietzsche a narcissist?


	My answer? It seems quite astonishing that for all Nietzsche’s brilliance and philosophical insight, he seems to have been remarkably ignorant of the nature of human social formation. His theories seem to ignore the inevitability of all people living within one or another social context, dependent to some degree on other people, and subject to some degree to the whims of other people. In that ignorance maybe he is reflecting nothing more than his own intellectual and social isolation, and his own sociopathic conception that one need not have any obligations to others, nor material or emotional ties. Nietzsche, patron saint of sociopaths? Prophet of a generation (or two) of idiot STEM savants? Contemptuous or ignorant (or both) of everything others do while enjoying the fruits of their labour all the same.


author says Nietzshce defending megalomaniac sociopaths, doesn't get the idea of society cooperating


	So, exactly what is the Übermensch? It is a German compound word combining forms of über (over, above, higher) and mensch (man, human, person). Spinks translates it to ‘Overman’, to give expression to the idea of a men ‘above’ mankind. It is a fair compromise. I have always intuitively translated Übermensch as ‘transcendent man’, to accord with Nietzsche’s insistence that this type of human transcends intellectual ties to orthodox ideas, conventions, practices, and constraints (pp. 116–121).



https://www.quora.com/What-exactly-is-Nietzsches-%C3%BCbermensch
	Nietzsche’s way out of this was simple: he didn’t have one. He thought that no human being alive could replace our old values. But, if we created the right kind of society, we could, in a few generations, give rise to Übermenschen, people with such strong will, and with such precisely-engineered upbringing, and with such advanced, scientifically-trained intellects, that they could create their own values. Nietzsche had given up on the idea that present humans could create new values. The best we could do is try to make a world that would give rise to people so strong they could create their own values using the power of their will.


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
    15 Ever since that time we have been leading the peoples from one disenchantment to another, so that in the end they should turn also from us in favor of that KING-DESPOT OF THE BLOOD OF ZION, WHOM WE ARE PREPARING FOR THE WORLD.



is this the world they're trying to make?


maybe they see it that they're reshaping the world as a proving-ground for despots or "Ubermenschen," basically more people like them.


https://rendezvous.blogs.nytimes.com/2012/09/05/the-enduring-legacy-of-chinas-great-famine/
	Society became terribly violent during the famine,” during which as many as 45 million people may have died, Ms. Zhou said in an interview.

	“If you look at what is going on today, in a way I think there’s a lot we can see in what happened then in what happens now,” she said.

	Today, “family members don’t have to take food out of another person’s mouth,” but disputes over property “tear families apart,” she said. “It’s very common.”

	“I do believe it created a kind of long-lasting impact in the sense that, O.K., human beings are selfish, you can say that in general. But the use of violence, it really reached its height during the famine period and I believe that was the background behind the Cultural Revolution” that began just four years later, in 1966, killing many more.

	Hopelessness and selfishness inform Chinese society to this day, she said.

	“I very much feel that coming from this, what people have in China is a sense of hopelessness,” she said. “That to survive, the only way is to do it yourself.”




https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Looking at this conception more than a hundred years on, I think it has been more elegantly expressed by Sartre and Marcuse as a kind of self-determination immune from indoctrination or blackmail designed to create conformity, if not quite as the signal event of transcendence Nietzsche described.


Sartre and Marcuse ran with Neitsche's ubermench and refined it


	The only analogue that comes to mind for that messianic vision is the contemporary flirtation by idiot nerds with the singularity — the expungement of what is human in homo sapiens by the rise of cyborg monster calculators. 


"futurism" at work?


	There is one unexplored and intriguing idea to the Übermensch that no one has endorsed or sufficiently refuted since Nietzsche, probably because it would be seen as immoral to endorse, and yet unrealistic to refute: the Übermenschen make rules and values for themselves without necessarily regarding these as fit or applicable to others. It is as plain a statement of elitism as there can be, and without the often (wrongly) inferred idea that the Übermenschen should lead or lord it over their inferiors — the Untermenschen (lower, lesser, beneath).


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/nietzsche/1886/beyond-good-evil/ch09.htm
	259. To refrain mutually from injury, from violence, from exploitation, and put one's will on a par with that of others: this may result in a certain rough sense in good conduct among individuals when the necessary conditions are given (namely, the actual similarity of the individuals in amount of force and degree of worth, and their co-relation within one organization). As soon, however, as one wished to take this principle more generally, and if possible even as the FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE OF SOCIETY, it would immediately disclose what it really is--namely, a Will to the DENIAL of life, a principle of dissolution and decay. Here one must think profoundly to the very basis and resist all sentimental weakness: life itself is ESSENTIALLY appropriation, injury, conquest of the strange and weak, suppression, severity, obtrusion of peculiar forms, incorporation, and at the least, putting it mildest, exploitation;--but why should one for ever use precisely these words on which for ages a disparaging purpose has been stamped? Even the organization within which, as was previously supposed, the individuals treat each other as equal--it takes place in every healthy aristocracy--must itself, if it be a living and not a dying organization, do all that towards other bodies, which the individuals within it refrain from doing to each other it will have to be the incarnated Will to Power, it will endeavour to grow, to gain ground, attract to itself and acquire ascendancy-- not owing to any morality or immorality, but because it LIVES, and because life IS precisely Will to Power. On no point, however, is the ordinary consciousness of Europeans more unwilling to be corrected than on this matter, people now rave everywhere, even under the guise of science, about coming conditions of society in which "the exploiting character" is to be absent--that sounds to my ears as if they promised to invent a mode of life which should refrain from all organic functions. "Exploitation" does not belong to a depraved, or imperfect and primitive society it belongs to the nature of the living being as a primary organic function, it is a consequence of the intrinsic Will to Power, which is precisely the Will to Life--Granting that as a theory this is a novelty--as a reality it is the FUNDAMENTAL FACT of all history let us be so far honest towards ourselves! 


why is the author in denial about Nietzche?

"exploitation is the thing to do right lets be honest guys"



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Will to power

	It is my opinion, not Spinks’s, that the book of the same title is a fraud. It was not written by Nietzsche, but rather assembled through a selective stitching together of notes and fragments by his sister, whose anti-Semitic husband apparently left a deeper impression on her than Friedrich’s contempt for such ressentiments.


author and spinks disagree on anti-semitism in will to power book.

Where did author get this idea? Neitzche went on some kind of anti-semetic rant in geneology of morality


https://archive.org/stream/GenealogyOfMorals/GoogleGenOptimized_djvu.txt
	Our own German "gut" — might it 
	not denote " one godlike," the man of divine origin ? 
	And be identical with the name " Goths," denoting the 


	who, with most frightfully consistent logic, dared to 
	subvert the aristocratic equation of values (good = 
	noble = powerful = beautiful = happy = beloved of 
	God), and who, with the teeth of the profoundest 
	hatred (the hatred of impotency), clung to their own 
	valuation : " The wretched alone are the good ; the 
	poor, the impotent, the lowly alone are the good ; only 
	the sufferers, the needy, the sick, the ugly are pious ; 1 
	only they are godly ; them alone blessedness awaits ; — 
	but ye, ye, the proud and potent, ye are for aye and 
	evermore the wicked, the cruel, the lustful, the insati- 
	able, the godless; ye will also be, to all eternity, the 
	unblessed, the cursed and the damned !".... It is 
	known, wko has been the inheritor of this Jewish 
	transvaluation .... In regard to the enormous initi- 
	ative fatal beyond all measure, which the Jews gave by 
	this most fundamental declaration of war, I refer to the 
	proposition which elsewhere presented itself to me 
	{Beyond Good and Evil, aph. 195) — viz., that with the 
	Jews the slave-revolt in morality begins : that revolt, \ 
	which has a history of two thousand years behind it, 
	and which to-day is only removed from our vision, 
	because it — has been victorious . , , , 

	S 

	But this ye do not understand? Ye are blind 

	to something which needed two thousand years ere 
	it came to be triumphant? There is nothing in it 
	surprising to me : all long things are hard to see, hard 
	to survey. But this is the event: from the trunk of 
	that tree of revenge and hatred, Jewish hatred — the 
	deepest and sublimest hatred, i.e., a hatred which 
	creates ideals and transforms values, and which never 
	had its like upon earth — something equally incompa- 
	rable grew up, a new love, the deepest and sub lime st 
	kind of love: — and, indeed, from what other trunk 
	could it have grown ? . . . . Quite wrong it is, how- 
	ever, to suppose, that this love grew up as the true 
	negation of that thirst of vengeance, as the antithesis of 
	the Jewish hatred! No, the reverse is true! This 
	love grew out of this trunk, as its crown, — as the 
	crown of triumph, which spread its foliage ever farther 
	and wider in clearest brightness and fulness of sun- 
	shine, and which with the same vitality strove upwards, 
	as it were, in the realm of light and elevation and 
	towards the goals of that hatred, towards victory, spoils 
	and seduction, with which the roots of that hatred pene- 
	trated ever more and more profoundly and eagerly into 
	everything deep and evil. This Jesus of Nazareth, as 
	the personified gospel of love, this saviour bringing 
	blessedness and victory unto the poor, the sick, the 
	sinners — did he not represent seduction in its most 
	awful and irresistible form — the seduction and by-way 
	to those sdimt Jewish values and new ideals ? Has not 
	Israel, even by the round-about-way of this " redeemer," 
	this seeming adversary and destroyer of Israel, attained 


	the last goal of its sublime vindictiveness ? Does it not 
	belong to the secret black-art of truly grand politics 
	of vengeance, of a vengeance far-seeing, underground, 
	slowly-gripping and fore -reckoning, that Israel itself 
	should deny and crucify before all the world the proper 
	tool of its vengeance, as though it were something 
	deadly inimical, — so that "all the world," namely all 
	enemies of Israel, might quite unhesitatingly bite at this 
	bait ? And could, on the other hand, any still more 
	dangerous bait be imagined, even with the utmost re- 
	finement of spirit ? Could we conceive anything, which 
	in influence seducing, intoxicating, narcotising, corrupt- 
	ing, might equal that symbol of the "sacred cross,"! 
	that awful paradox of a " God on the cross," that 
	mystery of an unfathomable, ultimate, extreme st cruelty 
	and self-crucifixion of God for the salvation of man? 
	. . .-. Thus much is certain, that sub hoc signo Israel, 
	with its vengeance and transvaluation of all values, 
	has so far again and again triumphed over all other 
	ideals, over all nobler ideals. 


	But, Sir, why still speak of nobler ideals ? Let us 

	submit to the facts: the folk has conquered — or the 
	" slaves," or the "mob," or the "herd" or — call it what 
	you will! If this has come about through the Jews, 
	gdod ! then never a people had a more world-historic 
	mission. The " lords " are done away with ; the mo- 
	rality of the common man has triumphed. This vic- 
	tory may at the same time be regarded as an act of 
	blood-poisoning (it has jumbled the races together) — 
	I shall not object. But, beyond a doubt, the intoxica- 
	tion did succeed. The redemption of mankind (from 
	"the lords," to wit) is making excellent headway; 
	everything judaTses, christianises, or vulgarises in full 
	view (words are no matter!). The progress of this 
	poisoning, through the entire body of mankind, seems 
	irresistible ; the tempo and step of it may even be, from 
	now on, ever slower, finer, less audible, more cautious 
	— time is not wanting .... " With reference to this 
	I end has the church to-day still a necessary mission, or 
	even a right to existence ? Or could it be dispensed 
	with? Quaerititr.


Neitzche says Jewish hatred and plots started "slave revolt" and spread "slave morality", his least favorite thing, all over the world

blames them for Jesus and spreading christianity and poisoning the world



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Fraud or not, however, Nietzsche did have ideas about will and power expressed as a scattering of hints and remarks in his works.

	Spinks summarises will to be less of a deliberate effort than a force pervading all life, human and not, conscious and not, that seeks to dominate other life in an evolutionary sense.

	Spinks argues that Nietzsche regarded

	    … all life, not just human life, as united by a common striving for power. Human life (with all its truths and norms) is merely a form through which life passes. (p. 134.)


	    ...
    	… the aim of life is neither self-preservation nor moral and spiritual enlightenment but the increase of power and ‘the will to appropriate, dominate, increase, grow stronger’ (p. 137).


Neitzche said the definition of life is to get power, appropriate, dominate, grow stronger


https://plato.stanford.edu/entries/nietzsche/#PoweLife
	A well-known passage appears near the opening of the late work, The Antichrist:

	    What is good? Everything that heightens the feeling of power in man, the will to power, power itself.

	    What is bad? Everything that is born of weakness.

	    What is happiness? The feeling that power is growing, that resistance is overcome.

	    Not contentedness but more power; not peace but war; not virtue but fitness (Renaissance virtue, virtù, virtue that is moraline-free). (A 2)


	In the literature, claims of this sort are associated with a “will to power doctrine”, commonly viewed as one of Nietzsche’s central ideas (see section 6.1). That doctrine seems to include the proposal that creatures like us (or more broadly: all life, or even all things period) aim at the enhancement of their power—and then further, that this fact entails that enhanced power is good for us (or for everything).

	In the middle of the twentieth century, many readers (more or less casually) received this as a deeply unattractive, blunt claim that “Might makes right”, which they associated with disturbing social and political tendencies salient in the era (see, e.g., Beauvoir 1948: 72).


http://www.sparknotes.com/philosophy/nietzsche/themes/
	On one level, the will to power is a psychological insight: our fundamental drive is for power as realized in independence and dominance. This will is stronger than the will to survive, as martyrs willingly die for a cause if they feel that associating themselves with that cause gives them greater power, and it is stronger than the will to sex, as monks willingly renounce sex for the sake of a greater cause. While the will to power can manifest itself through violence and physical dominance, Nietzsche is more interested in the sublimated will to power, where people turn their will to power inward and pursue self-mastery rather than mastery over others. An Indian mystic, for instance, who submits himself to all sorts of physical deprivation gains profound self-control and spiritual depth, representing a more refined form of power than the power gained by the conquering barbarian.

	On a deeper level, the will to power explains the fundamental, changing aspect of reality. According to Nietzsche, everything is in flux, and there is no such thing as fixed being. Matter is always moving and changing, as are ideas, knowledge, truth, and everything else. The will to power is the fundamental engine of this change. For Nietzsche, the universe is primarily made up not of facts or things but rather of wills. The idea of the human soul or ego is just a grammatical fiction, according to Nietzsche. What we call “I” is really a chaotic jumble of competing wills, constantly struggling to overcome one another. Because change is a fundamental aspect of life, Nietzsche considers any point of view that takes reality to be fixed and objective, be it religious, scientific, or philosophical, as life denying. A truly life-affirming philosophy embraces change and recognizes in the will to power that change is the only constant in the world.


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	...	3. It must be noted that men with bad instincts are more in number than the good, and therefore the best results in governing them are attained by violence and terrorisation, and not by academic discussions. Every man aims at power, everyone would like to become a dictator if only he could, and rare indeed are the men who would not be willing to sacrifice the welfare of all for the sake of securing their own welfare.

	...Political freedom is an idea but not a fact. This idea one must know how to apply whenever it appears necessary with this bait of an idea to attract the masses of the people to one's party for the purpose of crushing another who is in authority. This task is rendered easier of the opponent has himself been infected with the idea of freedom, SO-CALLED LIBERALISM, and, for the sake of an idea, is willing to yield some of his power.

	...MIGHT IS RIGHT    

	12. Our right lies in force. The word "right" is an abstract thought and proved by nothing. The word means no more than: Give me what I want in order that thereby I may have a proof that I am stronger than you. 


I think Neitzsche is saying that people have competing "wills," like computions to do certain things (eat, sleep, fuck), and probably computions to act based on societal influences (which he wanted to overcome) like will to adhere to "slave morality," but the only will that matters is the will to power. For him "good" is getting more power and "bad" is weakness.



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Moreover:

    … knowledge is an effect of power rather than its precondition; we become ‘knowledgeable’ insofar as we possess the power to create a vision of reality and impose this vision upon others (p. 138).


spinks says Nietsche saw "knowledge" as an effect of power since power gives you ability to impose a vision of reality on others

I guess this goes with his idea that truth is subjective, "winners write history," etc.


	...Lessons in misdirection … ?

	It is difficult for me not to regard Nietzsche as trapping himself in his own cleverness. Almost everything he wrote to undermine conventional thinking as slavish reaction against more noble ideas could be regarded as no more than reaction in itself.


^^^


	...In the same vein, understanding Nietzsche assists in understanding the potential obfuscation of even recent history to suit the purposes of particular interest groups. This applies not just to general historiography, but particularly to those interpretations that associate Nietzsche with Nazi ideology. It might be an interesting topic for another discussion, but I see the importance in consideringthe ill-advised link between Nietzsche and the Nazis as arising from a seventy year fetish of constant reference back to the Nazi phenomenon that pervades Western culture so deeply we run the risk of understanding less about Nazi Germany today than we did in 1945.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Influence_and_reception_of_Friedrich_Nietzsche
	Regarding Hitler, for example, there is a debate. Some authors claim that he probably never read Nietzsche, or that if he did, his reading was not extensive.[9] Hitler more than likely became familiar with Nietzsche quotes during his time in Vienna when quotes by Nietzsche were frequently published in pan-German newspapers.[10] Nevertheless, others point to a quote in Hitler's Table Talk, where the dictator mentioned Nietzsche when he spoke about what he called "great men", as an indication that Hitler may have been familiarized with Nietzsche's work.[11] Other authors like Melendez (2001) point out to the parallels between Hitler's and Nietzsche's titanic anti-egalitarianism,[12] and the idea of the "übermensch",[13] a term which was frequently used by Hitler and Mussolini to refer to the so-called "Aryan race", or rather, its projected future after fascist engineering.[14] Alfred Rosenberg, an influential Nazi ideologist, also delivered a speech in which he related National Socialism to Nietzsche's ideology.[14][15]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Nazi_ideologues
	Alfred Baeumler (1887–1968), German philosopher in Nazi Germany. He was a leading interpreter of Friedrich Nietzsche's philosophy as legitimizing Nazism. Thomas Mann read Baeumler's work on Nietzsche in the early 1930s, and characterized passages of it as "Hitler prophecy."[1]

	Alfred Rosenberg (1893–1946), considered one of the main authors of key Nazi ideological creeds, including the racial policy of Nazi Germany, antisemitism, Lebensraum, abrogation of the Treaty of Versailles, and opposition to degenerate art. He is also known for his rejection of Christianity, while playing a role in the development of Positive Christianity. At Nuremberg he was tried, sentenced to death, and executed by hanging as a war criminal.[2]


https://archive.org/stream/TheMythOfTheTwentiethCentury/Myth_djvu.txt
	The Myth of the 20th Century 

	(Mythus des XX. Jahrhunderts) 
	An Evaluation of the Spiritual-Intellectual Confrontations of Our Age 

	by Alfred Rosenberg 

	...Around the turn of the 19th century we experienced the appearance of a great number of personalities who, with the blossoming of 
	our entire culture, marked that era with an unforgettable stamp. For a long time the era of the machine destroyed personality ideals as 
	well as powers, type forming. The milieu, the factory, became master. A concept of mixed causality triumphed over true science and 
	philosophy. Marxist sociology — through its mass delusion, quantity doctrine — strangled the concept of quality in research. The stock 
	exchange became the idol of the materialistic sickness of the times. 

	Nietzsche embodied the despairing cry of millions against the latter. His wild exclamations about the Superman were a violent 
	extension of his subjected personal life which had been strangled by the material pressure of the times. Now, at least one man suddenly 
	destroyed all values in fanatical rebellion. He raged wildly. A feeling of relief passed through the souls of all searching Europeans. That 
	Nietzsche became insane, is symbolic. An enormous blocked up will to creation forged a path like a storm flood. The same will, 
	inwardly broken long before, could no longer attain shape. An era, enslaved for generations, understood in its powerlessness only the 
	subjective side of the great will and vital experience of Friedrich Nietzsche. It falsified the deepest struggle for personality into a cry for 
	the unleashing of all instincts. 

	The Red standards then joined the banner of Nietzsche, and the nomadic wandering Marxist preachers — the sort of men whose 
	doctrine scarcely anyone else had unmasked with such derision as Nietzsche himself. In his name, racial pollution through Syrians and 
	Blacks was sanctified, although Nietzsche, in fact, strove for selective racial breeding. Nietzsche has fallen to the dreams of overheated 
	political whores, which is worse than falling into the hands of robbers. The German people heard only of a release from all bonds, 
	subjectivism, personality, and nothing about discipline and inward building up. Hear Nietzsche's beautiful words: 

	From the future come winds with secret beat of wings, and to sensitive ears comes good news. 

	These words represented an apprehension filled with longing in the midst of an insane world in which he, alongside Lagarde and 
	Wagner, lived as almost the only ones with foresight. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Nazi_ideologues
	Martin Heidegger (1889–1976), German philosopher who was politically involved with National Socialism. The relations between Martin Heidegger and Nazism remain controversial. He was a member of the Nazi party, he joined the NSDAP on May 1, 1933 three weeks after being appointed rector of the University of Freiburg. Heidegger resigned the rectorship one year later, in April 1934, but remained a member of the NSDAP until the end of World War II. His first act as rector was to eliminate all democratic structures, including those that had elected him rector. 


https://www.theparisreview.org/blog/2016/10/18/in-his-own-words/
	18th of December, 1931

	Dear Fritz, dear Liesl, dear boys,

	We would like to wish you a very merry Christmas. It is probably snowing where you are, inspiring the hope that Christmas will once again reveal its true magic. I often think back to the days before Christmas back at home in our little town, and I wish for the artistic energy to truly capture the mood, the splendor, the excitement and anticipation of this time.

	[…]

	It would appear that Germany is finally awakening, understanding and seizing its destiny.

	I hope that you will read Hitler’s book; its first few autobiographical chapters are weak. This man has a remarkable and sure political instinct, and he had it even while all of us were still in a haze, there is no way of denying that. The National Socialist movement will soon gain a wholly different force. It is not about mere party politics—it’s about the redemption or fall of Europe and western civilization. Anyone who does not get it deserves to be crushed by the chaos. Thinking about these things is no hindrance to the spirit of Christmas, but marks our return to the character and task of the Germans, which is to say to the place where this beautiful celebration originates.

	 

	13th of April, 1933

	Dear Fritz!  I would like to wish you and yours a very happy Easter!

	Thank you for your long letter. With each day that passes we see Hitler growing as a statesman. The world of our Volk and Reich is about to be transformed and everyone who has eyes with which to watch, ears with which to listen, and a heart to spur him into action will find himself captivated by genuine, deep excitement—once again, we are met with a great reality and with the pressure of having to build this reality into the spirit of the Reich and the secret mission of the German being […]

	 

	18th of August, 1941

	Dear Fritz, dear Liesel, dear Boys!  […] It is not Russianism that will bring about the destruction of the earth but Americanism, not just the English but all of Europe has fallen prey to it as it represents modernity in its monstrosity.

	 

	23rd of July, 1945

	Dear Fritz, dear Liesel, dear Franz!

	Thank you for your words. It is not very nice here. We have had to host people from the concentration camp. […] What the French intend to do is unclear. But it doesn’t seem as though they want to dispense with me. It is mostly the Center Party that is rallying against me, which all the theologians and all reasonable people are resisting. But everything is miserable and much worse than it was under the Nazis. I haven’t managed to do even an hour of work: the heat and the state of the city are bad for my heart; I can’t go out to the cottage. […]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Nazi_ideologues
	Although after the war he neither apologized nor publicly expressed regret for his involvement with his affiliation with Nazism,[4] in private he called it "the biggest stupidity of his life" (die größte Dummheit seines Lebens).[5]


https://www.quora.com/Did-Heidegger-accept-Nietzsches-teachings-on-the-will-to-power
	Heidegger blames Nietzsche for leading the Germans astray, and blames the philosophy of the will for creating this monstrosity. Moreover, Heidegger never apologizes or even mentions his involvement in the Nazi party after the fact.



author still in denial about Nietzsche

I guess they have to white-wash him a bit for their left-wing sociopaths 



https://medium.com/@PeterSStrempel/nietzsche-patron-saint-of-the-sociopaths-4d91b2178ec6
	Nietzsche’s thinking on genealogy, morality, truth, ressentiment, and nihilism are invaluable tools for critical analysis, particularly in checking one’s own cherished assumptions and prejudices; we might like to think we are all fair minded and have fewer biases than others, but the reality is that none of us are without prejudice. That word may have a bad connotations, but prejudice need to be no worse than ‘discernment’, even if it can be as bad as bigotry. What Nietzsche may remind us of is how to spot these tendencies in ourselves.

	Finally, Nietzsche has not lost his original power to serve as an example of misdirection — dressing up the lionisation of sociopathy as noble thinking pitted against slavish ressentiment. In an era of evangelists, motivational speakers, charismatic CEOs, bought and paid for politicians, mass marketing and surveillance, and idiot savant STEM specialists, recognising their corrosive effects on liberal democracy, liberty, freedom of speech, and self-determination seems increasingly important. That is, important if any value is attached to the democratic ideals of liberty and egalitarianism. Understanding Nietzsche’s work can be enormously useful in recognising such deceptions and the justifications presented for them.



------


Nietzsche rationalizing the worst tendencies in narcassistic sociopaths


habit of lying or speaking not to truth but always toward some goal; Nietzsche says "there is no truth," all "truth" has a motive, and "knowledge" is just your ability to impose your viewpoint on others

habit of using trusting people and stepping on them to get ahead; Nietzsche says this is good, they are weak you are strong, and this helps you get stronger

aggravated by neurotypicals pressuring them into acting morally; Nietzsche says morality is a plot by inferior "slaves" to hold back superior "nobles"

habit of being selfish and only acting for their self-interest; Nietzsche says the will to power is the only good

habit of thinking they are superior beings and looking down on people; Nietzsche says this is good since it inspires them to become ubermenchen

habit of not accepting law and seeing it as limiting them; Nietzsche says the law is just another tool for the benefit of a distinct group of people

habit of screwing people and those people getting angry at them; Nietzsche says this is because they are envious, looking for a scapegoat for their own problems, they are like lambs with a grudge against birds of prey

habit of being aggrevated when they are blamed; Nietzsche says there is no such thing as free will, which was merely invented by weak to blame and punish the strong

habit of not thinking about or respecting other people's rights; Nietzsche says rights are made up demands motivated by envy by weak of the strong



https://www.quora.com/What-did-Nietzsche-think-about-scientists-and-science
    Nietzsche’s highest goal is the instinctive life. The desire for domination. Not the longing for serene joy, but the
        hazard of action,
        the struggle, and through this,
        the buzz of ascendancy.



http://highexistence.com/friedrich-nietzsches-guide-to-conquering-your-existence/
	“Here the spirit becomes a lion who would conquer his freedom and be master in his own desert. Here he seeks out his last master: he wants to fight him and his last god; for ultimate victory he wants to fight with the great dragon. Who is the great dragon whom the spirit will no longer call lord and god? “Thou shalt” is the name of the great dragon. But the spirit of the lion says, “I will.” “Thou shalt” lies in his way, sparkling like gold, an animal covered with scaled; and on every scale shines a golden “thou shalt.” My brothers, why is there a need in the spirit for the lion? Why is not the beast of burden, which renounces and is reverent, enough? To create new values—that even the lion cannot do; but the creation of freedom for oneself for new creation—that is within the power of the lion. The creation of freedom for oneself and a sacred “No” even to duty—for that, my brothers, the lion is needed. To assume the right to new values—that is the most terrifying assumption for a reverent spirit that would bear much.”



https://www.killian.com/earl/ThusSpokeZarathustra.html
	There are feelings which want to kill the lonely; and if they do not succeed, well, then they themselves must die. But are you capable of this—to be a murderer?

	My brother, do you know the word "contempt" yet? And the agony of your justice—being just to those who despise you? You force many to relearn about you; they charge it bitterly against you. You came close to them and yet passed by: that they will never forgive. You pass over and beyond them: but the higher you ascend, the smaller you appear to the eye of envy. But most of all they hate those who fly. 



https://www.healthyplace.com/personality-disorders/malignant-self-love/excerpts-from-the-archives-of-the-narcissism-list-part-3/
	Such mood shifts cannot correlate to blood sugar levels which are cyclical in nature. It is possible to reduce the narcissist to a state of rage and depression AT ANY MOMENT, simply by employing the above "technique". He can be elated, even manic - and in a split second, following a narcissistic injury, depressed, sulking or rageful.

	The reverse is also true. The narcissist can be catapulted from the bleakest despair to utter mania (or at least to an increased and marked feeling of well being) by providing him with narcissistic supply (attention, adulation, etc.).


https://www.facebook.com/notes/after-narcissistic-abuse-there-is-light-life-love/23-defining-characteristics-of-narcissists/416153051803002/
	4) NARCISSISTIC EGO SUPPLY – Both the Covert and Overt Narcissist requires constant admiration and recognition from others. They will gather a following of needy or co-dependent followers and “sidekicks” who feed their narcissistic ego supplies by reminding them of how good they are, idealising them, putting them on a pedestal. The understated Covert Narcissist uses silence and looks to control their partners.


https://www.researchgate.net/publication/304341829_Master_of_puppets_How_narcissistic_ceos_construct_their_professional_worlds
	Master of puppets: How narcissistic ceos construct their professional worlds

	We explore how narcissistic CEOs address two powerful and conflicting needs: the need for acclaim and the need to dominate others. We argue that narcissistic CEOs address their need for acclaim by pursuing celebrity in the media and affiliating with high-status board members, and they address their need to dominate others by employing lower-status, younger, and less experienced top management team members who will be more deferential to and dependent on them.  


...


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1670-nietzsche
	In 1924, in Chicago, Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold were two brilliant teenagers intent on demonstrating their Nietzschean superiority over the masses. After some small property crimes, it was thought that a "perfect" major crime, committed without emotion or detection, would prove their status as Ubermensch. The murder of 14 year old Bobby Franks would be their vehicle.



http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1752-psychiatrictestimony
	On Richard Loeb:

	In my opinion, as a result of that examination, [Richard Loeb] was not suffering from any mental disease, either functional or structural, on May 21st, 1924, or on the date I examined him....[T]he stream of thought flowed without any interruption or any break from within. There was not a single remark made that was beside the point. The answer to every question was responsive. There was no irresponsive answer to any ques­tion. There was abundant evidence that the man. . . was perfectly ori­ented as to time, as to place, and as to his social relations.....Not only that, there was excellence of attention. . . . There was not a single evidence of any defect, any disorder, any lack of development, or any disease, and by disease I mean functional as well as structural.

	On Nathan Leopold:

	There was no evidence of any organic disease of the brain, as would have been revealed by the Argyll-Robertson pupil. . . . There was no evidence of any toxic mental condition resulting from any toxicity of the body, because the pulse and the tremors that would have been incidental thereto were absent at this examination.....[H]e showed remarkably close attention, detailed attention; he showed that he was perfectly oriented socially as well as with reference to time and space...[There were] none of the modifications of movement that come with certain mental disorders.


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1741-home
	A tragedy of three young lost lives, a dead fourteen-year-old victim and the imprisonment of two teenage killers, unfolded in Chicago in 1924. The murder trial of Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold that shocked the nation is best remembered decades later for the twelve-hour long plea of Clarence Darrow to save his young clients from the gallows. His summation, rambling and disorganized as it was at times, stands as one of the most eloquent attacks on the death penalty ever delivered in an American courtroom. Mixing poetry and prose, science and emotion, a world-weary cynicism and a dedication to his cause, hatred of bloodlust and love of man, Darrow takes his audience on an oratorical ride that would be unimaginable in a criminal trial today. Even without Darrow in his prime, the Leopold and Loeb trial has the elements to justify its billing as the first "trial of the century." It is not surprising that the public responded to a trial that involved the kidnapping and murder of a young boy from one of Chicago's most prominent families, a bizarre relationship between two promising scholars-turned-murderers, what the prosecutor called an "act of Providence" leading to the apprehension of the teenage defendants, dueling psychiatrists, and an experienced and sharp-tongued state's attorney bent on hanging the confessed killers in spite of their relative youth.


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1749-ownwords
	Leopold's Motive:

	My motive, so far as I can be said to have had one, was to please Dick. Just that--incredible as it sounds. I thought so much of the guy that I was willing to do anything--even commit murder--if he wanted it bad enough. And he wanted to do this--very badly indeed. For the commission of the crime itself, I had no enthusiasm. Instead, I had a feeling of deep repugnance.

	...On Loeb:

	You just couldn't figure the fellow out. Those quick alternations of mood, those sudden changes of mind. But then that was nothing compared to the real, fundamental contradiction in his character. Everybody went for the guy--and rightly so. There wasn't a sunnier, pleasanter, more likable fellow in the world. Why, I thought more of Dick than of all the rest of my friends put together. His charm was magnetic--maybe mesmeric is the better word. He could charm anybody he had a mind to. Lots of people who thought the world of him would be surprised to know his real thoughts about them. He looked down on nearly everybody. But they never knew it. And he was at home with everybody. College presidents or hobos, it was all the same to Dick. He fitted in with everybody, became instantly a charter member of any group. He blended with his environment as some moths and butterflies do. And all this he did so effortlessly. He seemed to have the inborn knack of making friends, of winning everyone's affection. I'd try deliberately to copy his mannerisms, to be consciously charming. I couldn't come close. More often than not I'd just alienate people, more so than if I hadn't made a conscious effort. But Dick didn't have to try. He just seemed able to push an imaginary button and turn on the charm. And he could be generous to a fault. But then there was that other side to him. In the crime, for instance, he didn't have a single scruple of any kind. He wasn't immoral; he was just plan amoral--unmoral, that is. Right and wrong didn't exist. He'd do anything--anything. And it was all a game to him. He reminded me of an eight-year-old all wrapped up in a game of cops and robbers. Dick, with his brilliant mind, with his sophistication! (Leopold, Life Plus Ninety-Nine Years) 

	...Remorse:

	Looking back from the vantage point of today, I cannot understand how my mind worked then. For I can recall no feeling then of remorse. Remorse did not come until later, much later. It did not begin to develop until I had been in prison for several years; it did not reach its full flood for perhaps ten years. Since then, for the past quarter century, remorse has been my constant companion. It is never out of my mind. Sometimes it overwhelms me completely, to the extent that I cannot think of anything else. 


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1746-leopoldconfession
	"Now, Nathan, I just want you to go on in your own way and tell us the story from the beginning, tell us the whole thing."

	When we planned a general thing of this sort was as long ago as last November I guess at least, and we started on the process of how to get the money, which was the most difficult problem. We had several dozen different plans, all of which were not so good for one reason or other. Finally we hit upon the plan of having money thrown from a moving train ...He was to get old, unmarked bills whose numbers were not in sequence, and these he was to place in a cigar box, securely tied, wrapped in white paper, the ends were to be sealed with sealing wax. The reason for this was to give the impression that the box would be delivered personally to a messenger of the real executives of the plan. 

	..."The next problem was getting the victim to kill. This was left undecided until the day we decided to pick the most likely-looking subject that came our way. The particular case happened to be Robert Franks. Richard was acquainted with Robert and asked him to come over to our car for a moment. This occurred near 49th and Ellis Avenue. Robert came over in the car, was introduced to me and Richard asked him if he did not want to help him."

	"Richard who?"

	"Richard Loeb. He replied no, but Richard said, well, come in a minute. I want to ask you about a certain tennis racket. After he had gotten in, I stepped on the gas, proceeded south on Ellis Avenue to 50th Street. In the meantime Richard asked Robert if he minded if we took him around the block, to which Robert said, no. As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose. The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat. Here he forced a cloth into his mouth. Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter. We proceeded out to Calumet Boulevard in Indiana, drove along this road that leads to Gary, being a rather deserted place. We even stopped to buy a couple of sandwiches and some drinks for supper."

	...We then proceeded north to 104th and Ewing Avenue from where I telephoned my folks telling them I should be a trifle late in arriving home. We drove to 47th and Woodlawn and from there I telephoned the Franks' home. I spoke to Mrs. Franks and told her that my name was George Johnson and that her boy had been kidnapped but was safe, and that further instructions would follow. In passing 55th Street we had mailed a special delivery letter which had been completed except for the address which I printed on it. After taking my aunt and uncle home I returned to my home and after my father had retired, Richard and I proceeded to his home where we burned the remaining clothes, hid the robe and washed the more obvious blood stains from the automobile. 

	...In the meantime I called the Franks' home and told Mr. Franks to proceed immediately to the drugstore at 1465 East 63rd Street and to wait at the easterly of the two public phone booths for a telephone call. I told him a Yellow cab would be at his door to take him. I repeated the number twice and he asked if he couldn't have a little more time, to which I replied no, it must be immediately. About the time I was phoning, Richard had returned from the train and we started out south intending to call the drugstore from Walgreen's store, 67th and Stony Island. We chanced to see a newspaper lying on the stand with headlines "Unidentified boy found in swamp." We deliberated a few moments as to what to do, Dick thinking that the game was up. 

	...Thursday, immediately after dinner, we drove the car to our garage and started to clean up the rest of the blood stains. Our Chauffeur, Sven Englund, noticed us and came out to help. Whereupon Richard told him it was merely some red wine which had been spilled."

	"Who did clean it up?"

	"Dick did most of it and I helped him."

	"Is there anything else you can think of at this time?"

	"No."

	"Your original plan when you were thinking it out as late as last November, Nathan, did you have anyone at that time that was to be the victim?"

	"Nobody in particular. We had considered Mr. Clarence Coleman, also Mr. Walter Baer, Walter Baer, Jr., as the victim and Clarence Coleman's son."

	"When was the plan finally effected whereby you considered the Franks boy?"

	"When we saw him on 49th by pure accident."

	"At that time were you waiting for someone else?"

	"We had been cruising around watching several groups of boys playing, waiting for somebody to start home."

	"You had been doing that for how long, Nathan?"

	"From about three o'clock in the evening until about five."

	"And you did not have any boys prior to that time?"

	"No."

	"This day in particular you stayed out with the idea in mind of getting the boy that day, is that it?"

	"Yes, sir."

	..."Had you ever rented a car there before?"

	"Yes, sir."

	"Under what name?"

	"The same."

	"When did you rent a car there?"

	"About three weeks previously."

	"And you used it for what purpose?"

	"Merely so we would have no difficulty in getting the car next time."

	..."You drove to a point which is south of the alley, south of 47th Street?"

	"Yes. I waited in the car."

	"On Ingleside?"

	"On Ingleside."

	"What is there, anything?"

	"Apartment buildings. I waited in the car there while Dick went through the alley to a place where he could either command a view of Harvard School, or if he saw any likely looking children he could start playing with them

	..."After you drove your aunt and uncle home in your car and came back what did you do in the house then? Richard Loeb was in the house?"

	"Went in and had a few drinks, sat and talked with Dad."

	"About what time was that?"

	"That must have been about eleven o'clock."

	"Then what did you do?"

	"Dad retired about eleven-thirty or twelve, and we had a few more drinks and left about one o'clock."

	"Did you play cards while you were there?"

	"Yes, sir, I think we played two games of casino for fun."

	"Well, what did you do after that?"

	"We went over to Dick's house with the clothes."


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"State your full name."

	"Richard Albert Loeb."

	"Where do you live, Mr. Loeb?"

	"5017 Ellis Avenue."

	"What is your occupation?"

	"Student."

	"Where are you a student?"

	"University of Chicago."

	"How old are you?"

	"Eighteen."

	"You know that you are in the office of the State's Attorney of Cook County?"

	"Yes, sir."

	"And you want to make a statement, of your own free will?"

	"Yes." 

	..."Where had you planned this kidnapping?"

	"You mean what?"

	"Where had you discussed it first?"

	"Oh I don't know.  I don't remember.  I don't remember when it first came up."

	"Well approximately how long before the 21st of May had you discussed it?"

	"Oh a month and a half or two months."

	"All right.  Go ahead."

	"It was broached, the plan was broached by Nathan Leopold, who suggested that as a means of having a great deal of excitement, together with getting quite a sum of money."

	"An adventure, as you would say?"

	"Yes.  We planned the thing quite carefully, every detail was planned.  His car --"

	..."Do you recall the words used in that note?  To the best of your recollection, what were they?"

	" 'Dear Sir; You no doubt know by this time that your son has been kidnaped.  Please follow our instructions carefully, and nothing will happen to him.  If you don't follow our instructions to the letter, you will never see your son again.'  Then there was a number 1, and 'Go down to the bank and get ten thousand dollars' -- no, that wasn't it, wait a minute.  The number 1 was; 'Do not communicate with the police; if you have already done so, please do not mention this letter.  Number 2.  Go down to the bank and get ten thousand dollars in old bills.  Be sure that the bills are old.'"

	..."Now you are down there on Ingleside Avenue, waiting for the kids to come out of the Harvard School?"

	"Yes, I walked over to the Harvard School to reconnoiter."

	"And that is about what time?"

	"Just about two thirty."

	"You are over there for the purpose of reconnoitering?"

	"Yes, sir."

	"Go ahead."

	"I talked to a fellow by the name of Seass."

	"Who is this man Seass?"

	"He is the tutor who takes out the children."

	"After classes?"

	"In the afternoon, to supervise their play.  I talked to him for a few moments, and then talked to a young boy by the name of --"

	"What did you talk to Seass about?"

	"I don't remember."

	"Then you talked with who else?"

	"With a little boy by the name of Levinson, John Levinson, whom I knew.  I just asked Levinson about his baseball game and so forth and so on.

	"I left the Harvard School, then, that is, I left -- pardon me, I left the back, the playground where I had been talking to Seass and Levinson, and went out in front of the Harvard School, where I met my little brother who attends that school.  I talked to him for a short time, and then Leopold came down Ellis Avenue on the west side of the street and whistled for me to come over.  We walked down the alley leading to Ingleside, same alley near which the car was parked, and [he] told me that there were some children playing on Ingleside Avenue that he thought may be possible prospects." 

	...Even from there, however, it was impossible to watch them very closely unless we showed ourselves, so we decided to go back to his car, drive over to his car and get a pair of bird glasses."

	"You mean field glasses?"

	"Well, yes, field glasses, and watch the children through the field glasses.

	..."We proceeded north on Ellis Avenue until we caught a glimpse of Robert Franks coming south on the west side of Ellis Avenue.  As we passed him, he was just coming across or past 48th Street.  We turned down 48th Street and turned the car around, Leopold getting into the back seat.  I drove the car, then, south on Ellis Avenue, parallel to where young Franks was, stopped the car, and while remaining in my seat, opened the front door and called to Franks that I would give him a ride home.  He said, no, he would just as soon walk, but I told him that I would like to talk with him about a tennis racket, so he got in the car.

	"We proceeded south on Ellis Avenue, turned east on 50th Street, and just after we turned off of Ellis Avenue, Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.  I believe he hit him several times, I do not know the exact number.  He began to bleed and was not entirely unconscious.  He was moaning.  I proceeded further east on 50th, and turned, I believe, at Dorchester.  At this point Leopold --"  

	..."We dragged the body out of the car, put the body in the road (robe) and carried it over to the culvert.  Leopold carried the feet, I carried the head.  We deposited the body near the culvert,and undressed the body completely.  Our original scheme had been to etherize the body to death."

	"Where did you pour the hydrochloric acid on him?"

	"Right there.  The scheme for etherizing him originated through Leopold, who evidently has some knowledge of such things, and he said that that would be the easiest way of putting him to death, and the least messy.  This, however, we found unnecessary, because the boy was quite dead when we took him there."

	...We debated then what we should do in view of the boy's body having been discovered.  I was not very anxious to go on with the matter; but Leopold persuaded me to go ahead with the thing.

	..."Yes.  I just want to say that I make no excuse, but that I am fully convinced that neither the idea nor the act would have occured to me, had it not been for the suggestion and stimulus of Leopold.  Furthermore, I do not believe I would have been capable of having killed Franks.

	"This statement is made of my own volition."

	..."Everything that he read there is true, is it?" Schoemaker asked.

	"Yes, sir."

	"I have some corrections," Leopold said.  "In the first place, the date as given by Mr. Loeb is about a month or two at the most before the crime took place.  As I remember it quite distinctly, we started planning this thing as early as November 1923. 



https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=1842&dat=19240628&id=TCEsAAAAIBAJ&sjid=pMcEAAAAIBAJ&pg=5730,6062073&hl=en

"moral insanity a new defense"


https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=1996&dat=19240606&id=a5siAAAAIBAJ&sjid=Xa0FAAAAIBAJ&pg=824,6377924&hl=en


"big challenge for darrow"



https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=2202&dat=19250625&id=lL0lAAAAIBAJ&sjid=fPsFAAAAIBAJ&pg=5264,3430791&hl=en

a judge from another state siting in on case made a statement trashing defense in press and bar complained.

I guess would have the effect of popularizing the case? and the defense in particular



http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/trial.html

Darrow's defense is weird, like he just wanted to make that speech (where did I read that?)

his defense was "Nietszche made them do it"


https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=1955&dat=19260508&id=858hAAAAIBAJ&sjid=7pkFAAAAIBAJ&pg=1898,1626049&hl=en


someone tried to bust Leopold out?

eventually someone did in a way, wrote a book said to have led to his release, then Leopold sued the author for libel (why?)

Leopold was a bit more suave than Loeb, press likes him more, and wikipedia

it is unknown from testimony which first attacked and which killed Franks, and their testmonies conflict. This article is written in the manner of a psycopath and takes the side of Leopold: https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/leopold-and-loebs-criminal-minds-996498/

In their confessions, Loeb's gives the impression he thought they were going to kidnap a kid for money, and that Leopold killing him was a surprise. Leopold doesn't give that impression.


what did they believe about Nietzsche, and how did it tie into their motive?

https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/leopold-and-loebs-criminal-minds-996498/
	The trial, Crowe quickly realized, would be a sensation. Nathan Leopold admitted they had murdered Bobby solely for the thrill of the experience. (“A thirst for knowledge is highly commendable, no matter what extreme pain or injury it may inflict upon others,” Leopold had told a newspaper reporter. “A 6-year-old-boy is justified in pulling the wings from a fly, if by so doing he learns that without wings the fly is helpless.”) The defendants’ wealth, their intellectual ability, the high regard within Chicago for their families and the capricious nature of the homicide—everything combined to make the crime one of the most intriguing murders in the history of Cook County.


https://books.google.com/books?id=zwhNDwAAQBAJ&pg=PA9&lpg=PA9&dq=Leopold+A+6-year-old-boy+is+justified+in+pulling+the+wings+from+a+fly,+if+by+so+doing+he+learns+that+without+wings+the+fly+is+helpless.&source=bl&ots=nuQ0nxHCpP&sig=XZIcupsj9jzzsLvk1KhBzLn0dzY&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwi9jZT_1v7ZAhUK2IMKHT6_BLEQ6AEIPDAC#v=onepage&q=Leopold%20A%206-year-old-boy%20is%20justified%20in%20pulling%20the%20wings%20from%20a%20fly%2C%20if%20by%20so%20doing%20he%20learns%20that%20without%20wings%20the%20fly%20is%20helpless.&f=false


"For the Thrill of It" pg 325:

	“I started out with him by asking him to tell me about the Franks
	murder. . . . He argued with me that for many years he has cultivated
	and adhered to a purely hedonistic philosophy that all action is justi-
	fied if it gives pleasure; that it was his ambition and has been for many
	years to become a perfect Nietzschean and to follow Nietzsche’s phi-
	losophy all the way through. . . . He told me of his attitude toward Loeb
	and of how completely he had put himself in the role of slave in connec-
	tion with him. He said, ‘I can illustrate it to you by saying that I felt
	myself less than the dust beneath his feet.’ . . . He told me of his abject
	devotion to Loeb, saying that he was jealous of the food and drink that
	Loeb took, because he could not come as close to him as did the food
	and drink. . . .


http://www.digitalhistory.uh.edu/disp_textbook.cfm?smtID=3&psid=1074
	Document: My motive, so far as I can be said to have had one, was to please Dick. Just that--incredible as it sounds. I thought so much of the guy that I was willing to do anything--even commit murder--if he wanted it bad enough. And he wanted to do this--very badly indeed. For the commission of the crime itself, I had no enthusiasm. Instead, I had a feeling of deep repugnance. (Leopold, Life Plus Ninety-Nine Years) 

	...On Richard Loeb: You just couldn't figure the fellow out. Those quick alternations of mood, those sudden changes of mind. But then that was nothing compared to the real, fundamental contradiction in his character. Everybody went for the guy--and rightly so. There wasn't a sunnier, pleasanter, more likable fellow in the world. Why, I thought more of Dick than of all the rest of my friends put together. His charm was magnetic--maybe mesmeric is the better word. He could charm anybody he had a mind to. Lots of people who thought the world of him would be surprised to know his real thoughts about them. He looked down on nearly everybody. But they never knew it. And he was at home with everybody. College presidents or hobos, it was all the same to Dick. He fitted in with everybody, became instantly a charter member of any group. He blended with his environment as some moths and butterflies do. And all this he did so effortlessly. He seemed to have the inborn knack of making friends, of winning everyone's affection. I'd try deliberately to copy his mannerisms, to be consciously charming. I couldn't come close. More often than not I'd just alienate people, more so than if I hadn't made a conscious effort. But Dick didn't have to try. He just seemed able to push an imaginary button and turn on the charm. And he could be generous to a fault. But then there was that other side to him. In the crime, for instance, he didn't have a single scruple of any kind. He wasn't immoral; he was just plan amoral--unmoral, that is. Right and wrong didn't exist. He'd do anything--anything. And it was all a game to him. He reminded me of an eight-year-old all wrapped up in a game of cops and robbers. Dick, with his brilliant mind, with his sophistication! (Leopold, Life Plus Ninety-Nine Years) 


what's up with Leopold Loeb relationship?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leopold_and_Loeb
	The pair began asserting their perceived immunity from normal restrictions with acts of petty theft and vandalism.[13] Breaking into a fraternity house at the university, they stole penknives, a camera, and a typewriter that they later used to type their ransom note. Emboldened, they progressed to a series of more serious crimes, including arson,[14] but no one seemed to notice. Disappointed with the absence of media coverage of their crimes, they decided to plan and execute a sensational "perfect crime" that would garner public attention, and confirm their self-proclaimed status as "supermen".[15]


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/96
	I have discussed somewhat in detail these two boys separately. Their coming together was the means of their undoing. Your Honor is familiar with the facts in reference to their association. They had a weird, almost impossible relationship. Leopold, with his obsession of the superman, had repeatedly said that Loeb was his idea of the superman. He had the attitude toward him that one has to his most devoted friend, or that a man has to a lover. Without the combination of these two, nothing of this sort probably could have happened. It is not necessary for us, your Honor, to rely upon words to prove the condition of these boys' minds, and to prove the effect of this strange and fatal relationship between these two boys.

	It is mostly told in a letter which the state itself introduced in this case. Not the whole story, but enough of it is shown, so that I take it that no intelligent, thoughtful person could fail to realize what was the relation between them and how they had played upon each other to effect their downfall and their ruin. I want to read this letter once more, a letter which was introduced by the state, a letter dated October 9th, a month and three days before their trip to Ann Arbor, and I want the court to say in his own mind whether this letter was anything but the products of a diseased mind, and if it does not show a relationship that was responsible for this terrible homicide. This was written by Leopold to Loeb. They lived close together, only a few blocks from each other; saw each other every day; but Leopold wrote him this letter:

	October 9,1923.

	Dear Dick:

	In view of our former relations, I take it for granted that it is unnecessary to make any excuse for writing you at this time, and still I am going to state my reasons for so doing, as this may turn out to be a long letter

	...First, I am enclosing the document which I mentioned to you today, and which I will explain later. Second, I am going to tell you of a new fact which has come up since our discussion. And third, I am going to put in writing what my attitude toward our present relations, with a view of avoiding future possible misunderstandings, and in the hope (though I think it rather vain) that possibly we may have misunderstood each other, and can yet clear this matter up.

	Now, as to the first, I wanted you this afternoon, and still want you, to feel that we are on an equal footing legally, and therefore, I purposely committed the same tort of which you were guilty, the only difference being that in your case the facts would be harder to prove than in mine, should I deny them. The enclosed document should secure you against changing my mind in admitting the facts, if the matter should come up, as it would prove to any court that they were true.


Leopold though both were in legal trouble but his worse if he (or either?) confessed. What is this document? is he blackmailing him? like to say if Loeb were to say anything they'd both go down.

something about checking their story with a third person, not sure exactly. Leopold says something he learned voids his apology for "breaking confidence" with Loeb


	...Now, as to the third, last, and most important question. When you came to my home this afternoon I expected either to break friendship with you or attempt to kill you unless you told me why you acted as you did yesterday.

	You did, however, tell me, and hence the question shifted to the fact that I would act as before if you persisted in thinking me treacherous, either in act (which you waived if Dick's opinion went with mine) or in intention.

	Now, I apprehend, though here I am not quite sure, that you said that you did not think me treacherous in intent, nor ever have, but that you considered me in the wrong and expected such a statement from me. This statement I unconditionally refused to make until such time as I may become convinced of its truth.

	However, the question of our relation I think must be in your hands (unless the above conceptions are mistaken), inasmuch as you have satisfied first one and then the other requirement, upon which I agreed to refrain from attempting to kill you or refusing to continue our friendship. Hence I have no reason not to continue to be on friendly terms with you, and would under ordinary conditions continue as before.

	...Now a word of advice. I do not wish to influence your decision either way, but I do want to warn you that in case you deem it advisable to discontinue our friendship, that in both our interests extreme care must be had. The motif of "A falling out of ————" would be sure to be popular, which is patently undesirable and forms an irksome but unavoidable bond between us.

	...Now, Dick, I am going to make a request to which I have perhaps no right, and yet which I dare to make also for "Auld Lang Syne." Will you, if not too inconvenient, let me know your answer (before I leave tomorrow) on the last count? This, to which I have no right, would greatly help my peace of mind in the next few days when it is most necessary to me. 


he was going to kill Loeb for some reason but I guess now wants to be friends and insists he didn't wrong him by being "treacherous". They came to some agreement including Leopold would stop trying to kill Loeb.

Darrow finishes reading letter and says:

	...nobody can interpret that letter excepting on the theory of a diseased mind, and with it goes this strange document which was referred to in the letter. "I, Nathan F. Leopold, Jr., being under no duress or compulsion, do hereby affirm and declare that on this, the 9th day of October, 1923, I for reasons of my own locked the door of the room in which I was with one Richard A. Loeb, with the intent of blocking his only feasible mode of egress, and that I further indicated my intention of applying physical force upon the person of the said Richard A. Loeb if necessary to carry out my design, to-wit, to block his only feasible mode of egress." There is nothing in this case, whether heard alone by the court or heard in public that can explain these documents, on the theory that the defendants were normal human beings.


how does this document "secure [Loeb] against changing [Leopold's] mind in admitting the facts, if the matter should come up, as it would prove to any court that they were true."?

the "facts" relate to a crime

letter makes it sound like a crime both committed, something "Dick Rubel" knew about, and Loeb was accusing Leopold of being "treacherous" in relation to these facts.

But all the document in court would do is incriminate Leopold, and I guess Darrow is using this to argue he is insane (but didn't plea insanity, which meant no jury trial and trial before one person)

Documents made up?



https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/101
	On October 10th, this is written by Leopold on the 20th Century train, the day after the other letter was written, and in it he says:

	"… now, that is all that is in point to our controversy."

	But I am going to add a little more in an effort to explain my system of the Nietzschean philosophy with regard to you.

	"It may not have occurred to you why a mere mistake in judgment on your part should be treated as a crime when on the part of another it should not be so considered. Here are the reasons. In formulating a superman he is, on account of certain superior qualities inherent in him, exempted from the ordinary laws which govern ordinary men. He is not liable for anything he may do, whereas others would be, except for the one crime that it is possible for him to commit—to make a mistake.


next day writing Loeb that his mistake is a crime because he is an ubermench (apparently this is the downside of being an ubermench, and it especially applies to Loeb)


	"Now obviously any code which conferred upon an individual or upon a group extraordinary privileges without also putting on him extraordinary responsibility, would be unfair and bad. Therefore, the superman is held to have committed a crime every time he errs in judgment—a mistake excusable in others. But you may say that you have previously made mistakes which I did not treat as crimes. This is true. To cite an example, the other night you expressed the opinion, and insisted, that Marcus Aurelius Antonius was practically the founder of Stoicism. In so doing you committed a crime. But it was a slight crime, and I chose to forgive it.


this is uncharacteristic of the disposition Leopold said publicly he had toward Loeb. Leopold is chastising him while at the same time trying to school him on philosophy.


	I have, and had before that, forgiven the crime which you committed in committing the error in judgment which caused the whole train of events. I did not and do not wish to charge you with crime, but I feel justified in using any of the consequences of your crime for which you are held responsible, to my advantage. This and only this I did, so you see how careful you must be."


again sounds like Leopold blackmailing Loeb


	Is that the letter of boys acting as boys should, and thinking as boys should, or is it the letter of one whose philosophy has taken possession of him, who understands that what the world calls a crime is something that the superman may do—who believes that the only crime the superman can commit is to make a mistake? He believed it. He was immature. It possessed him.



https://harpers.org/blog/2008/02/nietzsches-pale-criminal/
	Listen, judges! There is another lunacy, the one which precedes the deed. You have not dug deep enough into this soul! So spoke the red judge: “Why did this criminal commit murder? He meant to rob.” But I tell you, that his soul wanted blood, not the prize of theft: he thirsted for the happiness of the knife!

	But his poor reason understood not this madness, and it persuaded him. “What use is blood to you!” it said; “would you not at least take some plunder in the process? Or take revenge?” And he followed his weak reason: its words pressed upon him like lead—and so he robbed when he murdered. He did not wish to be ashamed of his madness.

	And now once more the lead of his guilt weighs upon him, and once more is his weak reason so brittle, so paralyzed, and so heavy. If he could shake his head, then his burden would roll off; but who could shake this head?

	What is this man? A mass of diseases that reach out into the world through the spirit; there they seek their quarry. What is this man? A coil of wild serpents that are seldom at peace among themselves–so each goes forth separately and seeks its quarry in the world.

	Look at that poor body! What it suffered and craved, the poor soul interpreted for itself–it interpreted it as murderous desire, and a craving for the happiness of the knife.

	—Friedrich Nietzsche, Also sprach Zarathustra: Ein Buch für Alle und Keinen, “Die Reden Zarathustras,” ch. 6 (1883) in: Werke in drei Bänden, vol. 2, pp. 304-05 (K. Schlechta ed. 1973)(S.H. transl.)


https://www.reddit.com/r/Nietzsche/comments/7bfrfr/what_is_the_pale_criminal_about/
	What is "The Pale Criminal" about?

	...Oh that was a really interesting passage from the Zarathustra. It's again an attack to morals: the instinct of the criminal is to kill, but the morals say "That's a sin!", thus the criminal feels shame about his action: that's a wide metaphor to say that "man feels shame of his nature", that is why Christianity is always condemned by Nietzsche for its being anti-nature. Sex is vilified, the body is condemned, the instincts repressed, all the natural phenomena are now seen behind a moral perspective - that is what Christianity has done in the past 2000 years and now men is shame about his own nature and instincts. The man (this "pale criminal", because for Christianity is a criminal, as he was born sinner) who satisfies his unconscious desires, who acts because of his instincts, doesn't enjoy anymore what he does, instead now he feels shame, and this is what Christianity has led to. And now man has to justify himself if he wants to enjoy his nature:

	    And he listened to his weak reason: like lead lay its words upon him - thereupon he robbed when he murdered.

	The criminal wanted to murder, but his weak reason (morality) told him also to rob, to give sense to his murder, to justify it, because:

	    He did not mean to be ashamed of his madness


https://www.gutenberg.org/files/52263/52263-h/52263-h.htm
	To judge from his origin, Socrates belonged to the lowest of the low: Socrates was mob. You know, and you can still see it for yourself, how ugly[Pg 11] he was. But ugliness, which in itself is an objection, was almost a refutation among the Greeks. Was Socrates really a Greek? Ugliness is not infrequently the expression of thwarted development, or of development arrested by crossing. In other cases it appears as a decadent development. The anthropologists among the criminal specialists declare that I the typical criminal is ugly: monstrum in fronte, monstrum in animo. But the criminal is a decadent?[1] Was Socrates a typical criminal?

	...[1] It should be borne in mind that Nietzsche recognised two types of criminals,—the criminal from strength, and the criminal from weakness. This passage alludes to the latter, Aphorism 45, p. 103,** alludes to the former.—TR.

	...45

	The criminal and his like.—The criminal type is the type of the strong man amid unfavourable conditions, a strong man made sick. He lacks the wild and savage state, a form of nature and existence which is freer and more dangerous, in which everything that constitutes the shield and the sword in[Pg 104] the instinct of the strong man, takes a place by right. Society puts a ban upon his virtues; the most spirited instincts inherent in him immediately become involved with the depressing passions, with suspicion, fear and dishonour. But this is almost the recipe for physiological degeneration. When a man has to do that which he is best suited to do, which he is most fond of doing, not only clandestinely, but also with long suspense, caution and ruse, he becomes anæmic; and inasmuch as he is always having to pay for his instincts in the form of danger, persecution and fatalities, even his feelings begin to turn against these instincts—he begins to regard them as fatal. It is society, our tame, mediocre, castrated society, in which an untutored son of nature who comes to us from his mountains or from his adventures at sea, must necessarily degenerate into a criminal. Or almost necessarily: for there are cases in which such a man shows himself to be stronger than society: the Corsican Napoleon is the most celebrated case of this. Concerning the problem before us, Dostoiewsky's testimony is of importance—Dostoiewsky who, incidentally, was the only psychologist from whom I had anything to learn: he belongs to the happiest windfalls of my life, happier even than the discovery of Stendhal. This profound man, who was right ten times over in esteeming the superficial Germans low, found the Siberian convicts among whom he lived for many years,—those thoroughly hopeless criminals for whom no road back to society stood open—very different from what even he had expected,—that is to say carved from about the best, hardest and most[Pg 105] valuable material that grows on Russian soil.[7] Let us generalise the case of the criminal; let us imagine creatures who for some reason or other fail to meet with public approval, who know that they are regarded neither as beneficent nor useful,—the feeling of the Chandala, who are aware that they are not looked upon as equal, but as proscribed, unworthy, polluted. The thoughts and actions of all such natures are tainted with a subterranean mouldiness; everything in them is of a paler hue than in those on whose existence the sun shines.


Darrow's defense doesn't work--Leopold summed Neitszche's ideas accuratly, Neitszche believed them and he was like 40 at the time.

Darrow is right that they aren't normal, but he can't say they weren't rational (does he try to? he hints at that). But everything they did was rational and planned out, and has a logic to it as laid out by Neitszche which Leopold demonstrated he understood. Leopold thought it would be fun to kill someone, had a rational plan to carry that out, and carried out that plan.

Darrow's defense after this said they had a "failure of emotional life."


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/108
	The most they said was that at this time they saw no evidence of insanity.

	Now, your Honor, no experts, and no alienists with any chance to examine, have testified that these boys were normal.


"they aren't insane but they aren't normal"

could Darrow have had a better argument?

goes on to trash the psychologists


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/111
	I think all of it shows that this terrible act was the act of immature and diseased brains, the act of children.

	Nobody can explain it in any other way.

	No one can imagine it in any other way.


Would Neitszche had done the same if he were sure he could get away with it?

everything Darrow says is here is true, but so what?


	...It is not possible that it could have happened in any other way. And, I submit, your Honor, that by every law of humanity, by every law of justice, by every feeling of righteousness, by every instinct of pity, mercy and charity, your Honor should say that because of the condition of these boys' minds, it would be monstrous to visit upon them the vengeance that is asked by the State.


similar to Neitzche, saying law is vengeance instead of justice


	...Ninety poor unfortunate men have given up their lives to stop murder in Chicago. Ninety men have been hanged by the neck until dead, because of the ancient superstition that in some way hanging one man keeps another from committing a crime. The ancient superstition, I say, because I defy the state to point to a criminologist, a scientist, a student, who has ever said it. Still we go on, as if human conduct was not influenced and controlled by natural laws the same as all the rest of the Universe is the subject of law. We treat crime as if it had no cause. We go on saying, "Hang the unfortunates, and it will end." Was there ever a murder without a cause? Was there ever a crime without a caused And yet all punishment proceeds upon the theory that there is no cause; and the only way to treat crime is to intimidate every one into goodness and obedience to law.


this is a big problem with all this

the "external cause" of the crime is Neitzche's philosophy

the greater the extent they get away with it, the more that philosophy is justified. If they get away with murder it proves to them that their ideology is true.


https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=1842&dat=19240628&id=TCEsAAAAIBAJ&sjid=pMcEAAAAIBAJ&pg=5730,6062073&hl=en
	June 28, 1924

	NEW MURDER DEFENSE

	"MORAL INSANITY" is to be the main defense of Leopold and Loeb, those young Chicago murderers, and it sounds new and interest. "Emotional insanity," "Temporary aberation" and similar ingenuities of criminal lawyers have become a bit worn. They fail to gull juries as they used to.

	It is to be supposed that the reaction to "moral insanity" is "immoral insanity," and that the layers can make a strong defense with either.

	At first though, "moral insanity" in youth must be due to faulty home invironment, luxurious upbrining and parental carelessness. This would put a very considerable part of the responsibility for the cold-blooded murder of the boy Franks upon the parents of Loeb and Leopold.

	In the trial of Guiteau, assassin of President Garfield, "emotional insanity" figured as a defense, and the prosecution presented the decision of Judge Robert F. Paine of the Cuyaboga county (Ohio) bench, to the effect that such "insanity" was the result of a continued process, a sort of self-education, and could not be admitted as an excuse for criminal acts.

	Morals are determined, very largely, by the home life and parental direction, so that it would seem that the Chicago lawyers are, indirectly pleading guilty for the parents of the prisoners whose lives are at stake, with their "moral insanity" defense.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/103
	Is that the letter of a normal eighteen-year-old boy, or is it the letter of a diseased brain?

	...Out of that compact and out of these diseased minds grew this terrible crime.

	Tell me, was this compact the act of normal boys, of boys who think and fell as boys should—boys who have the thoughts and emotions and physical life that boys should have? There is nothing in all of it that corresponds with normal life. There is a weird, strange, unnatural disease in all of it which is responsible for this deed.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/108
	...The most they said was that at this time they saw no evidence of insanity.

	Now, your Honor, no experts, and no alienists with any chance to examine, have testified that these boys were normal.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/110
	...Each one of these psychiatrists tells this court the story, the sad, pitiful story, of the unfortunate minds of these two young lads.




https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/112
	...It never occurs to the lawyer that crime has a cause as certainly as disease, and that the way to rationally treat any abnormal condition is to remove the cause.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/111
	Now, your Honor, I shall pass that subject. I think all of the facts of this extraordinary case, all of the testimony of the alienists, all that your Honor has seen and heard, all their friends and acquaintances who have come here to enlighten this court—I think all of it shows that this terrible act was the act of immature and diseased brains, the act of children.

	Nobody can explain it in any other way.

	No one can imagine it in any other way.

	It is not possible that it could have happened in any other way. And, I submit, your Honor, that by every law of humanity, by every law of justice, by every feeling of righteousness, by every instinct of pity, mercy and charity, your Honor should say that because of the condition of these boys' minds, it would be monstrous to visit upon them the vengeance that is asked by the State.

	I want to discuss now another thing which this court must consider and which to my mind is absolutely conclusive in this case. That is, the age of these boys.


	...We have raised the age of hanging. We have raised it by the humanity of courts, by the understanding of courts, by the progress in science which at last is reaching the law; and in ninety men hanged in Illinois from its beginning, not one single person under twenty-three was ever hanged upon a plea of guilty—not one. If your Honor should do this, you would violate every precedent that had been set in Illinois for almost a century. There can be no excuse for it, and no justification for it, because this is the policy of the law which is rooted in the feelings of humanity, which are deep in every human being that thinks and feels.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/116
	Your Honor, what excuse could you possibly have for putting these boys to death'? You would have to turn your back on every precedent of the past. You would have to turn your back on the progress of the world. You would have to ignore all human sentiment and feeling, of which I know the court has his full share. You would have to do all this if you would hang boys of eighteen and nineteen years of age who have come into this court and thrown themselves upon your mercy.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/120
	Your Honor, if in this court a boy of eighteen and a boy of nineteen should be hanged on a plea of guilty, in violation of every precedent of the past, in violation of the policy of the law to take care of the young, in violation of all the progress that has been made and of the humanity that has been shown in the care of the young; in violation of the law that places boys in reformatories instead of prisons,—if your Honor in violation of all that and in the face of all the past should stand here in Chicago alone to hang a boy on a plea of guilty, then we are turning our faces backward toward the barbarism which once possessed the world.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/125
	...All I can hope and wish is that some good may come from it all. But as compared with the families of Leopold and Loeb, the Franks are to be envied—and everyone knows it.

	I do not know how much salvage there is in these two boys. I hate to say it in their presence, but what is there to look forward to? I do not know but what your Honor would be merciful if you tied a rope around their necks and let them die; merciful to them, but not merciful to civilization, and not merciful to those who would be left behind.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Page:The_plea_of_Clarence_Darrow,_August_22nd,_23rd_%26_25th,_MCMXXIII,_in_defense_of_Richard_Loeb_and_Nathan_Leopold,_Jr.,_on_trial_for_murder.djvu/126
	...I am sure of this; that I will not be here to help them. So far as I am concerned, it is over.

	I would not tell this court that I do not hope that some time, when life and age have changed their bodies, as it does, and has changed their emotions, as it does,—that they may once more return to life. I would be the last person on earth to close the door of hope to any human being that lives


https://highschoolbioethics.georgetown.edu/units/cases/unit1_1.html
	1. BABY BOLLINGER
	In 1915, just before Thanksgiving, a baby was born without a neck, with only one ear, with a misshapen chest and misshapen shoulders, and with serious internal malformations. The doctor who delivered the baby at Chicago's German-American Hospital called in Dr. Harry Haiselden, a surgeon, to examine the baby. Haiselden concluded that this "defective" baby's life would not be worth saving. He convinced the parents, Anna and Allen Bollinger, to let their son die rather than embark on a series of operations to repair some of the baby's physical deformities.

	This was the Bollingers' fourth child. The other three were healthy. Haiselden told the Bollingers, among other things, that the baby would "be an imbecile and possibly criminal." The Bollingers' son died when he was six days old.


https://books.google.com/books?id=CNigO7gMGkUC&pg=PA74&lpg=PA74
	One thing the Baby Bollinger story proved was that Haiselden's views about euthanasia were not unique. The well-known American lawyer Clarance Darrow, future defense attorney during the Scopes "Monkey" Trial of 1924, agreed wholeheartedly with Haiselden. When asked his opinion of the Baby Bollinger controversy, Darrow answered acerbically: "Chloroform unfit children. Show them the same mercy that is shown beasts that are not longer fit to live." Blind and deaf advocate Helen Keller added: "Our puny sentimentalism has caused us to forget that a human life is sacred only when it may be of some use to itself and to the world."


It's a joke

Darrow didn't believe what he was saying in the Leopold and Loeb case, so what does he believe?



https://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:688vrZ32dbQJ:https://uncommondescent.com/intelligent-design/clarence-darrow-on-rape-and-chloroforming-the-unfit-jerry-coynes-strange-choice-of-heroes/+&cd=3&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us&client=firefox-b-1-ab

https://books.google.com/books?id=DwwqAgdREKoC&pg=PA35&lpg=PA35&dq=%22Chloroform+unfit+children.+Show+them+the+same+mercy+that+is+shown+beasts+that+are+no+longer+fit+to+live.%22&source=bl&ots=g4FL4Yu_Fh&sig=M91Mh6U932FDqlVhcZo-JVEnqVE&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiY8aSCg__ZAhVFKqwKHQQbAm8Q6AEILzAB#v=onepage&q=%22Chloroform%20unfit%20children.%20Show%20them%20the%20same%20mercy%20that%20is%20shown%20beasts%20that%20are%20no%20longer%20fit%20to%20live.%22&f=false

"serving the intelligent design community" site and Neil Gorsuch on the Darrow (maybe some messengers that could overwhelm the message...)


https://books.google.com/books?id=CNigO7gMGkUC&pg=PA74&lpg=PA74
	...The Baby Bollinger story stands out as an early example of what would happen with greaty frequency as the twentieth century progressed. Later activists would attempt to promote euthanasia by going public about their unconventional views and actions. Militants hoped that openly defying conventional beliefs about euthanasia would stimulate debate and break down resistance to their cause. Haiselden knew that the dilemma faced by the baby's parents made for a heartrending human-interest story that would personalize the issue of euthanasia. Yet he also borrowed a strategy popularized by anarchists of his day: "propaganda of the deed," committing a bold act in the hopes of prodding others to take a radical position. As Haiselden explained, eugenics had "a million theories, each theory with ardent backers....But it lacked drive." Haiselden concluded that "the times were crying to some one central deed--some decisive action that would draw together all these theories and beginnings of things into one definite crusade."

	In the early twentieth century, however, there was little public support for mercy killing of the disabled. Haiselden enjoyed the backing of people such as Clarance Darrow, Helen Keller, birth-control advocate William J. Robinson, sex-reformer Mary Ware Dennet, the editorial board of the new Republic, novelist Jack London, and Eugene V. Debs, the socialist candidate for the U.S. presidency in 1912. But there was little prospect of legislative, pro-euthanasia victories in any state or country, a sign that there was minimal popular backing for such reform. Whatever headlines Haiselden had managed to capture in 1915, America's entry into World War I in 1917 bumped him off the front pages of the nation's newspapers. In 1919, he died forgotten in Cuba, conducting genetic experiments and still chasing his eugenic dreams.


brings to mind the campaign to support assisted suicide today, commonality being both would allow opportunities to kill innocent people


http://iroquois-theater-fire.blogspot.com/
	 On December 30, 1903, the new Iroquois Theater in Chicago burned taking the lives of more than 600 theatergoers. The construction of this building, called “absolutely fireproof”[1] by W. A. Merriam, the construction manager, lacked numerous fire safety devices and blatantly disregarded the safety of its occupants. While the fire may have been unpredictable, proper fire safety could have prevented the ensuing disaster once called “the greatest disaster in her (Chicago’s) history for a generation.”[2]

	 ...Corruption and vice filled the metropolis during the first quarter of the twentieth century. Writer Nat Brandt stated that “despite all the excitement about the city’s phenomenal growth and economic health, Chicago remained a city of corruption, built as much by greed as it was by steel and cement.”[3] Chicago construction companies remained infamous for the poor quality of their theater construction and for cutting corners at every opportunity. The construction of the Iroquois Theater remained “a matter of business-as-usual.”[4]  

	 ...The theater overflowed with an audience of more than 2,000 people consisting mostly of women and children. The New York Times reported that “Only once a year could such an audience have gathered; only once in all twelve months could so many children have been collected within the walls of the theater.”[8] Shortly after the beginning of the second act, around 2:30 in the afternoon, an arc light sparked and set the stage for one of the worst preventable disasters in Chicago’s history.

	The light, located above the stage had a large covering over the bulb yet exposed wires for mobility. The wires sparked and caught the muslin draperies on fire while the lighting technician had wandered away from his post. Some audience members noticed the small blaze yet most remained calm and unperturbed or simply unaware. Stagehands attempted to put out the flames quickly by batting at them with bare hands and throwing Kilfyre, a primitive fire extinguishing device, onto them. Despite the crew’s best efforts, the fire spread as flaming drapery fell onto combustible scenery on the stage floor. As the smoke and flames eventually poured into the front of the theater, the entire audience finally took notice of the danger. On stage, Foy came forward in an effort to calm the crowd and to facilitate a safer exit. After handing his son, who had attended the show, to another stagehand in the process of exiting the building to the rear of the stage, Foy addressed the audience. He later remembered his speech, “[I] ran out on the footlights to the audience. When I did they were in a sort of panic, as I thought, and what I said exactly I don't remember, but this was the substance my idea was to get the curtain down and quietly stop the stampede.”[9] The builders had equipped the theater with a fire-retardant asbestos curtain which operators could lower between the stage and the audience in order to block the spread of the flames. Foy remembered that he yelled, “‘Drop the curtain and keep up your music.’ I didn't want a stampede, because it was the biggest audience I ever played to of women and children.”[10] Foy instructed the stagehands to drop the curtain while commanding orchestra conductor Herbert Dillea to keep playing so as to pacify the crowd. Foy remained on stage expecting the curtain to fall behind him yet to his dismay, the curtain snagged on the right side of the stage and therefore neither side could descend to the floor. Foy requested that everyone “Don't get excited…Sit down; it is all right; don't get excited.”[11] Numerous audience members now started to leave while many obediently sat in their seats as Foy had requested of them. The actor then looked toward the curtain to find out why it had not come down. Upon inspection, the curtain “was blocked in its descent by a steel reflector”[12] and had begun to burn on the edges. As more of the stage burned and groups of people started to converge on the exits, Foy, and the last of the orchestra members, made a quick exit. Shortly after Foy’s departure, a stagehand got the double doors used to remove scenery open. This large door, the second stage door opened, let in the eight degree Chicago wind which fueled the growing fire and initiated a vortex of smoke and fire which sped straight towards the front of the theater.

	Marshall had studied fire safety before designing the Iroquois and had recommended the appropriate security measures. His plans included a glass skylight with vents that in the instance of a fire would remove the resulting poisonous gases and act as a flue and draw the flames upward. He also provided vents behind the dress circle on the mezzanine and behind the gallery seating. The owners had installed both of these safety precautions yet had not had the workers remove the wiring from the skylight vents which had kept them closed and secure during transport to the theater. The skylight therefore, did not open but instead, in conjunction with the vents in the audience, to create a cyclone of air which carried the fire, the smoke, and the gases under the curtain and over the orchestra level parquet seating into the faces of those in the balconies. Those caught directly in the way of the burning air died instantly of asphyxiation while others survived long enough to make it to the exits and have some hope of survival. Brandt noted:
		"The sudden draft was so unexpected that many people were caught in their seats and asphyxiated. Those who had abandoned their seats before then, searching for a way out, were gasping, their throats on fire, their hair and clothing singed or burning. Panicking, many could not find a way to escape. Those who managed to make it to a stairway found themselves caught in a human traffic snarl. Hundreds died."[13]
	At this point, directly after the fire had instantaneously spread into the theater front, the horror began.

	The burning deaths now occurred as the fire raged in the seats while audience members trampled each other in a rush for exits now only lit by raging flames. By this point, most of the actors, stagehands, and people in the parquet had gotten out of the theater and into the blistering cold of the Chicago streets. Those still left inside in the upper levels would make up the bulk of the death toll. Most of these men, women, and children ran for the exits the way they had entered the theater while a few fortunate others found the numerous fire exits on the north wall of the building. Powers and Davis had covered these doors with drapery in order to better the appearance of the new construction and later claimed that they had ordered exit signs which never arrived. Most of the people inside the inferno had no idea that these exits even existed. Those who did find the doors found them locked with a foreign device which they could not figure out. The owners had locked the fire exits with European bascule locks, “a device popular in European theaters but virtually never used in American playhouses and totally unknown in Chicago theaters.”[14] Only one person, an usher, knew how to work the locks and he had only found out himself out of curiosity. A few of the men were able to rip the entire locking mechanism off of the doors and force them open but the majority of the doors remained closed and ineffectual. Those who fled to the staircases through which they entered the theater found these walkways blocked by accordion gates and padlocked. The owners locked these gates in order to prevent those who had bought cheap tickets from sneaking down into the expensive seats. The unfortunate people who reached these gates found themselves crushed up against the blockades by panicking theatergoers. The fleeing people trampled women and children as they climbed over each other to get away from the spreading flames and gathering poison gas. Some of the men found themselves able to climb over the doors but remained unable to help the others inside who literally began dropping dead from asphyxiation and in some cases, burning alive. 

	...When firefighters arrived at the Iroquois, they encountered throngs of people crushing against the glass lobby doors. Upon further inspection, the firemen found three out of four of the doors locked. They broke through the glass and allowed the crowd to move into the street as they passed through to get inside the playhouse. They later found out that the owners had locked the doors to keep people from sneaking in while the staff sold tickets to latecomers. This action ended up affecting the outflow of victims fleeing the fire and creating a bottleneck where the crowd gathered and crushed people against the doors. Fire Chief William H. Musham later commented, “It seems to me that there is nothing in the world, at least nothing that I can think of at the present moment, that can save lives when a thousand persons try to pass through one doorway at one time.”[16] After the firefighters got the doors opened, they entered the horror of the theater. Despite saving a few stragglers who somehow survived the ordeal, most only to die later of inhalation and their burn injuries, the firefighters worked primarily to remove the bodies of the dead. They found piles of bodies at each gate sometimes seven or more deep. ... It soon became clear that the fire had doomed a majority of the survivors due to inhalation and the bodies on the back wall of the restaurant piled up. As the body count grew, so did public resentment.

	The fire had not had a day to cool before relatives of those lost came looking for blood. Brandt stated that “One thing was clear. Justice demanded that someone or some persons had to be held accountable for the tragedy.”[18] Those who thought themselves in the crosshairs attempted to shift the blame by throwing accusations at others. “Charges and countercharges flew back and forth to such a degree that it was impossible to pinpoint any single culprit. Everyone put the blame on someone or something else. No one accepted responsibility.”[19] Coroner John Traeger led a jury of six businessmen to investigate the fire. A grand jury would also have to look into the matter. The police quickly arrested three members of the Iroquois staff, including stage manager William Carleton. The searched for twenty-six others from Iroquois carpenters to managers, “charged with being accessories to manslaughter.”[20] These men “had packed their trunks and would have been out of the city had not the police arrested them.”[21] Even corrupt Mayor Harrison commissioned an investigatory committee to investigate the incident. The coroner’s jury stated that it would not recommend punishment for anyone but leave that up to the state attorney’s investigation. The jurors did recommend the arrest of Iroquois owner Will Davis, Building Commissioner George Williams, Building Inspector Edward Laughlin, Fire Chief William Musham, Iroquois fireman William Sallers, stage manager James E. Cummings, and the arc light operator William McMullen. They recommended that the state charge these men with manslaughter for negligence. They also thought that Mayor Harrison should be held responsible for “a lamentable lack of force”[22] in seeing to the city ordinances implemented. A judge quickly threw out the charges against Davis, Powers, and Williams which brought criticism and suspicion from the city and its enraged inhabitants. The judge also questioned the responsibility of Cummings and McMullen to keep the entire building up to the city’s fire code. The grand jury held its session to much anticipation from Chicagoans. It indicted five people including Will Davis, Iroquois treasurer and assistant manager Thomas J. Noonan, and stage manager James E. Cummings for manslaughter. The grand jury indicted Building Commissioner Williams and Building Inspector Edward Laughlin for malfeasance. They intended to start the trials right away. 

	During the proceedings, the defense proved almost a conspiracy. The defense team came up with an infuriatingly endless series of delays before finally proposed a motion for a change of venue. The fair share of the brilliance that the defense exhibited in the trials belonged to the legendary labor attorney Clarence Darrow. Darrow “mistrusted the public’s desire to find a scapegoat…he believed that it was not ‘just to lay the sins of a generation upon the shoulders of a few.’”[23] While not personally appearing in court, he came up with an astonishing defense strategy. He knew that by changing the venue for Noonan and Cummings but not Davis, they would be tried separately and much of the evidence of negligence could not be brought against Davis since it might prejudice the second trial. Davis’ trial finally commenced in Danville, Illinois in March of 1907, three years after the fire. The newly hired legal counsel Levy Mayer waited until shortly after the prosecution’s opening statement before objecting to the entire proceedings based on the invalidity of Chicago’s ordinances. He justified his objection with a damage suit in which he had helped represent the defense in November of 1905. In this case, the court ruled the city’s ordinances invalid because its writers had worded them incorrectly. Judge E. R. E. Kimbrough suspended the proceedings for a week while Mayer and the prosecuting attorneys discussed the matter. The judge finally ruled in favor of the defense and therefore defeated the charges against the other defendants since their trials involved the same ordinances. Since the trial had started, the state could not indict Davis again on the same charges as this would constitute double jeopardy. “As a result, implausible as it seems, no one was ever tried, no one ever punished, for the loss of 602 lives,”[24] wrote Brandt. 

	The civil suits proved just as strange. The judges ruled that the city of Chicago could not be held responsible for every disaster that takes place within its limits. The courts held the George H. Fuller Company solely reliable and the company settled five years after the initial disaster for $750 for each claim. These parties originally sued for $10,000 each but the company only had to pay out $29,750 in the end. Writer Anthony P. Hatch stated, “It is impossible to know if, or how, those cases were settled, because many were apparently dismissed for technical reasons or because lawyers whose compensation was based on a successful outcome did not believe the effort was worth their time

	...In the end, 602 people perished due to the fire at the Iroquois Theater on December 30, 1903. The courts punished no one and only the construction company ever had to pay a cent to the victims’ families. On the other hand, the residents of the city came together in the face of the disaster and helped their fellow Chicagoans. The city revolutionized their fire-prevention ordinances and gained a healthy respect for the hazard. The Iroquois Theater fire had a profound and lasting effect upon Chicago as well as the rest of the nation. The Architect Marshall stated, “I’ll never allow another theatre to be built with a stick of wood in it.”[26] Many of the ordinances still exist or set the precedence for many of today’s fire-prevention regulations. As time goes on, the people of Chicago have not and will not forget “the worst theater fire disaster in U.S. history.”[27] 



------


https://www.psychologytoday.com/us/blog/shadow-boxing/201605/be-or-not-be-philosophical-serial-killers
	In Crime and Punishment, the character of Raskolnikov seeks to prove that he is “superior” to laws that govern others. He believes he can kill someone without consequences. This inspired Brady, who believed that he, too, was morally superior.

	After meeting Hindley, Brady convinced her that morality was relative. He proposed that they enrich themselves with crime. One day, Brady suggested that they kill a child. She complied. Then she complied again, and again.

	After their arrest and convictions, Brady wrote The Gates of Janus, a book in which he describes crime as an exciting venture for the solitary explorer, "consciously thirsting to experience that which the majority have not and dare not." As for murder, "viewed scientifically, the death of a human being is of no more significance than that of any other animal on earth."

	Serial killers, he thought, had chosen to “live a day as a lion, rather than decades as a sheep.” They are "unavoidably a failure in many normal walks of life." Such people lack patience and eschew boredom. Once they have committed homicide, they accept the act as “normal,” and the rest of humanity becomes "subnormal."


https://people.howstuffworks.com/serial-killer.htm
	How Serial Killers Work

	The Zodiac Killer. John Wayne Gacy. The BTK Killer. Ted Bundy. Son of Sam. Jeffrey Dahmer­. The names and pseudonyms of these killers are burned into the collective consciousness of Americans, thanks to massive coverage in newspapers, books, films and TV specials. Many of those who have been captured appeared average -- attractive, successful, active members of the community -- until their crimes were discovered.

	This kind of killer doesn't just "go crazy" one day and kill a lot of people. He doesn't kill out of greed or jealousy. So what makes a person not only murder, but murder multiple people over periods of days, weeks and years? There's a special name for these types of murderers: serial killers. In this article, we'll learn about what makes them tick.

	...According to a recent FBI study, there have been approximately 400 serial killers in the United States in the past century, with anywhere from 2,526 to 3,860 victims [source: Hickey]. However, there's no way to really know how many serial killers are active at any point in time -- experts have suggested numbers ranging from 50 to 300, but there's no evidence to support them.

	Serial murders also appear to have increased over the past 30 years. Eighty percent of the 400 serial killers of the past century have emerged since 1950 [source: Vronsky]. Why this is happening is a question of some debate; there is no answer, just as there is no simple answer as to why some people become serial killers.

	...Process-focused serial killers get enjoyment from torture and the slow death of their victims. These include three different types of hedonists -- lust, thrill and gain -- and power-seeking killers. Lust killers derive sexual pleasure from killing. Thrill killers get a "kick" from it. Gain killers murder because they believe they will profit in some way. Power killers wish to "play God" or be in charge of life and death.

	...America's First Serial Killer

	H.H. Holmes, who was convicted of nine murders, is often considered to be the first serial killer in the United States. Holmes confessed to 27 murders, and some investigators thought he may have actually murdered hundreds. He began by killing guests at the massive "castle" hotel that he opened to host visitors to the 1893 World's Fair in Chicago. Holmes' crimes were discovered in an inspection after a custodian told police that he was not allowed to clean certain floors of the hotel. He was convicted and hanged in 1896. Interest in the Holmes case was revived in 2003 with the publication of "The Devil in the White City," a book juxtaposing the murders with the construction of the World's Fair.

	...The majority of identified serial killers are organized and nonsocial. Most of them also follow some other basic patterns. More than 80 percent of serial killers are male, Caucasian and in their 20s or 30s [source: Hickey]. Serial killers are generally intelligent, and they usually kill Caucasian women. There's no way to "tell" a serial killer simply by his appearance -- most of them look like everyone else. Ted Bundy, who was convicted of 30 murders, was often described as attractive, charismatic and articulate. John Wayne Gacy was a popular figure in his community and often performed as a clown at block parties. He met with first lady Rosalynn Carter when he was precinct captain of his local Democratic Party. He was also convicted of the murders of 33 boys and men.

	...One of the most studied aspects of serial murder is “why?” A number of theories have been set forth as potential explanations. But “unraveling the making of a serial killer is like aligning a Rubik's cube” [source: Vronsky]. In other words, there is no one answer. Let's take a look at three possible theories: childhood neglect and abuse, mental illness and brain injury.

	...Serial killers were often physically or sexually abused as children or witnessed the abuse of family members. This pattern of neglect and abuse, some researchers say, leads serial killers to grow up without a sense of anyone other than themselves. But at the same time, many children grow up neglected and abused, but do not become violent criminals or serial killers.



https://listverse.com/2015/07/23/10-chilling-glimpses-into-the-minds-and-lives-of-serial-killers/


where does "abuse excuse" come from, and why did it get popular? Leopold and Loeb case an early example of "blame the parents"

should look into James Fallon and Graeme Fairchild


https://people.howstuffworks.com/serial-killer.htm
	...For some people, the only way to explain serial murder is to say that serial killers are "insan­e." Some serial killers do plead "not guilty by reason of insanity" as a defense, but are all of them "insane" or even mentally ill? According to the U.S. Code, an insanity defense means that "at the time of the commission of the acts constituting the offense, the defendant, as a result of a severe mental disease or defect, was unable to appreciate the nature and quality or the wrongfulness of his acts. Mental disease or defect does not otherwise constitute a defense" [Source: U.S. Code].

	Basically, a serial killer arguing "not guilty by reason of insanity" must prove that he did not understand right from wrong at the time that he killed. But it can be difficult to prove that he really did not understand that his actions would result in the death of the victims. Only two serial killers have successfully pled insanity.

	...Some serial killers have been diagnosed by psychologists and psychiatrists as psychopaths. The official term in the Diagnostic and Standard Manual of Mental Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV) is antisocial personality disorder (APD). According to the DSM-IV, a person with APD follows a pattern of "disregard and violation of the rights of others occuring since age 15 years." This pattern includes seven factors (three of which must be met for diagnosis), such as "failure to conform to social norms," "irritability and aggressiveness" and "lack of remorse" [source: Vronsky]. Psychopaths are not insane -- they do know right from wrong. But this diagnosis may explain their behavior during their killing cycles.

	...Some researchers theorize that serial killers have brain damage or other biological abnormalities that contribute to their actions. Damage to areas like the frontal lobe, the hypothalamus and the limbic system can contribute to extreme aggression, loss of control, loss of judgment and violence. Henry Lee Lucas, who was convicted of 11 murders, was shown to have extreme brain damage in these areas, probably the result of childhood abuse, malnutrition and alcoholism. Arthur Shawcross, another 11-time serial killer, was found to have had several brain injuries, including two skull fractures. While in prison, he suffered from headaches and often blacked out. Bobby Joe Long, convicted of nine murders, stated at one point, "After I'm dead, they're going to open up my head and find that just like we've been saying a part of my brain is black and dry and dead" [source: Scott].

	...Focus on Some Infamous Serial Killers

    Gary Ridgway, the “Green River Killer,” confessed to killing four women, all of whom were prostitutes. Ridgway was a missionary killer. In his plea statement, he said, “I hate most prostitutes” [source: CNN.com].
    Many of the most publicized cases are lust killers, including Jeffrey Dahmer, Ted Bundy and John Wayne Gacy. All three killers found sexual gratification in the torture and murder of their victims.
    David Berkowitz, the “Son of Sam,” was a thrill killer who enjoyed the excitement of the kill. He did not touch any of his 15 victims (six of whom died -- nine were injured), but followed and shot at them from a distance.

    ...According to FBI profiler John Douglas, a signature "is a ritual, something the subject does intentionally for emotional satisfaction -- something that isn't necessary to perpetuate the crime” [source: JohnDouglas.com]. Some serial killers pose their victims in a certain way or leave them in a certain place after killing them. Another signature might be a method of torture or mutilation. It's what the killer does to fulfill his fantasies, and it can tell investigators a lot about his personality.

	Investigators also look at the MO, or modus operandi, of the crime. The MO reflects what the killer had to do to commit the crime. This includes everything from luring and restraining his victim to the way that he actually murders her. A serial killer's MO can change over time. Essentially, he learns from past mistakes and improves with time.


------


media coverage of leopold and loeb


https://www.biography.com/people/richard-loeb-227821
	Upon returning to the University of Chicago for graduate work, Loeb reunited and developed a deeper connection with Leopold. The two were an excellent match psychologically: The brilliant but socially inept Leopold was enthralled by the handsome and vivacious Loeb, who in turn found an excellent alter ego for his fantasy world. Their relationship became sexually intimate. Loeb continued to embroil Leopold in a number of different criminal pursuits, becoming increasingly obsessed with the development and commission of the "perfect crime" that would make headlines.


was it Loeb who dragged Leopold into this or the other way around?

Leopold said publicly he thought of himself submissive to Loeb, but privately he threatened to kill him and blackmailed him while trying to teach him about Neitszche

what actually happened?


	...The two young men were interrogated by police and eventually confessed to the murder, although Loeb claimed that Leopold had struck the fatal blow on Franks, while Leopold insisted the opposite was true. 


each blamed the other for the act itself, but a lot of articles blame Leob. Why? 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leopold_and_Loeb#Murder_of_Bobby_Franks
	The precise sequence of the events that followed remains in dispute, but a preponderance of opinion placed Leopold behind the wheel of the car, while Loeb sat in the back seat with the chisel. Loeb struck Franks, sitting in front of him in the passenger seat, several times in the head with the chisel, then dragged him into the back seat, where he was gagged and soon died.


http://chicagocrimescenes.blogspot.com/2009/09/nathan-leopolds-home.html
	Years of speculation by researchers about whether Leopold or Loeb originally hatched the murder plan have never turned definitive, but Leopold’s cruelty and lack of conscience, and Loeb’s fascination with crime and detective stories mean it easily could have been either.


...


https://loebandleopold.wordpress.com/teenage-years/

interesting but no sources


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Albert_Henry_Loeb
	Albert Henry Loeb (February 18, 1868 – October 27, 1924) was a Chicago attorney and an executive of Sears, Roebuck and Co. Loeb was also the father of convicted murderer Richard Albert Loeb of the infamous Leopold and Loeb.

	...Loeb and Julius Rosenwald, the Chairman of Sears, maintained a close relationship throughout their professional lives. It has been said that Rosenwald never made an important decision without asking Loeb's advice.[5]





https://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:YJNI6lHLEeMJ:https://www.stitcher.com/s/player.php%3Feid%3D53251293+&cd=16&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us&client=firefox-b-1-ab
	Nathan F. Leopold Jr. was born on November 19th, 1904 in Chicago, Illinois to Nathan and Florence Leopold. The elder Nathan was the son of Samuel and Babette, Jewish immigrants from Germany who had brought their family to Michigan. He worked in shipping and had made a fortune. Their son Nathan had moved to Chicago and married Florence Foreman in 1892. Nathan Leopold Sr. was already wealthy but had a gift for making more. He started up many successful enterprises in Illinois, such as Leopold & Austrian, a lending firm, the Manitou Shipping Company, a copper mining company, as well as the Fiber Can Corporation, a paper mill in Morris, Illinois. Leopold Sr. was an active member of the community. He was president of the Young Men’s Hebrew Association in Chicago, one of the Chicago’s first bankers, and when he married Florence, he married into one of the most prestigious families in Illinois


https://www.findagrave.com/memorial/83123051/nathan-freudenthal-leopold
	Nathan F. Leopold, Sr., wealthy financier died last night at the Michael Reese Hospital. He was operated on ten days ago by Dr. Solomon Strauss and his condition had been reported improving until yesterday afternoon. He had been in the lake transportation business since 1876, but retired recently.

	Mr. Leopold’s life was saddened in 1925 in the discovery that his son, Nathan F. Leopold, Jr., had killed little Bobby Franks, a crime to which young Leopold and Richard Loeb pleaded guilty.

	Nathan Leopold, Sr., was a respected and well liked business man.


parents loaded and well-connected

...


https://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/leopold-and-loeb-gain-national-attention
	Leopold and Loeb gain national attention

	...Both were convinced that their intelligence and social privilege exempted them from the laws that bound other people. In 1924, the pair began to put this maxim to the test by planning to commit a perfect murder. They each established false identities and began rehearsing the kidnapping and murder over and over.

	...Clarence Darrow agreed to defend Leopold, and the trial soon became a national sensation. Darrow, who didn’t argue the boys’ innocence, directed one of his most famous orations against the death penalty itself. The judge was swayed and imposed life sentences. Apparently unsatisfied with the attorney’s work, Leopold’s father later reneged on his contract to pay Darrow.

	In January 1936, a fellow inmate killed Loeb in a bloody razor fight in the prison’s shower. Leopold was released on parole in 1958 with help from noted poet Carl Sandburg, who testified on his behalf. He lived out the rest of his life in Puerto Rico, where he died in 1971.


why was Leopold Sr. apparently upset with Darrow saving his kid's life?

why w Carl Sandburg want this guy free


...




http://articles.chicagotribune.com/2005-08-18/news/0508180276_1_leopold-and-loeb-armand-deutsch-nathan-leopold
	LOS ANGELES — Armand Deutsch, a Chicago-born film producer who believed he was the intended target in the 1924 Leopold and Loeb murder case, has died at 92.

	..."It was no mystery why Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold had singled me out as a prime prospect for their heinous crime," Mr. Deutsch wrote in 1996 for the Chicago Tribune Magazine. "My grandfather, Julius Rosenwald, was the chairman of the board of Sears, Roebuck and Co. His prominence made me an ideal choice."

	"In addition," he wrote, "Loeb's father was a Sears vice president. Our families were friends. . . . So I knew and trusted both older boys, a great plus as they formulated their plans for what would become the first `crime of the century.'"

	On May 21, 1924, Mr. Deutsch wrote, Leopold and Loeb "cruised around the Harvard School looking for me or another acceptable candidate."

	Instead of himself, Mr. Deutsch wrote, they "found my 14-year-old schoolmate Robert Franks. Like me, Bobby knew and trusted both of them." Shortly after picking up Franks in their car, the two killed him and then dumped the body in Illinois near the Indiana state line (this sentence as published has been corrected in this text). Police found a pair of glasses that fell from Leopold's pocket near the body. The wealthy teenagers eventually pleaded guilty and were sentenced to life in prison after a spectacular trial involving Clarence Darrow.

	"How had I avoided certain death?" Mr. Deutsch wrote in the Tribune. "My daily routine was to walk home from school. Had I followed it on May 21, I surely would have accepted [the] invitation for a ride. Instead, I was picked up by the family chauffeur for a dental appointment."

	...Mr. Deutsch, who came to Hollywood in the mid-1940s to work in films, produced a number of movies. They included "Ambush" (1949), a Western starring Robert Taylor; "The Magnificent Yankee" (1950), a biography of jurist Oliver Wendell Holmes starring Louis Calhern;

	...In addition to his production work, he had served on the board of directors at Warner Bros. He also wrote a book, "Me and Bogie, And Other Friends and Acquaintances From a Life in Hollywood and Beyond" (1991).

	Mr. Deutsch met the Reagans before they were married, and they quickly became friends.


well-connected guy, grandson of Sears guy Rosenwald and friend of Leob's father, writes "it could have been me" in Chicago Tribune in 1996:

http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1996-06-23/features/9606230337_1_leopold-and-loeb-nathan-leopold-richard-loeb
	Leopold possessed the greater intellectual capacity. In addition to his ornithological prowess, he was multilingual, conversant in 15 languages. He was a disciple of the Nietzschean superman philosophy. Loeb was bright, witty and superficial. Physically attractive, he was an obsessive conversationalist to whom lying came as naturally as breathing.

	Loeb and Leopold hardly arrived at the "perfect murder" concept as newcomers to crime. Although they denied it, their story often has included accusations of culpability for a series of college fraternity burglaries, followed by several cases of arson as wells as other murders. I've read that the prosecution of one crime, in which a young boy was castrated before being killed, was mysteriously halted. In another case, the victim's family sued Loeb's and Leopold, who were already in prison. Their families settled out of court.


not their first murder?


	...Inevitably the planning of a wealthy boy's murder was concluded. On May 21 Dickie and Babe, as they were familiarly known, in their rented Willys-Knight, cruised around the Harvard School looking for me or another acceptable candidate. They found my 14-year-old schoolmate Robert Franks. Like me, Bobby knew and trusted both of them. He was picked up halfway home on his walk from school. (Who drove and who sat in the back seat remains an unsolved mystery. Loeb and Leopold both steadfastly claimed to be the driver.)


article sounds genuine

what's his angle? is it that murder is wrong, or murdering other elite?


	...The "perfect crime" had unraveled in 10 days. That afternoon prosecutor Crowe told the press that Loeb and Leopold had revealed my selection as a likely victim. This revelation was highlighted in the newspapers. One ran a front-page photograph of my mother, and under it were the words: "Her Son Escaped."


the real trial?

	...From the beginning Crowe was in the position of a club fighter up against Joe Louis. Darrow knew that it would be impossible to find a jury that would not vote for hanging. Crowe's strategy was based on a trial by jury. On the first day of the trial Darrow changed the arraignment plea from "not guilty by reason of insanity" to "guilty." This maneuver allowed him to waive a jury trial. The decision would be in the hands of the judge. "I would rather try to convince one man than 12, " he said.

	...The trial created riotous media attention. Huge throngs, held back by mounted police, converged on the courthouse demanding public hanging. Courtroom watchers were aghast watching Loeb and Leopold snicker and exchange coded glances, oblivious of the waves of revulsion that swept through the courtroom.

	Darrow described his clients as two defective machines. He said they had been deprived since birth of an emotional system and were not to blame for their genetic failure. Appropriate punishment would be life sentences without parole, separating them forever from society. Darrow had considerable help from his opponent. Crowe insisted that Franks had been murdered for ransom by two high-stakes gamblers deep in debt and afraid to admit it to their parents, a strategy that badly misfired. Darrow's gentle, masterfully delivered closing argument contrasted sharply with the prosecution's shrill cry for blood. Many in the courtroom wept.


a show trial...


	...Leopold confounded everyone by his immediate adaptation to prison life. He conducted classes, upgraded prison libraries and participated in malaria experiments. The phrase "model prisoner" began to filter outside the walls.


Leopold media attention in prison


	...When Leopold was paroled, I received several calls from newspaper reporters asking how I felt about it. Since I mistakenly pictured him restricted to Puerto Rico and performing worthwhile work, it did not disturb me. Years later I was angered to learn that he was permitted to travel at will. He frequently visited family in Chicago. These trips gave him pleasure, an emotion denied the Franks family from the day of their son's grisly death.

	...Today murder has become so commonplace that it has lost its ability to horrify us. Not so with crimes of the century. We have never become immune to them. The reaction to the murders of Nicole Brown and Ronald Goldman was identical to that of the murder of Bobby Franks. After the verdicts, a vast majority felt that Loeb and Leopold should have been executed and that O.J. Simpson was wrongfully acquitted.

	The color of a great defense in a crime of the century is green-money.

	The Loeb and Leopold families could afford Darrow. O.J. Simpson could afford Johnnie Cochran and the "dream team." Darrow was able to change the Loeb-Leopold case to a trial against capital punishment. Cochran was successful in changing the Simpson case to a trial against the Los Angeles police department and detective Mark Fuhrman.

	At 83 now, I probably will not live to see the first crime of the 21st Century. My life experience leads me to two predictions: The media and the public will be mesmerized; the defendant, if rich, will avoid the death penalty, and perhaps even conviction.


sounds like he's against rich people getting away with murder


...

http://www.chicagonow.com/chicago-history-cop/2015/09/charles-heath-the-forgotten-victim-of-child-killers-leopold-and-loeb/
	Charles Heath - The Forgotten Victim of Child Killers Leopold and Loeb

	Charles Ford Heath is a name that few remember when discussing the “Crime of the Century”

	...Nathan Leopold, 19 and Richard Loeb, 18 were extremely intelligent sons of wealthy Chicagoans and both were pursuing post graduate work at the University of Chicago.  They became inseparable friends and Loeb believed that wealthy, intelligent people were above the law.  Loeb believed that they could commit the “perfect crime” and convinced Leopold that they could get away with it.

	...They had sent a typed ransom note to Bobby’s father, Jacob Franks, using the alias George Johnson but young Bobby’s body was found by a construction worker before they could extort $10,000 from the Franks family.

	The hunt for “George Johnson” was underway and they police had put together a likely description of the culprit based on the educated style of prose used in the ransom letter.

	The police received an anonymous letter from a person claiming to be the killer of Bobby Franks that said he planned on killing himself.  Chief of Police Collins then issued the order to keep all attempted suicides under surveillance and that is where 35 year old druggist Charles Heath enters the scene.


while hunting for killer, police got anonymous letter confessing to crime and saying planned to kill himself. So the police where on the look out for suicide attempts to find killer.


	...Charles was at Mercy Hospital after his wife, Anna Vetter, found him in a stupor in the bedroom of their home at 6251 Harper Avenue with mercury and Veronal (barbital) pills by his side.  This was only two days after the disappearance of Bobby Franks.

	Charles and Anna had been married since April 17, 1913.  Anna had one daughter, Marian, who was 16 years old from a previous marriage and they had one daughter together, Charlotte, who was 8 years old.

	Charles had lost his job on the same day that Bobby Franks disappeared and his wife had explained that he had not been in the best of health since he went bankrupt two years ago and lost the druggist business he had at 1524 E. 64th St.

	Police stationed themselves at Charles’ bed at Mercy Hospital and his wife believed that they had already come down pretty hard on her husband because their home was only one block away from the drug store that the kidnappers had told Jacob Franks to proceed to with the ransom money.


Charles had appeared to have tried to commit suicide two days after murder, had lost his job same day of murder, and lived next to the drug store that Leopold and Loeb said to drop the money near (or part of that process). So they suspected Charles. His wife thought they "came down hard" on him while stationed outside his hospital bed.


	Police were shocked when they discovered that even though he was under surveillance he had somehow left Mercy Hospital undetected.

	On Tuesday May 27th, Charles Heath checked into the Coker’s Hotel in Louisville, Kentucky.  He had a cousin in Louisville named C.C. Krause.  He showed up at Krause’s house at 2620 Portland Street and told him that he sold his business in Chicago and that he was there looking for a job.  Krause said he seemed like he was in good spirits and left his house on Tuesday night at about 10:30pm to return to the hotel.

	When he checked into the hotel he told the clerk that he had to leave Chicago because he was beaten up by a group of men due to the fact that he was named in the newspaper as a dead ringer for the killer of the Franks boy.


Somehow, Charles evaded police surveillance and left the hospital. He went to his cousin's house, told him he sold business and looking for a job and seemed in good spirits, then went to hotel there. He told hotel clerk left Chicago because he was beaten up for a being a dead ringer for the murders.


	On the Morning of the 28th a maid entered Heath’s room saw him motionless in bed but presumed him asleep.  She did not return until the next morning where she found him in the same position and called the authorities.  The police transported him to Louisville City Hospital where he was kept under surveillance.  He had taken another dose of Veronal and was alive but unresponsive.   Newspaper clippings of the Franks case with his name listed as a suspect were found in his pockets.  There was also a note.

	“Please notify Mrs. C.F. Heath, 6251 Harper Ave. Chicago.  Please give me full Masonic rites.  Tell them that I will not be with them anymore.”


Next morning, a maid found him motionless. Charles had taken more Veronal but was alive. Found newpaper clippings of Franks case with his name on him. Though he was said to have been in good spirits earlier, he was found with a suicide note. The suicide note implicated him in Freemasonry.


	While police officers waited at Charles’ bedside in Louisville for him to regain consciousness, Nathan Leopold was sitting in Chicago talking to police about a pair of glasses that were found with the Franks body.  Only three people in Chicago were sold glasses with a very special hinge mechanism and one of them was Nathan Leopold.

	Richard Loeb was the first to confess blaming Leopold for everything but eventually both came clean and the “Trial of the Century” was in motion.


The police were still interested in Charles. However, only three people in Chicago had the special glasses that were sold to Leopold, and a pair was found at the crime scene. Because of this, a parallel investigation led police to Leopold, who confessed to the murder. Loeb confessed first and blamed Leopold for everything.


	Tragically, at the same time the confessions were taking place in Chicago a young druggist was dying in Kentucky.  On June 1, 1924 Charles Heath died at the City Hospital in Louisville Kentucky thinking that he was the main suspect in a child murder and not one newspaper covered the story of his death.


Charles would later die. No newspaper covered the story of his death.

	
	Chicago had their killers and a young druggist’s widow and mother of two moved back to Porter County Indiana to live with her family.




Leopold and Loeb's family were well-connected, and their lawyer participated in other active measures

They were sued for another murder, which was settled out of court

They believed they should get away with murder, on account of their perceived superiority to the "slave class"

Multiple media personalities contributed to fame and fascination of Leopold and Loeb, including newspapers and "poets" rehabiliting Leopold's image after his incarceration

A man Charles Heath fit as the murderer, on account of the letters Leopold and Loeb wrote. A newspaper outed Heath as a "dead ringer", and his death was ruled a suicide under suspicious circumstances.

Meanwhile, a pair of glasses found at the crime scene lead police to Leopold, unusual on account of their ability and planning and the luck that they enjoyed before and after the murders (maybe more going on with this? Leopold confesses "glasses fell from my pocket" http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html . He also says he was wearing glasses earlier "in order to disguise myself")

long after the murders, well-concected people and journalists are still split on their disposition toward Leopold and Loeb


here's a theory:

Leopold and Loeb thought they should enjoy the "happiness of the knife" in dominating the slave class, and many people who thought like them agreed. So, they helped get away with this and continue this, the elite "predators" hunting their "prey" for sport. One way they could help them is plant evidence and frame others for the murders.

One day, Leopold and Loeb took it too far: they targeted children at their own wealthy school, coming dangerously close to hunting the same members of the "elite" who were protecting them.

Some elite thought this permissible and continued to help them, others not so much. Just as evidence could be planted by agentura to help them get away with it, evidence could be planted to incriminate them.


...


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1982/07/11/the-ordeal-of-testifying-in-a-murderers-defense/491ceb48-d949-49eb-bfe4-29b7c3468d6b/
	 The Ordeal of Testifying In a Murderer's Defense

	 By Meg Greenfield; Meg Greenfield is the editorial page editor of The Post.

	 July 11, 1982

	 I HAVE BEFORE ME photostats of the front pages of a couple of newspapers, The New York Times and The New York Herald Tribune for Aug. 8, l924. The story that engages my attention concerns the Loeb-Leopold murder case, then in court.

	In the Herald Tribune it is headlined this way: "Girl Friend Swears Loeb Was Childish. Lorraine Nathan, 18, and 4 Boy Chums Corroborate Alienists on Condition of Minds of Murderers." The Times headline tells more: "State Accuses Girl of Lying for Loeb; Four Chums Testify. Crowe Cries 'Perjury' as Former Sweetheart Declares Youth 'Irrational and Infantile.' " On the inside page where the story continues, one of the papers carries a photograph of the girl, of whom it says, "She made a pretty though somewhat nervous picture on the stand."

	The girl is wearing one of those daffy headache bands of the period, and she looks very young to me. She is my mother. 


mother of Meg Greenfield of the Washington Post was called to testify on behalf of Loeb

	
	I never discussed her role as a defense witness in the Loeb-Leopold case with my mother. She died when I was 12, and it was only years later that my brother and I, growing up in another city, even heard of the famed Chicago murder (someone had made a movie about it) and then heard, from a family friend, to our astonishment, that our mother had had some part in the court proceedings. But the tight wall of shame that surrounded the whole affair, from murder to sentencing, remained so strong among those associated with it -- no matter how tangentially -- that even then we were unable to get answers to the questions we put to our elder relatives. "Why bring all that up now?" came the stock response. "Why do you want to talk about it? . . . I don't really remember . . . It was so long ago." Eventually we went to the microfilm section of a library and dug the story out of old newspapers.


"Why talk about it now?" Greenfield sees a "wall of shame" around the murder and trial, and never got a chance to talk to her mother about it. She dug up old newspapers to find out more.


	The uproar over the Hinckley case has caused me to retrieve those photostats from a drawer, inspect them again and consider again some of the aspects of that earlier case which, in slightly different form, we are arguing about now.


background on Hinckley case:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Hinckley_Jr.
	John Warnock Hinckley Jr. (born May 29, 1955) is an American citizen who, on March 30, 1981, attempted to assassinate U.S. President Ronald Reagan in Washington, D.C. Hinckley wounded Reagan with a bullet that ricocheted and hit him in the chest. Hinckley also wounded police officer Thomas Delahanty and Secret Service agent Timothy McCarthy, and critically wounded Press Secretary James Brady. All of the shooting victims survived, although Brady's 2014 death was later ruled a homicide 33 years after he was shot.

	Reported to have been driven by an obsessive fixation on Jodie Foster, he was found not guilty by reason of insanity and remained under institutional psychiatric care until September 2016. Public outcry over the verdict led to the Insanity Defense Reform Act of 1984, which altered the rules for consideration of mental illness of defendants in Federal Criminal Court proceedings in the United States. Hinckley was released from institutional psychiatric care on September 10, 2016, and lives with his mother.[1]

	...John Warnock Hinckley Jr. was born on May 29, 1955 in Ardmore, Oklahoma,[2][3] and moved with his wealthy family to Dallas, Texas, at the age of 4. His late father was John Warnock Hinckley Sr., president of World Vision United States, and chairman and president of the Vanderbilt Energy Corporation. His mother is Jo Ann (Moore) Hinckley. He has two older siblings: sister Diane and brother Scott. After graduating from Vanderbilt University, Scott Hinckley became vice president of his father's oil business. Their sister, Diane, graduated from Southern Methodist University in Dallas.[2]

	Hinckley grew up in University Park, Texas,[4] and attended Highland Park High School[5] in Dallas County. During his grade school years, he played football, basketball, hockey, soccer and baseball, learned to play the piano, and was elected class president twice.

	...At his trial in 1982, in Washington, D.C., having been charged with 13 offenses, Hinckley was found not guilty by reason of insanity on June 21. The defense psychiatric reports portrayed him as insane while the prosecution reports characterized him as legally sane.[12] Hinckley, Federal Bureau of Prisons (BOP) number 00137-177, was released from BOP custody on August 18, 1981.[13] Soon after his trial, Hinckley wrote that the shooting was "the greatest love offering in the history of the world" and was disappointed that Foster did not reciprocate his love.[14]

	The verdict resulted in widespread dismay. As a consequence, the United States Congress and a number of states revised laws governing when the insanity defense may be used by the defendant in a criminal prosecution. Idaho, Montana, and Utah abolished the defense altogether.[15] In the United States, prior to the Hinckley case, the insanity defense had been used in less than 2% of all felony cases and was unsuccessful in almost 75% of those trials.[12] Public outcry over the verdict led to the Insanity Defense Reform Act of 1984, which altered the rules for consideration of mental illness of defendants in federal criminal court proceedings in the United States.[2] In 1985, Hinckley's parents wrote Breaking Points, a book detailing their son's mental condition.[12]


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1982/07/11/the-ordeal-of-testifying-in-a-murderers-defense/491ceb48-d949-49eb-bfe4-29b7c3468d6b/
	True, the two rich Chicago boys -- Nathan Leopold Jr., 19, and Richard Loeb, 18 -- who plotted and carried out the murder of young Bobby Franks in a spirit of coldblooded intellectual play, pleaded guilty to the crime, at the recommendation of their lawyer, Clarence Darrow. So there was nothing precisely comparable to the Hinckley lawyers' effort to persuade a jury that a defendant was not guilty by reason of insanity. And in fact there wasn't even a jury, once the guilty plea had been entered. It was for the sentencing Judge, John R. Caverly, and in the hope of getting the death penalty mitigated in favor of life imprisonment, that Darrow organized his psychiatric pitch. This pitch was that despite the obviously rational calculation and control that had gone into the perpetration of the crime, the "boys," as Darrow called his clients, though not "insane," weren't quite right in the mind at the time they committed it. Rather, they had been driven to their act by an accumulation of psychological and emotional deformities not of their own making.

	My mother, who described herself on the stand as "just a schoolday friend" of Loeb, was one of the witnesses Darrow called to help establish this point. Darrow, in his wisdom, declined to call her younger sister, my beloved Aunt Rolly -- then described as "Miss Rosalind" -- notwithstanding, as we learn from the papers, that Miss Rosalind stood ready with a medical finding that Loeb was "plain cuckoo." Her sister's diagnosis, it is explained by my mother in the news account, was based on the fact that Loeb had "stuck his thumb into all the chocolates on a plate passed to him at a dance at the Nathan home as he sought a soft-centered candy."


Greenfield's aunt was prepared to testify that Loeb was insane, but Darrow didn't call on her. Greenfield says Leopold and Loeb carried out the murder with "obvious calculation and control."


	My mother, who testified along with four other young friends of the defendants, used rather more clincial-sounding language, for which she was to be reprimanded by the judge. But in swearing to the recently aberrant behavior of the the two killers, she and the other school friends were far from being Darrow's heavy guns. They followed, they did not lead -- and they followed the doctors.


Greenfield says her mother and her friends followed the doctors in their testimony.


	Darrow countered with a distinguished group of the newfangled Freudians, including one who was president of the American Psychiatric Association and superintendent of St. Elizabeth's Hospital. (Two Chicago newspapers, nothing loathe to get into the act, invited Sigmund Freud to do an analysis of the murderers for them. Freud sent his regrets.)

	There were soon complaints, as there were to be in the Hinckley case almost 60 years later, that the wealthy families of these young men were, in effect, "buying" them out of the consequences of their crime with an ability to pay for expert testimony and counsel. There was unprecedented courtroom discussion of overbearing governesses, childhood sexual fantasies, glandular disorders. And there was despair then, as now, that respected experts could argue such utterly different versions of the psychiatric case.


Darrow invited some distinguised Fruedian psychologists, including APA president, and some newspapers tried to invite Freud himself.

Greenfield points out there were "complaints" that the wealthy could buy their way out of murder, and "despair" that so many respected experts would lie for them.

	
	I can't tell from the news accounts whether my mother actually perjured herself as the prosecutor, Robert Crowe, charged. He pointed out that her testimony that Loeb's conduct had changed and that in the past year he had seemed newly "infantile" and "irrational" directly contradicted earlier sworn statements she had made in the prosecutor's office that Loeb was "manly" and "sane." There was a quarrel among lawyers over that, some maneuvering, aacountercharge that in that earlier session an assistant state's attorney had tried to influence her testimony and that parts of her testimony had been deleted and so forth.

	I don't know what to make of any of that; the court evidently didn't pursue it. And I can't know how closely her own genuine perception of Loeb's conditon paralleled that of the three leading psychoanalysts the defense had already called. She certainly used all their terminology, and it has an odd, forced, unaccustomed ring to it in the news account. The prosecutor responded, in a savage cross examination, by addressing her sarcastically as "doctor."


not sure, but I think Darrow's argument shifted during trial? he teeters on calling them insane in his argument--maybe arguing they were rational but mislead wasn't working. Greenfield says she's not sure if her mother lied like the "respected experts"


	It must have been terrifying. That's the part that interests me. But I have very little to guide me in understanding how she felt, or even why she was there. She was not, incidentally, the "sweetheart" of the moment or the one who was written about in the semi-fictional accounts. She was a friend who had known him long, once been a girl friend and now remained close.

	I do know now from family that she insisted on testifying when asked, very much against the will and judgment of her parents. They wanted to avoid any connection with the terrible scandal and forsaw what it would be like -- not just on the stand, but after. My mother gained an unwanted celebrity. Along with others who followed the trial's revelations, she learned of a breathtakingly brutal, degenerate side to her friend. She was to suffer something that sounds today like a nervous breakdown when the case was completed and to be packed off "to forget" at a kind of junior college/finishing school in the East.


Greenfield's mother knew Loeb and offered to testify, against the wishes of her parents who predicted the scandal. Greenfield says her mother learned a dark side of her friend. The scandal followed her and she had something like a nervous breakdown later.


	...To me this moment has it all -- innocence and experience, revulsion and compassion, incredulity and understanding. We were in the babyhood of our experience with this particular kind of analysis of criminal behavior. I go back to the case of the poked-in chocolates. In a way, as usual in our family, Aunt Rolly was out there ahead of the curve. For her the chocolate-squashing represented a lapse in decorum so grave as to constitute, on its face, evidence of insanity. In fact, the presiding judge was to make a comparable observation: "had they (Loeb and Leopold) been normal, they would not have committed this crime." Although his eventual decision to forego the death penalty was not, he claimed, based on the psychiatric case, but on the youth of the defendants, Judge Caverly here gave expression to a sentiment -- crime equals derangement -- that, whatever its merit in some instances, has been overextended, debased and reduced to absurdity in our own age.


Pointing to "this method of criminal analysis," in its "infant stages" at the time of the case (and relevant to the Hinckely case?) Greenfield says the idea that crime equals derangement has been overextended and reduced to absurdity.

	
	And surely the same may also be said of another aspect of the case and one which was novel: the introduction of all this lore about the defendants' upbringing and state of mind, not as evidence of insanity or of an inability to know right from wrong, but rather as evidence of a diminished responsibility for their actions, which in turn was said to argue for a sentence of diminished severity.


Greenfield takes issue with the idea that lore about a defendents' upbringing and state of mind is an excuse for diminished responsibility and lesser sentencing


	Since those early days, it seems to me, this search for determining causes, this assumption of "no fault" behavior has been carried to a mad place too. Increasingly, even mindlessly, we have overlaid all our actions with a vaguely psychological, exculpatory, morally confusing wash. Nowadays there is not even "temptation." We call temptation "pressure," the implication being that the crime or lapse is hardly the fault of the one who succumbs; it is the fault of the temptation itself, the fault of the "pressure."

	And we have so vastly expanded the application of this doctrine since Darrow's day that the act of corruption or cynicism has yet to be invented that does not somehow get mitigated by it. I sometimes think we may even be tending, in our judgments of public venality, toward a new verdict of "not greedy by reason of insanity."


Greenfield says the search for external causes for individuals actions has gone to a "mad place." She says it's hard to find to find an act of corruption or cynicism that the doctrine of blaming external causes can't be used to excuse (reminiscent of Neitzsche's idea that there's no free will and blame made up to limit strong, or "structural interpretations" in Marxist theory that decisions are inevitable consequences of the trends in society)


	The woman who was my mother was pretty old-fashioned and rigorous. Reflecting on what I know of her -- remember and have been told -- I think she would in fact have been shocked by where that pioneering legal case helped to bring us. But that is speculation, and I am interested in the girl. I look at the news photo of the young face, the earnest eyes, the damned-fool headband. What did she believe? That Loeb was evil? That he was mad? How much did she buy of the view apparently held by those close to each of the murderers, that the other boy had been the true culprit and had corrupted her friend?


Greenfield says her mother wouldn't have liked where the case got them. Wonders what she believed, if she bought the view that Leob was innocent. Says each group of friends of Leopold and Loeb blamed the other for being the corrupting influence.


	How hurt, how betrayed, how shocked was she? Did she finally decide that she must do what she could to save his life? Was that the moral and emotional nub of the matter for her, an unwillingness not to help save him, an inability to refuse to testify? Was she repelled by him? Moved by his plight? Both? Did it add up to some dim faith in the psychiatric theory before the court, to a need to believe that thissold and treasured "schoolday friend" had been in some way possessed -- and thus not fully responsible for his barbarous act?


wonders Mother's motive--did she want to help her friend, and ended up drawn to the idea that external factors to blame out of sympathy?


	You will see I am myself working toward a theory of what motivated her. I sense in hes gir decision to testify -- I want to sense in it -- an element of humility, compassion. Never mind the overreaching and the intellectual arrogance of some of those who claim power these days to explain every human act of love and grace, not just of depredation, as nothing more than the automatic working of some psychological law they understand. Surely, we can step back from the excesses without abandoning what is of value here. For there is humility, not arrogance, in yielding to the possibility and accepting the thought that others are driven by devils we cannot see and might not ourselves resist.


Greenfield wants to believe her mother was motivated by compassion. She resents some who "claim power" and explain every act of love, grace, deprediation as "nothing more than the automatic working of some psychological law they understand." (examples might be: justice is just ressentiment of the slave mindset)

Greenfield sees excess but value here, in that there is humility in "yielding to the possibility and accepting the thought that others are driven by devils we cannot see and might not ourselves resist."


	I like to think that some largeness of spirit and understanding is what motivated the nervous girl they ridiculed as "doctor" on the stand, that, painful as it was, she was acting instinctively, intuitively in the spirit we need to retain today -- no matter where our much- needed discussion and revision of the criminal law may take us.



------

What did the press say about the Leopold and Loeb case and Darrow's defense?

what did the say about Leopold while in prison?

what do they say today?



https://www.newspapers.com/image/355037981/

Chicago Tribune on day of sentencing


a large image of a man in front of Lady Justice, holding a peice of paper labeled "slayers." The man is saying "After this, I don't see how I can ever ask you to hang anybody"



NYTimes and Chicago Tribune on Franks murder:


May 23, 1924

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.pdf

	KIDNAPPERS SLAY RICH CHICAGO BOY

	 Body of 13-Year-Old Robert Franks Is Found in a Culvert as $10,000 Demand Is Made.

	 CHICAGO, May 22. — Kidnappers whose identity at present is unknown and who demanded $10,000 ransom early today brutally murdered Robert Franks, 13-year-old son of Jacob Franks, wealthy retired watchmaker, of 5,052 Ellis Avenue, and threw his body into a culvert beside the Pennsylvania Railroad tracks at 118th Street. 


says rewards total $10k offered for arrest

father offered $5k and a local newspaper another 5
`
parents and Senator Sam Ettelson, friend of theirs, "negotiated with the kidnappers" and "made a secret report to the Detective Bureau"

were about to pay when boy's body was found

	
	...Stuck grotesquely on the boy's face was found a pair of spectacles, placed there apparently by the kidnappers in an effort to make identification harder, for the boy, according to his parents, never wore glasses.


from Simaon Baatz "for the thrill of it" pg 25

	...As his fellow workers were carrying the body to a second handcare on the tracks, Paul Korff, a signal repairman for the railroad, glanced over the scene. He wondered if any of the boy's clothes were lying around; if so they should gather them up and take them along. Korff could see nothing--no shirt or trousers, or even shoes and socks--but he did find a pair of eyeglasses with toroiseshell frames, lying on the embankment, just a few feet from the culvert. Perhaps they belonged to the boy; Korff put them in his pocket and joined his comrades waiting by the handcars.

	...At around ten o’clock that morning, Anton Shapino, the sergeant
	on duty at the Hegewisch police station, took charge of the body. Paul
	Korff had handed him the tortoiseshell eyeglasses, and Shapino, as-
	suming that they belonged to the boy, placed them on the child’s fore-
	head. Later that morning, at the morgue at 13300 South Houston
	Avenue, the undertaker, Stanley Olejniczak, laid the body out; as he did
	so, he noticed the unusual discoloration of the boy’s face and genitals
	and the bruises and cuts on the head—someone had obviously beaten
	the child violently


from Leopold's confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"Having arrived at our destination we placed the body in the robe, carried it to the culvert where it was found.  Here we completed the disrobing, then in an attempt to render identification more difficult we poured hydrochloric acid over the face and body.  Then we placed the body into the drain pipe and pushed it as far as we could.  We gathered up all the clothes, placed them in the robe and apparently at this point the glasses fell from my pocket.  I carried the robe containing the clothes back to the automobile, a distance of some 300 yards, and one of the socks apparently dropped from the bundle. 


The glasses were the key evidence leading to Leopold. They weren't found on Franks body but lying on the ground. Why does NY times report that the glasses were found on Frank's face? 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.pdf
	Yellow Taxicab Is a Clew

	The spectacles were considered an important clew, and a hunt was on for a Yellow Taxicab driver who drove cab No. 1,492, or No. 1,942, to the Franks home at 3:45 in the afternoon, saying he had been sent by a stranger in a drug store "on Sixty-third Street to bring Mr. Franks and the package"--meaning the $10,000 ransom money--to him.

	On this driver lay the only hope of obtaining a description of a mysterious "Mr. Johnson," one of the kidnappers, who did all the negotiating by telephone and by letter with Mr. and Mr. Franks and with Senator Ettelson during the tedious twenty-four hour vigil.


a cab driver drove to Franks home and told them a stranger at a drug store "on sixty-third street" sent him for the money

NY Times said this cab driver was "the only hope" for a description of the kidnappers

"Mr. Johnson" also communicated with Senator Ettelson


	...When the boy did not arrive home for dinner Mr. Franks told the police he had a vague persentiment that something was wrong, that something tragic had happened. The feeling grew so strong upon him that he called in Senator Ettelson and asked him what to do.


goes on to describe Mrs. Franks "Mr. Johnson" call

	...Senator Ettelson at once called on the supervisor of the telephone company to trace all incoming calls from that time on. But no further calls came

	...At 2 o'clock in the morning Mr. Franks and Senator Ettelson went to the Detective Bureau and consulted an officer. They decided, however, not to have a police search made then.

	The east side police, who had charge of the body, knew nothing of a missing Franks boy. They knew only that a boy's body had been found in the dismal swamp beside the railroad tracks near the forest preserve. Off-hand, it was presumed the boy had drowned.


How is it possible to "presume he had drowned?" his face and genetals were melted with acid, he had a gash in his head.

	
	So the message of the finind of a boy's body beside the tracks went unheeded when it was received at the Detective Bureau at 10 o'clock in the morning.


did they start to care when a wealthy family and a Senator got involved?

	Mr. Ettelson and Mr. Franks had not come back to tell of the missing boy and the police had no report on him.

	Meanwhile negotiations between "Johnson" and the anxious, waiting party in the Franks home went on. That, it was admitted later, was the reason no second visit to the Detective Bureau was made.


first visit was shortly after Franks was kidnapped due to a "vaugue feeling." Later Franks parents decided to contact Ellison. After this, Franks body was found and "presumed drowned." Frank's parents didn't call back on police until later.

who is this cab driver? he isn't found in contemporary accounts of the murder


...


May 23, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880363/
	ROBERT FRANKS IS VICTIM OF MYSTERY DEATH

	Question 3 of His Instructors

	
	...The police in their efforts to solve the mystery questioned three Harvard school instructors closely last night and early today. Walter Wilson, an instructor in mathematics, was first examined in his home, 4757 Ingieside avenue.

	Shortly before 3 a. m. Lieut Michael Grady took R. P. Williams, athletic instructor, 4829 Dorchester avenue, and Mott Mitchell, instructor in English, 2955 Euclid avenue, to the Wabash avenue police station. There they were asked many questions and then permitted to go to their homes, after being told to report ot the police again today.

	Meantime the police had take advantage of the temporary detenion of Williams and Mitchell to search their rooms. Several pads of paper found in them were siezed to be compared with the paper on which had been written the letter in which the threat that young Franks would be killed unless $10,000 was forthcoming.

	Hope to Obtain Clews

	The police make no charges against the instructors, but were interested in the fact that the Enlish in the threatening letter was so good that it must have been written by a man of more than ordinary education.	They thought it possible the instructors might furnish clews.


interrogated teachers and searched homes, some names made to press


	...Death Cause Mystery

	Examination of the body by Coroner's Physicians Joseph Springer and F. N. Benson late in the evening set the murder down as one of the most baffling in the city's annals, in that neither of the experienced doctors could assign a cause for death.

	"He was neither strangled nor chocked," Dr. Springer said. "He had been hit on the head several times with a blunt instrument, but none nor all of these blows were sufficient to cause death. I can only say that he has a nasty stomach and lungs."

	Both physicians indicated that the boy might have been murdered through a sponge or rag saturated in acid of some sort pressed to his mouth. The eyes, nose, and lips indicated this; they were blue, and a bit of brown coloring clung about the mouth.


initially, neither coroner could assign a cause of death. Springer said hit in head several times, but wasn't enough to cause death. Both said might have been murderd with acid rag.


	...The boy's body was found half extending out of a culvert under the railroad tracks. It had apparently been tossed into the water and floated into the two foot main in the shallow water between Wolf lake and Hyde lake.

	The head was inside the culvert, the feet extended out.


found half-way in culvert head first. Chicago Tribune offers that he floated into the culvert this way.

	
	...No clothing is near the scene. Only one stocking, identified as worn by Robert floated in the swamp 200 feet away. On the bank lay a pair of horn rimmed eyeglasses. These were boys' size and fitted the lad, but his father said he had never worn spectacles.


found glasses and stocking nearby, father said never wore glasses


	...Instructor Talks of Boy.

	The police early turned for possible light on the case to INstructor Wilson. They visited his home early in the evening, but were told that he was out.

	After they left a Tribune reporter found Wilson at home. He admitted he had taken Robert Franks and his younger brother, Jacob Jr., to River-view park a year ago, adn that on that occasion Mr. and Mrs. Franks had been worried because he did not return with them until 1 o'clock in the morning.

	...Knows No Young Women.

	"Have you a sweetheart?" he was asked, and he replied: "No, I don't know any young ladies around Chicago."

	He was attired in a bathrobe and appeared nervous. He said he had no theory about the murder--had had no time to think about it.


goes over quote by him saying maybe done for money then says police returned and Wilson told them same story.

they incinuated he was the murderer at first I guess by suggesting he was a homosexual


	...Would it not be well to call the police into the matter He was willing, anxious, he said, to pay any demand to get his boy back safe.

	They discussed it; and finally Mr. Ettleson agreed it might be well to go to the detective bureau and tell the affair in confidence to Chief of Detectives Hughes or to Lieut. William Schoemaker. He knew both of these detectives personally, he said. Their advice would be sound.


Ettelson said he knew detective Hughes and Lieut Schoemaker personally

goes on to say at first Ettelson and Franks father thought Franks might be alive, and didn't go to the police the next morning, that Hughes and was going to keep it secret

	...And in the morning, even while the lad's body was being lifted out of the muddy water in the culvert under the railroad tracks between Wolf lake and HYde Park, the kidnapers, now murderers, started their negotiations again as though nothing had happened to the boy.


goes on to say cab driver called in "regular way" "as if it was from Franks home"


...


May 24, 1924 pg 14

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699801.html?pageNumber=14

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699801.pdf
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.
	As there was no advantage for the blackmailers, and a great and obvious risk, in the death of ROBERT FRANKS, the Chicago boy, the chances are that his death was in some way or degree accidental, or at least was not intended when the plot was formed. That probability, or possibility, does not decrease in the slightest the atrocity of the crime or the guilt of the criminals.

	The boy's fate was a natural consequence of such acts as theirs, and it is easy to recall the cases of the Varotta boy, found drowned in the Hudson shortly after he was stolen here in 1921, and of the Coughlin baby, in Morris-town, a year before, who was held so tightly under the abductor's coat as to die of asphyxiation or pressure. The case of the Pickelny boy, found dead in a cellar here last October, was not of the same kind, but no doubt was a murder.


NY times allows more charitable motive to killers


	...Nothing is as yet certain except that the police would not, and should not, "keep faith" with child stealers to the extent of granting them immunity from punishment in case of the little victim's safe return.


points out that parents being willing to allow kidnappers escape from punishment does not mean police should

says police should not "keep faith" with child stealers

this is true in many ways depending on your perspective, including that the police would look pretty bad if they covered up for Leopold and Loeb

	
	...In the Coughlin case the State police did magnificent work in hunting down and capturing the kidnappers: but the baby was dead long before they did it, and the villain's sentence to life imprisonment was poor consoluation to the parents.


...


May 24, 1924 pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1


	THINKS BOY DIED FIGHTING CAPTORS

	Chicago Coroner Holds This Theory of Death of Young Franks.

	RANSOM SOUGHT AFTERWARD

	Extortioners, Expecting Father to Bring $10,000 to Drug Store, Still Followed Plot.

	CHICAGO, May 23. — Struggling with kidnappers caused the death of Robert Franks, the fourteen-year-old son of a millionaire, and whose naked body was found in a swamp yesterday while the father waited to pay a $10,000 ransom, according to the latest acceptable theory. After a day in which neither motive nor positive clues were established, the following hypothesis was evolved by Coroner Oscar Wolff: 

	At least two men decided to to kidnap Robert Franks and hold him for ransom. They captured him as he was leaving the fashionable private school where he was in a grade equivalent to first year high. They lured the boy into an automobile and struck him over the head with something to quiet him.

	"The boy resisted with all his youthful strength and when it appeared likely he would cry out they stuck a handkerchief into his throat or perhaps just held a hand over his mouth. The boy then struggled so violently as to cause an internal hemmorrhage which brought death within two or three minutes, if the suffocation itself did not kill him, as it undoubtedly would a boy of 14 years, within a few minutes."


from confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	[Loeb]: "We proceeded south on Ellis Avenue, turned east on 50th Street, and just after we turned off of Ellis Avenue, Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.  I believe he hit him several times, I do not know the exact number.  He began to bleed and was not entirely unconscious. 

	...[Leopold]: As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose.  The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat.  Here he forced a cloth into his mouth.  Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter. 

	...[Loeb:] This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  He then took one of the rags and gagged him by sticking it down his throat, I believe.  We proceeded down Dorchester, and then at Leopold's direction drove into the country. 

	...We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat.  Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat.  He had covered him up with the robe that we had brought along, the robe also belonging to Leopold. 


Why did the coronor decide Franks hemmorrhage was from "struggling" and not being hit on the head? Leopold told police "apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter"--did he get this from news reports? Why did Loeb say Franks was unconcious at that time but Leopold said he died?



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1

	"Then, having a body to conceal and the primary purpose of the kidnapping--ransom--not yet even under way, one of the plotters wrote the letter to Jacob Franks, who is said to be worth $4000,000, and the other undertook to dispose of the body."

	"The latter called Mr.s Franks, the distracted mother, on the telephone a few hours after her boy was killed, telling her he was alive and would be returned when the money was paid. That was to render certain the getting of the money."

	"In hiding the boy's body in the drain pipe in the old swamp near Wolf Lake it was the purpose of the murderers to get as much money as possible out of the father, in the belief the body would not be found for many months, perhaps never. To guard against identification they removed the clothing so that if, after considerable time, the body were found it would be only a skeleton and there would be nothing about it to make it certain it was the Franks boy."


from confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html

	[Leopold:] Having arrived at our destination we placed the body in the robe, carried it to the culvert where it was found.  Here we completed the disrobing, then in an attempt to render identification more difficult we poured hydrochloric acid over the face and body.

	..."After your started out there Nathan, did you remove your clothes at all while you were placing the body?"

	"My coat, yes."

	"Just how did you place the body in the drain pipe, just explain how you placed the body there?"

	"I think it was head first.  I had a pair of rubber boots." 

	..."At the time you had taken your coat off did you lay it on the ground some place?"

	"Yes, right by my shoes."

	"That is not the time you lost your glasses?"

	"No, that is not the time.  Dick had run across the railroad track to see if anybody could be seen from the other end, and I went up to the top of the railroad track, for some reason or other, to put on my shoes, and he brought my coat to me.  I think we struck a match -- no, we had a flashlight with us, and it must have been at that time that the glasses fell out." 

	...[Loeb:] Captain Shoemacher asked, "Was it dark at that time?"

	"Yes.  Stuck it head first into the culvert.  I might say that at this time it was fairly dark, but still not pitch black, so that we were able to work without a flashlight." 


Leopold had a story for how he lost his glasses, but it differed from Loeb's


	[Leob:] We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat. Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat.

	...We went down this road a ways, and then turned off the road on another deserted road, this deserted road leading north.  We followed that for only a short distance, then turned down another deserted road, leading west.  We stopped the car, got out, removed young Franks' shoes, hid them in some bushes, and removed his pants and stockings, placing them in the car.  We did this in order that we might be saved the trouble of too much undressing him later on. We also left his belt buckle and belt with his shoes, not in the same place, but very near there.  We then proceeded to drive around back and forth and back and forth."

	"Waiting for it to get dark?"

	"Waiting for it to get dark. 


Loeb says he and leopold were watching Franks and saw him unconcious

Leob said they removed Franks shoes, pants, and "stockings" first so it would be easier to undress him later


	..."We dragged the body out of the car, put the body in the road (robe) and carried it over to the culvert.  Leopold carried the feet, I carried the head.  We deposited the body near the culvert,and undressed the body completely.  Our original scheme had been to etherize the body to death."

	"Where did you pour the hydrochloric acid on him?"

	"Right there.  The scheme for etherizing him originated through Leopold, who evidently has some knowledge of such things, and he said that that would be the easiest way of putting him to death, and the least messy.  This, however, we found unnecessary, because the boy was quite dead when we took him there.  We knew he was dead, by the fact that rigor mortis had set in, and also by his eyes, and then when at that same time we poured this hydrochloric acid over him, we noticed no tremor, not a single tremor in his body, therefore we were sure he was dead.


Loeb said they found out he was dead when the poured acid on him, since he didn't react when it was poured


They poured hydrochoric acid on Franks' genitals, although the reasons why aren't clear:

http://moses.law.umn.edu/darrow/trialpdfs/LEOPOLD_LOEB.pdf
	They poured hydrochloric acid on Bobby Franks’ face
	, a surgery scar on his abdomen and his genitals in an attempt to prevent identification.
	17

	...17  At least one account says Leopold had been told by someone that a person could be identified by their  genitals. Other accounts state that this was done to prevent Franks from being identified as Jewish because  it would obscure evidence of circumcision. 


Leopold's story on how he lost his glasses is suspect, Loeb thought Franks was concious while in the trunk, they removed his pants and underwear first before the rest of his clothes, and poured acid on his genetalia. According to this, the police suspected rape from an early stage:

https://kcjohnson.files.wordpress.com/2012/12/larson-article.pdf
	At first, the police investigation focused on teachers at Harvard School, the elite prep school that Franks attended in Kenwood and near where he was last seen alive.4^ Finding Franks' naked, scratched and discol ored body so quickly after the abduction led police to suspect pedophilia (rather than ransom kidnapping) as the main motive for the crime 47 After examining the body, the coroner stated publically that the boy's body was neither mutilated nor molested4? but he left open the possibility of rape in his final report, leading the prosecutor to raise the issue in courts. 49

	...49

	Fass, supra note 8, at 924, 939. The scratches on the body were probably caused by shoving it in the culvert; the discoloration came from the acid used to by the killers to render the body more difficult to identify. The coroner's report noted, however, "the  rectum was dilated and would admit easily one middle finger." Baatz, supra note 2, at 21.  In relating the killing of Bobby Frank during the prosecution's closing argument to the court, Crowe noted:

		Immediately upon killing him, they took his trousers off. And how do you undress a child? First the little coat, the collar, the tie, the shirt, and the last thing, the trousers. And yet im mediately after killing this poor little boy, his trousers alone came off, and for three hours that little dead boy, with his other clothes on him, remained in that car; and they did not take the balance of the clothes off until they pulled the body into the culvert.

	Speech of Robert E. Crowe, in The Loeb-Leopold Case, supra note 4, at 247. When defense counsel objected to Crowe's subsequent mention of the coroner's finding regarding the vic tim's distended rectum, the States' Attorney protested, "The Coroner's report says that he had a distended rectum, and from that fact, and  the fact that the pants were taken off, and the fact that [the defendants] are perverts, I have a right to argue that they committed an act of erversion." Baatz, supra note 2, at 381.  After considering the objection raised by the de fense, the judge admonished Crowe not to speculate on the matter beyond the contents of the coroner's report. 


The coronor and investigators found signs of rape, but the coronor "left open" this possibility in his final report. When prosecution brought this up on court, Darrow objected, and the judge told Crowe not to "speculate outside the contents of the coroner's report."


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1
	This was as near as certain any detective or official came to a solution of the crime. The police were hopelessly seeking clues all day, without any certainty as to why the lad was killed. Physical examination showed that death was not due to any external violence. A post-mortem examination determined the boy had not drowned, was not the victim of a fractured skull or any concussion of the brain, and that it was almost a certainty that he had not been poisoned.

	That the boy was not the victim of any mistreatment by a degenerate was also established. Every one connected with the Harvard School has been examined and investigations made into their pasts. This led to a complete vidication of the instructors.


NY Times suggests that "it was established" Franks wasn't raped since they investigated all of his teachers.


	...Then Thursday afternoon came the telephone call to Mr. Franks, telling him to get into a taxicab that was sent to him and go to a drug store in Sixty-third Street, where he would meet the men to whom he was to give the money. He had the money prepared, but in his distracted state of mind forget the address and did not go. Within a few minutes he learned his son's body had been recoevered in the swamp.

	It developed today that the kidnappers really expcted him to go to the address given. A check-up of drug stores in Sixty-third Street led to one where a clerk said he was called to the telephone at 3:30 P. M. by a man he judged to be young because of his voice. The caller asked for Mr. Franks and requested the druggist to see if he were in the store. Ten minutes later the same voice made the same request.


"a voice judged to be young"--NY Times does Leopold and Loeb some favors, but not consistently

	...The pair of spectacles found near the body and at first believed to be the property of the lad presents a peculiar phase of the case. They are horn-rimmed and narrow in width, made for a person of narrow head but with a large nose and for one near-sighted, the police deduce. Finding of the owner of the spectacles will go far toward solving the mystery, they believe.


iirc Leopold and Loeb said once they knew the glasses were discovered they were in trouble, and they were reading press reports about the case

worth looking at the murder their family was sued for--what did the press say then?


	...more tangible clues. The writer has not been traced, but the letter was one a well educated person would compuse and was written on a small typewriter of the folding type

	...The missive demanding payment of $10,000 ransom, received by Mrs. Franks, is similar in many respects to one in a detective story in a recent issue of a magazine

	..Oculists expressed the belief that the eye glasses were intended for a woman. Search was made for the boy's clothing or the ashes if it had been burned.

	...The lettering on the envelope containing the demand for $10,000, despite obvious effort to disguse drafting ability, shows the uniform slant, spacing and character of skilled workmanship.

	In general, experts say, the handiwork is not that of one trying to letter well, but that of an adept attempting to letter poorly.


How might Leopold and Loeb read this? maybe "we know you did it, but we won't charge you for rape and murder."

If Leopold were under this assumption, it wouldn't explain why he admitted to planning on killing Franks to the police. It might have been that he was willing to admit a lesser crime in order to avoid charges of a greater one.

later, Leopold would tell police that he was looking for someone to kill:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
Leopold:

	...The next problem was getting the victim to kill. This was left undecided until the day we decided to pick the most likely-looking subject that came our way. The particular case happened to be Robert Franks. 



what's up with deciding glasses were for a woman?


...


May 24, 1924, pg 1 Chicago Tribune


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880634

headline "KIDNAPPEND BOY DIED FIGHTING"

a large picture entitled "THE MURDERER", with a man reading newspaper stories entitled "Brutal Murder," a loudly ticking clock and eyes on the walls and furnature. Subtitle "As he knows the circle is closing in."


	RANSOM MOTIVE IN FRANKS CASE: CHIEF HUGHES

	Wolff Agrees; Others Seek Perverts.

	...By JAMES DOHERTY.

	...Varied Theories of Death

	...Some of the police and some persons close to the Laddy believe the boy the victim of a degenerate who sought to cloak his act and the boy's presumed accidental death by the demands for money.

	Again, some officials were seeking an enemy of the father, one whom perhaps, in his former business of pawn broker, he had caused to be seen to the penitentiary or one whom he had bested in a financial deal that may have beggared the loser. But Franks' reputation in the old days as in recent years was good.


why do these paragraphs follow each other? not sure what we are supposed to read into from this unless author likes non-sequetors

	...Died of Suffocation

	...The boy had struggled so violently with his captors, presumably in an automobile, he had sustained an internal hemorrhage, which accounted for the discoloration of his heart, lungs, liver, and other organs, the coroner believed.


Doherty presumes Franks struggled in an automobile and died that way


	What Autopsy Showed

	The external examination as well as the autopsy led to the report to the coroner that young Franks had not been the victim of a pervert. Neither had he been drowned, though found in water, nor had the bruises on his head been of such chracter as to cause either a fracture of the skull or concussion of the brain, the coroner's advisers stated.


the coroner found evidence of rape, but his advisors told the Chicago Tribune that Franks "had not been the victim of a pervert" 


	If the belief that the boy's death came while in the hands of men whose on and only object was extortion is correct, the police have nothing on which to work except the tracing of the typewriter, and a few other odds-and-ends clews, it was admitted.


Doherty reports police "admit" that the typewriter and "odds and ends" are the only clues



goes on to report Coronor Wolff's theory that Franks died struggling in a car after being gagged, and that Hughes agrees with Wolff

	
	...Some of his lieutenants though differently, however, and acted accordingly.

	Chief Hughes also advanced as a possible theory that the death of young Franks might have been the result of hazing. He said he had learned that there was a considerable feeling engendered against young Franks during the ball game he had umpired just before his disappearance. He suggested that the defeated boys might have decided to get even with the umpire and that Franks might have died accidentally while they were subjecting him to rough horseplay. This, Hughes said, was based on nothing more than a surmise.


Why are they telling all their theories to the press?


goes on to have large section on "hunt for morons" and police theory that killers were morons


also pushes theory that glasses belonged to a woman, apparently missing that a boy could have carried out the crime

another story headlined "GLASSES NEAR BODY NOT SUCH AS MAN WEARS SMall Lenses and Frame, Opticians Say"


...


May 25, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/25/101599057.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/25/101599057.pdf

	NOW THREATEN LIFE OF FRANKS' SISTER

	Slayers of Chicago Boy Say in Letter She Will Be the Next — Police Guard Home.

	"CONFESSION" TO POLICE

	Man Shoulders Crime, Says he Plans Suicide -- Woman Sought in Spectacles Clew


	CHICAGO, May 24. — Terror stricken, the kidnappers and murderers of 13-year-old Robert Franks sought today to stop the hunt for them by threatening the life of Josephine Franks, sister of the slain boy, in a letter sent to the father, Jacob Franks, millionaire watchcase manufacturer. 

	The threat was sent in a special delivery letter unsigned, which was received at 10 o'clock this morning. It read:

	"You dirty skunk. Your daughter will be next."

	Samuel Etelson, former Corporation Counsel, was at the Franks home when the threat was received.

	...Mr. Ettelson then came to the door and made the following statement to newspaper men:

	"A letter to Mr. Franks purporting to be from the kidnapper was recieved this morning. It threatens the members of the family with death unless the investigation into the boy's disappearance and death is discontinued We expect developments."


someone threatens Franks family unless investigation stopped

	
	"A short time before the letter was received a woman called up and I spoke to her. She told me she had been living with a confidence man whom she suspected might have engineered the plot to steal the boy. She said he had spoken to her a number of times about kidnapping and that one time, she understood, he was mixed up in such an affair."

	"She said she left him because of his actions. She said he also was in the habit of having various persons around their home and that he had been frequenting a poolroom at Sixty-third Street and Cottage Grove Avenue. The woman gave me her name and also that of the man."

	"We will not make these known until we have investigated the information. She  told us that he had a typewriter."


shortly before the letter, a woman called Ettelson to say she suspected an ex of hers, a con-man, of the murder. Said frequented poolroom at 63rd street and gave name.

"will not make these known until we have investigated"


goes on to say Robert E. Crowe and Police Cheif collins were now taking charge of the investigation


	...Chief Collins received a letter today purporting to be from the man who killed the boy, in which the writer said he was sorry and would probably be dead when the letter was received. The Chief said he believed it was written on the same typewriter as the letter demanding ransom written last Thursday.

	"Dear Chief," the letter said. "I am the murder and kidnapper of the Franks boy. When you get this letter I will probably be dead. I intend to commit suicide. I am very sorry I did that inhuman piece of work."

	"A SORRY MAN."

	The letter was mailed last night at an outlying sub-station.

	The body of an unidentified man was recovered from Lake Michigan today and the police started an immediate investigation to determine his identity and if he might have been the author of the missive.


somebody trying to cover up for Leopold and Loeb? NY Times seems to go along with it.


	A woman was being sought today as one knowing something of the crime. This fact and an automobile license number were all that the police allowed to become known of their plans. Four men, one an instructor and another a former instructor at the private school which the boy attended, were detained for further examination.

	At least two slight clues previously had pointed to the possibility that a woman was involved. The first was the pair of heavy rimmed spectacles picked up near the culver where the boy's nude body was found on Thursday. These were of straight bows, such as are usually worn by women, and, narrow from the temple to temple, and were worn by a man of narrow frontal or a woman. The second clue was the statment of a woman living near the swamp by the culver, who told of seeing in the neighborhood a man and a woman in an automobile apparently in a disagreement.

	The spectacles were made to order from a prescription, a Chicago optician declared. The wearer, the optician believed, was of a nervous, perhaps neurotic tendency, rather intellectual and temperamental, and one leading a sedentary life.


say a woman was wearing the glasses, and someone say a man and woman in a car arguing near culvert where body is found

building up toward different suspects from Leopold and Loeb, a man and a woman, with the man having already committed suicide

	
	Coroner Oscar Wolff announced that the boy was a victim of suffocation, after his chemists had found no external couse of death, and no metallic poisons, and concluded that a hand or cloth pressed over the lad's mouth brought death.


if the woman were to testify, could give an account where it would be easy for jury to believe she didn't murder Franks herself


	The instructors held are Fred Altwood, who formerly was a science teacher at the private school, and Walter Wilson, instructor in mathematics there. The others are Fred Cretors and his son, Joseph, friends of Kenneth Booth, until recently a room mate of one of the instructors. One of the men held lives two blocks from the Sixty-third Street drugstore, where Thursday afternoon two telephone calls were received from a man asking if Jacob Franks, the father, was there.


had some teacher in custody, mentioned one close to the 63rd street drug store


	At the Franks home there was fear that a bomb would be throw and one police guard thrown around the house was instructed to be exceptionally vigilant, to allow nothing to escape their sight or hearing in the neighborhood. Occupants of every automobile that passes or approaches close to the Ellis Avenue building are undergoing scrutiny.


NY times offers that a bomb may be thrown at Franks house and the police officer there will be espeicially vigilant


	All the authorities apparently agreed tonight that the boy was kidnapped for money alone and not through any motive of revenge, and that he was probably suffocated by his captors, possibly accidentally.


speaks of an agreement that Franks was killed accidently


	...Plans were made at the stricken home today for the funeral of the lad who was slain. It probably will be held Monday morning with only the family and immediate relatives in attendance. The mother is near collapse.

	In a statement issued early in the day Mr. Franks said that money meant nothing to him now and that he was ready to spend $1,000,000 to bring the slayers of his son to justice.


...

May 25, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880848/


	...A chauffeur, Phillip Van De-voorde, said he had seen it Tuesday afternoon in front of the school, and again Wednesday afternoon, a few minutes before 'Bobbie's" last ball game ended.

	The chauffeur says he saw two men in it.


Doherty writes that "a chauffer" had seen a car in front of Franks' school day of and before kidnapping

"saw two men in it"

reports he saw it day of kidnapping, the 21st


Doherty writes of the two letters threatening Franks family and saying killer committed suicide

	...Whether the ltters were only added indications that subnormal persons are trying mischievously to muddle the strange crime mystery had not been determined last night. The helephone at the home of the distracted and terror-stricken father, Jacob Franks, multi-millionaire and former pawn-broker, had been ringing all day with suggestions, hints of threats, consoltation messges from strangers and "tips," the callers being mostly "bugs " int he opinion of the persons answering.

	...Cheif Collins seemd to take some stock in the authenticity of the letter giving notice of the murderer's impending suicide. A casual inspection, however, indicatd that it had not been written on the same typewriter as had the letter demanding $10,000 ransom for Robert.

	...The other letter suggesting an attempt to intimidate the already bereaved father was taken seriously It was assumed to hav ebeen written for the purpose of halting th eintesive man hunt started Thursday, when Robert's body was found.


goes on to repeat story of woman who called up Ettelson


Doherty reprints threatening letter and says it points to "revenge theory" against elder Frank


pg 2


	Police Deluged with Tips on How to Trap Boy's Slayer

	A deluge of tips in the Franks kidnapping and murder mystery--some ridiculous, some of possible importance--poured into the detective bureau yesterday and last night by telephone. So many came, in fat, taht Liet Ernest Mueller was assigned to do little else except to receive and catalogue them.

	...Then there was a woman on the northwest side who gave the name of a young man, who, she had heard, had bought a portable typewriter recently. This young man, she said, read dime novels and detective storis and once, she had been told, had been arrested for stealing an automobile tire. She was sure his bent ran to kidnapping.

	A travelling man called up from the Hotel L Salle to offer his theories free of charge. No man who would be brutal enough to kill a young boy, he contended, could have written such a letter as that recieved by Chief of Police Collins. Therefore he reccomended somebody was just playing horse with the chief. 




...

May 26, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/26/104038385.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/26/104038385.pdf
	WREATH FOR VICTIM SENT BY BOY'S SLAYER

	Chicago Florist Describes Purchaser Who Gave Name Signed to Franks Ransom Note.
	
	HUNT FOR HIM FRUITLESS

	Funeral Is Held Under Police Gurad, Which Also Accompanies Body to Cemetery.

	CHICAGO, May 25. — The supposed kidnapper and slayer of Robert Franks, 13 years old, sent a wreath for the funeral of his victim, held today at the millionaire father's residence. 

	"Sympathy of George Johnson" was inscribed on the card attached to the floral piece. ...The wreath was discovered among other flows as the lad's body was about to be taken to the cemetery.


taking a page from Beria

goes on to describe car and build of man who delivered the wreath

NY times writes of interview with flourist who sold wreath and suggests this was the man who wrote the ransom letter


	...Mrs. Franks, who has been frantic with anxiety and grief since her son's disappearance last Wednesday, sat in a dazed quiet throughout the service. She had sat for three hours alone in the room with her son's body.

	The parents and their 17-year-old daughter Josephine were escoted by one of the police guards stationed at the home.




...


May 26, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882215/


headine 'GIRL VANISHES AS FRANKS DID'

	DISSAPPEARS ON SAME DAY NEAR KIDNAPPING SPOT

	Paths from School Must Have Met.

	BY JAMES DOHERY.

	Accounts of the disappearance of Gertrude Barker, 17 year old student of St. Xavioer's academy, led the police to believe last night she may have been kidnaped jointly with Robert Franks last Wednesday.

	She had been missing since the time Robert, the 14 year old boy killed by his abductors, was last seen alive at Ellis avenue and 49th stret. Her usual course from the school to her home at 4866 Blackstone avenue would have taken her past the kidnaping corner; she left St. Xavier's at 49th and Cottage Grove avenue about 5 p. m. Wenesday--the same time Robert left his school at 4731 Ellis avenue, homeward bound--and from that time the girl has been listed as "missing."

a previous report by doherty mentioned an eyewitness saying a woman was in the back seat of the car seen near Franks' school


https://books.google.com/books?id=kROWe7LFLDQC&pg=PA58&lpg=PA58&dq=Gertrude+Barker+St+Xavier&source=bl&ots=xdC3aND16f&sig=fvL0ueEsjP8fNabL6Nxd7uURAps&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiRuvLb5YHaAhVKMqwKHbUSCREQ6AEIKTAA#v=onepage&q=Gertrude%20Barker%20St%20Xavier&f=false

	...The girl's relatives believed she may have seen the Franks abduction and had become a victim herself. Newspapers printed a detailed map: "Where the Kidnapping Trails Met?" Miss Barker eventually appeared safe and sound a few days later. She said she became tired of school and wanted an "adventure." Police found her keeping house for the owner of a Kenwood stable on Forty-Ningth Street, where several wealthy men kept their horses.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882215/
	...Miss Barker's aunt fears that Gertrude might have been a chance witness to the seizure of Robert, and was therefore taken along by the kidnapers.

	...When the assembled detectives and state's lawyers learned of the injection of the strong possibility that Gertrude was in the clutches of the slayers of Robert there was a hurried change of tactics in an effort to prevent harm to the girl if, as is feared, she has not already suffered such harm.

	There were other circumstances to bear out the belief Gertrude set her foot into the network of the plot, and was taken along to prevent her ever identifying Robert's kidnapers.


maybe she was a witness?

	
	New Drive Under Way.

	So convincing were these circumstances that intensified efforts to apprehend the plotters were launched last night.

	...Saw Woman in Car.

	That verified Irvin Hartman's statement, establishing almost to a certainty that Robert had been whisked away in the Winton car with two men. Later, Mrs. Alfred Anderson, 11248 Parnell avenue, said she had seen an automobile of the same description at 113th and Michigan avenue Wednesday night about 8 p. m.

	"An excited woman" was in the automobile, she said, as well as an excited man and a bundle in the rear that might have been a huddled human form. That gave rise to the theory that perhaps a woman was among the kidnapers.

	Last night that statement had a new significance. The "excited woman" might very probably have been Gertrude Barker.

	William Lucht, 339 East 40th street, ...a voluntary witness last night, said he had seen two human forms on the floor of a Winton automobile that was passing a street car on which he was a passenger Wednesday night at Cottage Grove and 67th street. He thought both were male, but it was believed likely he couldn't distinguish whether one was Miss Barker, the other RObert Franks.


a witness appears saying he saw two "human forms" in the back of a Winton auto. Doherty offers that one was Barker and the other Franks


	Car Easily REcognized

	The significance of the Winton automobile, nambed by all, police said, is because of the scarcity of machines of that make and their peculiar shape that renders them readily distinguishable to any oe familiar with automobiles.


could the police have investigated who rented a Winton?


	...When it was established that Miss Barker had left her school about 5 p. m. Wednesday and that she would walk east on 49th street past Ellis avenue to her home on Blackstone avenue, the police admitted having grave fears. When they stopped to consider for a few minutes, the regarded the girl's disappearance as quite possibly due to her arrival on the scene when one of the men was in the act of grabbing Robert.

	...Any other theories to account for her disappearance were dropped.


goes on to say Lt grady ordered arrest of man 30-32 years old and giving description as given by the florist W. Laube

Doherty goes on to speculate that the man fitting Laubes description, who bought the wreath, was Franks killer

says theory that killer was a moron and theory that killer was bitter enemy of franks was dropped

last part says 'STILL TRACE SPETACLES' and that either fit woman or a "man with an extremely narrow head"


pg 3

	GIRL, 17, MISSING; FEAR HER VICTIM OF FRANKS PLOT

	Path May Have Crossed That of Dead Boy.

	...Miss Kelly, a graduate nurse, alarmed over the continued absense of the girl, yesterday asked police to redouble their attempts to locate her niece.

	..."Gertrude was always a girl of irreprochable tastes," Mis Kelly said last night. "She had preffered her home and her books to the school friends she had made. She loved to fish and ride, and expected to take up horse-back riding as soon as the weather got warmer and her school closed."

	"I feel sure something untoward has happened to her. She always walked home from school, and would have been on 49th street just about the time that poor little Franks boy was kidnaped. I have talked to the school authorities, and they said she left home shortly before 5 o'clock. Coming over 49th street, she would have been very near Ellis avenue, and I am afraid she saw those terrible kidnapers and they abducted her also, fearing she might tell the police the license number of their automobile."

	...Aside from several schoolmates of the missing girl who remember seeing her start east in 49th street, no witnesses have been found who were able to help the police trace her closer to her home.



...




http://moses.law.umn.edu/darrow/documents/LeopoldAndLoeb.pdf

this has a chronology of events


news may 23 to may 26 1924 summary


Franks night of murdered May 21

according to NY Times report, Franks father got a "strange feeling" his son is in trouble when he doesn't come home the night of the murder and called Senator Ettelson for advice

NY times report says Ettelson and Franks parents got a call 10:30 that evening from kidnappers, Ettelson called telephone company to trace calls

At 2 AM May 22 Ettelson and Franks wen to Detecive Bureau. NY Times says "They decided, however, not to have a police search made then."

Chicago Tribune reported May 23 that Ettelson "told the affair in confidence" to Detective Hughes and Liuet. Schoemaker, whom he knew personally. Tribune reported that Hughes at first intended to keep this secret, in agreement with Ettelson.

body discovered morning May 22, in charge of police	around 10 o'clock that morning

NY Times reports that the police weren't communicating about the kidnapping of Franks, and when they found Franks they assumed he had drowned. Franks body had a large gash on his head, a scar down his back, and discoloration on his face and genitals. He was found nude with a stocking and a pair of glasses nearby.

On may 23 issue NY Times reports a pair of glasses were "stuck grotesquely on the boy's face" "apparently by the kidnappers in an effort to make identification harder"

Chicago Tribune in May 23 issue reports that by 3 am the 22nd or 23rd police were questioning Franks' teachers and searching their rooms. Chicago Tribune reported their names and said the police "hoped to obtain clews"

Chicago Tribune reported May 23 that two coroners Benson and Springer examined the body, but "neither ... could assign a cause for death." According to https://kcjohnson.files.wordpress.com/2012/12/larson-article.pdf
, a coronor found Franks rectum was dilated, which was noted in the final report, but spoke publicly that the body was neither mutilated nor molested. The police initially suspected pedophilia and questioned Franks' teachers.

same article reported Franks was found half-way in a culvert, head first, with a stocking floating in the swamp and a pair of glasses on the bank. Reported "apparently had been tossed into the water and floated into" the culvert. Leopold would later tell the police he shoved Franks into the culvert as far as he could, apparently with some effort. The coronor also found that the scratches on Franks' body were likely from being shoved into the culvert.

The tribune reported that the police visited "instructor wilson," but he wasn't home. A Tribune reporter interviewed him shortly afterward, then the police after that. The tribune reported that Wilson once took Franks out too late and "knows no young women". Around this time, the Tribune would report that the police interrogated many of Franks' teachers.


On may 24, NY Times reported that Franks death was probably accidental. A page 14 article says police "should not 'keep faith' with child stealers." A page 1 article said that "after a day in which neither motive nor positive clues were established," Coronor Wolff developed "the latest acceptable theory" that Franks was killed accidentally by kidnappers seeking ransom money. Wolff's theory was that Franks caused his own death by struggling in the car, or died from suffocation. Wolff says Franks clothes were removed to guard against identification.

In the same report, NY times says "that the boy was not the victim of any mistreatment by a degenerate was also established," apparently citing the thorough investigation of Franks teachers to bolster this point.

The same report says the caller to the druggist was judged young, the letter was by a "well educated person," the ransom demand mimicked a detective story, the eyeglasses were too small for a man. All of these pointed to Leopold and Loeb as the killers.

The Chicago Tribune on May 24 reported similarly: "Random motive in franks case: cheif hughes." The Tribune said some police "seek perverts" in a section on "varied theories of death." The article favored strongly the ransom theory, but mentioned other theories include revenge and hazing. The Tribune also pointed out the glasses wouldn't fit a man, reporting theory that they belonged to a woman.


On May 25th, the NY Times front page reported two letters sent to the Franks--one threatening their daughter and one claiming to be from the murdurer and saying he was suicidal. NY Times mentions Ettelson was there when letter recieved, and that shortly before the letter, a woman called Ettelson saying she suspected her ex of the murder.

The letter said "I'm verry sorry," signed "A SORRY MAN." NY times reported Cheif Collins and Crowe took over the investigation around this time, and reported that Collins thought the "sorry"/"I will soon be dead" letter was typed on the same typewriter as the earlier ransom note. NY times followed this with a paragraph saying the body of a man was recovered that same day.

The report continued that a woman was being sought by police for information, then cited an eyewitness saying she say a woman and a man arguing in a car and the previous report that the glasses would fit a woman. The report said more intstructors were being questioned. Previously it was said that the investigations of the instructors were thorough and proved their innocence. The  said "all authorities apparently agreed" on the ransom motive and that a bomb may be thrown at the Franks' house. The report ended alluding to a statement that Mr. Franks was ready to spend 1 million dollars "to bring the slayers of his son to justice."

The same day, the Chicago Tribune reported on the letters, but said they might be from "subnormal persons" trying to mess with the investigation. The NY Times report on the same emphasized the danger to the Franks. The Tribune said a "Chauffer" had seen a car in front of Franks' school the day of the kidnapping. Later, it was revealed Leopold's chauffer had seen them cleaning blood stains from the car, to which they gave the excuse that they were cleaning wine stains. This Chauffer (Sven Englud) would later be important to the case.

The Chicago Tribune reported that Collins had inspected the letter, but differed from the NY Times, saying "a casual inspection" showed it was not written on the same typewriter as the ransom letter. The Tribune (Doherty) in the same report said the threatening letter pointed to the "revenge theory" against elder Frank.

A page 2 story on the Tribune was on a "deluge of tips" on the murder, some "ridiculous," including one that a young boy who read detective stories might be the murderer.


On May 26, the NY Times reported that a wreath had been sent to Franks' funeral signed "Mr Johnson," a name the kidnappers used. The report leaned heavily on the theory the man who bought the wreath was the killer, relying on a testimony of a flourist

The Chicago Tribune reported that day that 17 year old Gertrude Barker might have been taken by the kidnapers. Dohert and another report emphasized that the timing and path she takes back from school would have put her at the time and place when Frank got into the kidnapers car and that the kidnapers motive was to stop her from telling the police. Later, it would be found that Barker was alive and well. The report emphasized the danger to Barker and that police took this seriously. Multiple witnesses now came forward saying they saw a woman in the back of the kidnapers car.

Doherty's report continued that Lt Grady ordered a search and arrest of a man fitting the description given by the flourist. Dohert speculates this is the killer. The last part of Doherty's report was entitled "still trace spectacles"

A page 3 report cited Barker's aunt saying "I am afraid she saw those terrible kidnapers and they abducted her also, fearing she might tell the police the license number of their automobile." The report pointed out there were no witnesses to Gertrude's dissaperance. 


...

May 27, 1924, pg 23

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/27/119039296.html?pageNumber=23

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/27/119039296.pdf
	PURSUE FUGITIVE AS SLAYER OF BOY

	Fitting Description of Supposed Kidnapper of Franks, He Eludes Chicago Police.
	
	SOUGHT REFUGE IN HOTEL

	Like Man Who Ordered Wreath Sent for Murdered Lad's Funeral

	MISSING GIRL UNTRACED

	Fate of Student Who May Have Seen Kidnapping Now Linked With Crime.

	CHICAGO, May 26. — Detectives hunting the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks were searching tonight for a man who answers in nearly every detail the hypothetical description of one of the criminals, built up by the police from various fragments of evidence. 

	For a time today it was thought that the man sought was surrounded in an apartment hotel building on the south side, where he applied for a room. Squads of detectives were rushed to the building and made a thorough search, but the man eluded them.


if this is Charles Heath doesn't match up with the 2015 report (said he was in a hotel in Kentucky)

	
	The suspected person, slim, exceedingly nervous, about 5 feet 9 inches tall and weighting 140 or 145 pounds, aroused the suspicion of the apartment hotel clerk when he applied for a room. The clerk said he appeared about 35 years old and wore tortoise shell spectacles.


goes on about detectives searching building, spectacles "fitting man with a thin face or by a woman"


	...THe description of the fugitive also fits that of the operator of a gray automobile whom a chauffeuer said he saw driving slowly over the route taken by the Franks boy to and from school two afternooons previous to his disappearance.


NY times reports apparently that the same chauffeur who saw the car near Franks dissapearance says the man in question fits his description, although no description was provided before until the flourist gave one.

goes on to describe search for same type of auto, a search for people with same glasses, and a search for degenerates


says belief that Gertrude Barker was kidnapped "to prevent her from revealing the crime" "gained ground today"


	...This angle of what is still an unsolved mystery caused the temporary detention tonight of a man and two women close to one of the instructors at the Harvard Schoo, which Franks attended. The police were told that an automobile had been seen about two miles from wehre Franks's body was found, at midnight Wednesday, and that two women were in it, one holding a shovel.

	As Franks was not buried but placed in a drain pipe under the Pensylvania Railroad, it was assumed that the shovel was not for digging his grave. The possibility was considered that the shovel might have been for preparing a place to secrete the bdy of Miss Barker if she had seen the kidnappers dragging Robert into the automobile and they had decided to make away with her for fear she would later recognize them.

	Twenty detectives were digging today in various places in the swampy land surrounding the spot where the boy's body was rocovered. All wer esilent when asked if the real purpose of the digging was a search for Miss Barker's body.


a witness now tells the police they saw a car near Franks body with a man, two women, one holding a shove. NY Times suggests this was for a grave for Barker "if she had seen the kidnappers" take Frank, and incinuates that detectives were digging to find Barker's body.

goes on to say Willson and another, Mitchell were still in police custudy, and that Wilson had been whipped with a rubber hose to make him confess. A judge refused to agree on a habeas corpus hearing.


	...Early today three men riding in an automobile answering the description of a machine said to have loitered near the Harvard School were seized at Summit, Ill., and brought here for examination. THey gave a good account of themselves, but will be examined again.

	A story that he had assisted two other men yesterday to lock in a New York Central box car a girl in a blue dress whom he recognized from newspaper pictures today as the Barker girl, was volunteered to the police by Geroge Stray, a farmhand. His story was being investigated by detectives who placed little or no credence in it.


police siezed three men who were in a car near Franks' school. One told police he helped lock up Barker. NY times said police "placed little or no credence in it." The Chicago Tribune had previously published a picture of Barker.


	The police learned today that a telephone call from a man giving the name of "Bryce" was recieved at the home of the girl's aunt twenty-four hours after her disappearance, asking if relatives were looking for her. THe caller declared he knew where she was at the time and then disconnected. In the girl's notebook was found the name of "Josephine Bryce."


someone called Barker's aunt saying he knew where she was 24 hours after Franks dissappearance. NY times says the police learned this today.


	The Chicago Tribune will make the following announcement in tomorrow's paper:

	"The Tribune offers a reward of $5,00 for the exclusive information resulting in the arrest and conviction of the perpetrator of the kidnapping and slaying of the Franks boy."

	"We furthermore guarantee not to use or publish knowingly any clues or tips, te publicity of which would impede the police and other authorties in their efforts to cearl up this unprecedented crime."


NY Times says tomorow the Chicago Tribune will announce that the won't publish any more "tips" that will "impede the investigation"



...


May 27, pg 1, Chicago Tribune

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882535/?terms=Franks

"we furthermore gurantee not to use or publish knowingly any clews or tips"

they published it like NY Times said

another article pg 1:


	BARKER GIRL IS DISCOVERED; NOT KIDNAPED

	Police ORder Sewer Investigated

	...Detectives spent half the night in a fruitless search for the slain boy's clothes in the vicinity of the 105th street and the Panhandle tracks on a top supplied by two men who saw two women standing beside a darkened Dodge car cleaning off a spade the night of the kidnaping.


Chicago Tribune says they were looking for boy's clothes, NY times made it sound like they were looking for Barker's body

goes on to say polie ordered to dig up a sewer near Mitchell's home to look for evidence

also searching "old ice house" were someone named Eckstein said he saw car

says a curios "party of motorists" found a peice of sheeting with a note on it signed by "George Johnson" near the culvert


	...Gertrude Barker, thought for a time to have been the victim of kidnapers, was discovered at the end of a "romantic adventure."


Barker found this day


	...Swamped by "Tips."


says swamped by tips about the winton car, held two cars


	...Detectives were drive nearly frantic with the other "tips" coming into police headquarters. Because of one such tip they surrounded the Tyson apartments, Grand boulevard and 43d street, and searched every room seeking the mysterious "Mr. Johnson," the man who in letters and phone calls admitted being the murderer of Franks.


The Tribune reports this as a spurious tip, while the NY times reported this as "the man eluded them" and took the tip more seriously


goes on to say a cap driver "William Perry" was hired by "two well dressed men" to stake out Franks' home ahead of the murder. Says one 24 and the other 22.


	...Missing GIRL FOUND

	Gertrude Barker, 17 years old, 4848 Blackstone avenue, a student at St Xavier's academy, who disappeared last Wednesday afternoon and who, it was feared, had been kidnaped, was found last night. The police had been searching for her since Sunday night when they were notified by her aunt, Miss Gertrude Kelley, with whom she lived, that the girl had vanished after leaving school on the same day that Robert Franks was kidnaped.

	The girl was found keeping house for Bert H. Jeffery, keeper of a stable at 1030 East 49th street, where several wealthy men keep their riding horses. Over the stable is a seven room apartment. It was here the girl had taken up the duties of sweeping and cooking in preference to her school work at St. Xavier's.

	Seeker After Adventure.

	Miss Barker gave as her reason for leaving the home of her aunt that she was tired of school work and wanted some "adventure." She said that in her home in Yakima, Wash., she had had the freedom of the great outdoors and couldn't stand the cramped quarters of the schoolroom.

	During the day many false reports concerning the girl had come to the police. One was made by George Steight, a farm hand, who said he had been paid a $1 for aiding a man to close a freigh car door in which there was a woman. He identified a picture of Miss Barker as that of the woman he saw in the boxcar.


Chicago Tribune reports that Barker went on an adventure to sweep rooms above a stable, and that it was a "false report" that she had been locked in a boxcar.



pg 2 story:

	Franks Crime Motive Is Ransom Solely; Detective Sutherland Asserts After Survey


	...After a painstaking review of known facts and a careful inspection of the entire vicinity of the crime yesterday William J. Sutherland, nationally known detective, who has been instrumental in running to earth many criminals, gave it as his opinion that Robert Franks was the victim of kidnapers operating solely for gain.

	"Of course the moron angle must not be entirely overlooked," said Mr. Sutherland, "In fact, I was considerable 'sold' to that possible solution myself until I came out here and looked the ground over. But the lay of the land, and other pertinent circumstances, lead me to believe this lad died fighting the efforts of a cold blooded gang to extort what they could from his wealthy father."


goes on to describe two eyewitness and accounts of Winton car driving around the area before the murder

Sullivan describes theory that the kidnapers staked out the boarding house near the culvert as the "ideal hiding place" for Franks while negotiating with Franks parents, and the culvert is hiding place for body if necessary.

Says kidnappers might have picked up a woman "planted" somehwere on the way to boarding house

Sullivan says Franks was probably suffocated at the boarding house then dragged to culvert.

Theorizes that a "member of the gang" didn't know Franks was dead, and this is why he calld Franks parents and asked them to take a taxi. Says the kidnappers were paniced when they realized Franks was dead, and this is why one dropped his clothes. "It was bt the work of amoment" to strip off the clothes "in an effort to conceal the victim's identity."



...


May 28, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/28/104252146.html?pageNumber=1
	SEEK 3 MEN, A WOMAN AS FRANKS SLAYERS

	Chicago Police Get Story of Switchman Who Saw Four With a Bundle.

	PARKED CAR NEAR SWAMP

	Party Seemed Anxious to Escape Observation--Reward for Kidnappers now $16,000

	CHICAGO, May 27. — Continuance of the search for the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks today centred on a search for three men and a woman who drove a dark-colored sedan into the lonely Wolf Lake Forest Preserve on the night of the boy's death and were seen to deposit a bulky package near the railroad culvert where his body was found. 


says state attorney crowe got this tip for a switchman in Indiana


	"...Three men and one woman jumped out. ONe of the men was carrying a bundle under his arm. At the time I thought it must be a tent. The four disappeared in the woods. I na few moments they reappeared--this time without the bundle.


saws he helped them out from being stuck in the mud, the seemed in a hurry to leave, and they gave him $5. Says "I am confident now the four were the slayers and that the bundle contained the boy's clothes."

NY times says Mitchell and Wilson still in detention and "certain statements attributed to Mitchell and said to have been verified by another instructor have resulted in their detention."

	
	...Earlier in the day Samuel A. Ettelson, former State Senator, friend and adviser of the Franks family, was publicly quoted as saying:

	"ONe instructor at the Harvard School killed Robert Franks. Another wrote the polished letter demanding $10,000 from the family."

	Mr. Ettelson denied making the statement, although he appeared with the State's Attorney's forces in Judge de Young's Court at the hearing of the habbeas corups writ and admitted he was interested in seeing that the movements of Mitchell and Wilson on the night of the crime were checked.

	Mr. Ettelson, the article stated, had declared his intention of appearing as the "friend of the Court" and demanding that Judge De Young refuse the writ.

	"I shall say, 'your honor, you wouldn't let a man who has admitted he is a moron go free when such an atrocious crime has been committed,'" ran the quotation. "The instructor who wrote the letter was a cultured man--a man who committed the actual crime is a man who needed money and who had a mercenary motive."


NY times putting words in Ettelson's mouth? not sure what's going on here but apparently they wanted the instructors blamed and Ettelson to go along with it.


	Discovery was made that a semi-anual interest payment on a $10,000 mortage on the Mithcell home was due on the day of the kidnaping. The records show that Mitchell and his wife jointly gave a promissory note for the amount in September, 1922. Some of the theorists recalled the coincidence that the ransom demanded of Franks's father was $10,000.


points to profit motive of Mitchell due to him having a mortgage payment due day of kidnapping.

goes on to say man matching flourists description was arrested "while driving a gray automobile." Says gray car was seen near Harvard School before kidnaping. real name is "Adolph Papritz."

Papritz denied knowing about the kidnapping and said he was motoring with a young woman that afternoon

next p says Mitchell's sewer drained in search for clothes, giving imrpession zeroing in on Mitchell

mentions finding Barker in one paragraph. Said Bert H. Jeffery, the stable keeper there, "was held"



book summarizing some of the "dead ends" police followed: https://books.google.com/books?id=MDR7qQbEnRoC&pg=PA61&lpg=PA61&dq=%22Adolph+Papritz%22&source=bl&ots=o87mmTPs9w&sig=7U8rAl5hrKKvbqcUWkau_mtEeI0&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjRlrLX24PaAhUp5oMKHXJCC2AQ6AEIQzAF#v=onepage&q=%22Adolph%20Papritz%22&f=false


...


May 28, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882962/?terms=Franks


headline "Raid Dope Rings for Franks' Slayers"

article

	SEE WORK OF DRUGGED MIND IN KIDNAPING

	Two Taken at North Side Hotel


	Evidence that cocaine addicts, at the behest of a well-informd "master-mind" slew young Robert Franks, has been in the hands of the police for several days, it became known last night.

	This developed when it leaked out that State's Attorney Crowe and Chief Collins, acting in cooperation, have ordered a general search for dope fiends, expecting that through a process of elimination to single out those who acted in the murder conspiracy.


Tribune reports police had evidence for several days that cocaine addicts killed Franks, and that Crowe and Collins ordered rounudp of dope fiends


	...Explains His Theory.

	State's Attorney Crowe reluctantly outlined the plan through whic it now is expected to round up the slayers of young Franks.

	"It is apparent from the investigations thus far," said the state's attorney, "that the killing of the Franks boy was not accomplished by professional criminals. The professional criminal would not take such chances. He would not kill a boy and then undertake all the foolish risks of sending letters, making telephone calls, and sending taxicab chaufeurs on wild goose chases. If a professional had killed young Franks he would have disposed of the body and fled. He would not have spent his time in contriving fanciful hoaxes.


Crowe says must be a dope fiend because a professional wouldn't risk himself sending letters, making calls, sending a cab

what happened to Sullivan's theory?


	Drops Pervert Theory.

	"It is not to be considered tenable that the boy's attackers were perverts. They wouldn ot have bothered about sending letters and chauffeurs to complicate the matter. I have discussed this phase with eminent psychiatriats and they tell me that this type of crime is most likely to have been committed by amateurs in great need of money."


Crowe says "not tenable" that pervers did it, since they wouldn't have bothered with the letters and cabs, and "eiminent psychiatriats" said usually this type of crime committed by amatuers who need money


	"We shall, by a process of elimination, try to find some one user of drugs who was sufficiently well aquianted with the habits and movements of the Franks family to have contrived a kidnaping plot. That some one would not have attempted the crime himself. He would have enngaged some on else to do it for him. The killing was an accident, and everything that followed was undertaken to cover the accident. Dope will be found at the bottom of it all."


Crowe asserts that "dope will be found at the bottom of it all."


	SEIZE TWO YOUTHS

	Police inquiry into the Franks murder case was suddenly diverted into an entirely new channel last night with the arrest of two young men at the Sheridan Plaza hotel, on Sheridan road.


two arrested were De Witt White 23 and Edward Wellington 38. "Both admitted recent bootleggin activites in Chicago."


	...Quiz More Witnesses

	...Act Today on Teachers


goes over mortage thing with Mitchel and purported statement by Ettelson on teachers

	...Ettelson heatedly denied making the statement.


pg 2

	
	Harvard School Not Hurt by Franks Case, Principal Says


has some quotes in support of Mitchell


another article:


	...EVEN DOGS BARK AT GRAY CARS


implies everyone driving a gray Winton being stopped and questioned for murder, with some humorous quotes, including one by the "first man to go insane trying to solve the Franks case"



...


May 29, 1924 pg 16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/29/104038814.html?pageNumber=16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/29/104038814.pdf
	FREED IN FRANKS CASE.

	Two Instructors Fail to Give Chicago Police Clues.

	CHICAGO, May 28. — Admissions were made tonight by the police and State prosecutors that the kidnapping and murder of Robert Franks is still a mystery to them and that there is not a definite "lead" for them to follow. Whatever expectations they had of connecting Walter Wilson and Mott K. Mitchell, instructors at the Harvard School, with the crime were shattered when both were released on a writ of habeas corpus today. 


NY times says teachers freed and they failed to give "clues"


Wilson held seven days and Mitchell three

on delay of habeaus corpus:

	
	...One of the reasons which led the State to ask for delay was a desire to have a gardener see Mrs. George D. Chase, Wilson's landlady. Robert Orr, gardner for Harold Swift, had told of seeing a woman who was "visibly pertured" searching about the shrubbery near the Harvard School about the time of Franks's disappearance. Mr.s Chase denied being near the Harvard School on that date.

	...The police began a round-up of drug addicts today folowing information that the kidnappers were users of narcotics.



...


May 29, 1924, pg 1 Chicago Tribune


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883425/?terms=Franks


	Jail Policeman in Franks Quiz; Tutors Freed

	"SLAYER KNOWS ME," DECLARES FATHER OF BOY

	Gives First Story of His Theories.

	DEVELOPMENTS

	1. Thomas Gilfoyl, a former policeman, is being held incommunicado in the detective bureau for questioning. He has made no statement and Chief of Detectives Hughes has refused to say what connection Gilfoyle is supposed to have had with the mystery.

	2. Mott K. Mitchell and Walter E. Wilson, Harvard school instructors, are released on writs after bieng held for days on suspicion in connection with the slaying of young Franks.

	3. Jaco Franks gives out first statement at length on his views of the kidnaping and murder of his son. He declares the slaying is as mysterious now as when it was first discovered.

	4. Cheif of detectives requests the arrest of two men and a woman in a sedan "somewher ein Missouri." This followed a lengthy telegram describing the motor party supposd to have been seen in the vicinity of the death culvert.

	5. A crowd of moron suspects and dope addicts are jailed at the close of a day of raids conducted in the hope of getting evidence to support the dope-murder theory.


	...THE FATHER'S THEORY

	BY JOHN HERRICK


opens with some peotry about grey ghosts whispering in Jacob Franks ear

	
	...While he waits he tortures his memory for faces and names, the faces and names of murderers.

	"They are persons Robert knew. They are persons I know," he says. "I have been racking my brains trying to think who they could be."

	...He has not the solace of activity. He must stand aside and wait, and grope for that name, while the man hunt goes on. 


	..."And since Robert knew them, I must know them. Whoever it was who kidnaped my boy, did so for the ransom. It was the money they were after. They knew his habits. They knew my love for him, and that I would willingly pay any sum to have him back. But Robert recognized them, and they grew afriad, and strangled him."

	Again, there was no tremulousness as he lit a cigaret and puffed at it until it glowed. But the fingers of the hands folded in his lap stirred restlessly when he came upon the word "baby."


funny, wasn't Leopold known as "Babe"?


	...Always Considered as "Baby."

	Robert was always "baby" to his father and mother...


pg 3


	EX-COP SEIZED; SECRET INQUIRY IN FRANKS CASE

	Teachers Freed WhenNo Charge Is Made.

	Thomas Glifoyle, a discharged policeman, developed as a mysterious entry in the mazes of the Robert Franks kidnaping murder case when it became known late last night that for the last twenty four hours he had been held in detecive burea cell.

	Until recently Gillfoyle had served in the office of Sil Mayer, secretary of the police department. He was summarily dismissed following investigation of charges made by a young woman.

	Word was sent out for Gilfoyle's arrest on Turesday, and since then he has been held incomunicado as part of his pregrilling "treatment."

	Won't Discuss HIs Case.

	How he is connected with the investigatino of the Franks murder, State's attorney Crowe and Chief of Detective Hughes refused to state. That will develop in good time, they intimated mysteriously.


former cop Gilfoyle arrested, Crowe and Hughes mysterious about why

Gilfoyle had apparently done something untoward to a young woman and was fired before

goes on to say a Mr.s Bemon reported that she had been beaten by someone matching description of Johnson, and police were investigating

writes that the theory that it must have been a dope fiend was "taking firmer hold"

says a former instructor who was dismissed "after several pupils accused him" was being "particularly sought." "That man wrote letters to a boy." (1924 Anthony Weiner?)

reported on story about gardner seeing Mrs. Chase looking around bushes from NY times before. Reports Chase says she was chasing a cat named Wilson.


another pg 3 story:

	Try to See Franks Slayer Through His Sepctacles

	When all their theories, inquisitions and hunts after slayers had ended either in circles or landed them in blind alleys, the police last night came back to their only clew to the murder of Robert Franks--the zylonite, toric spectacles dropped on the dreary railroad embankment fifteen feet from the culvert into which the body was stuffed.

	This seemingly slender clew took MICHEAL HUGHES on a new importance. Cheif of Detectives Michael Hughes and his men this morning will turn their entire attention to it in an effort to accomplish the almost impossible task of tracing their ownership.

	The chief of detectives believes the solution of the baffling mystery lies in the ownership of the eyeglasses.

	"I am convinced," he said, "that if we can find the owner of those spectacles we will have the case cleared up in a few hours."


poitns out all of the theroies and hunts had ended in dead ends, and that Hughes came back to the spectacles, believes now that this is the solution


	At the same time he pointed out the difficulty of this task in that the spectacles are not unusual, but a common prescription such as might have been purchased from any of a hundred opticians without the taking of any very definite or direct records as to the identity of the purchaser.


The glasses ended up being the official story of what led them to Leopold. iirc it was said only three people in Chicago purshaed a similar pair.


article goes on to say however owned the glasses must have been a non-physical laboring and intellectual person


if they could trace the owner of the glasses, why did the round up every single, pervert, teacher, drug fiend, and driver of a gray Winton in Chicago before then?


...


Friday, May 30, 1924 pg 14



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/issue.html
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.

	Baffled as Yet Completely

	It is too soon to conclude that the Chicago police are going to fail to discover the murderer or murderers of the little FRANKS boy, but it is a fact that in a whole week they have accomplished nothing except to bring suspicion of the most terrible sort on persons against whom they can have no real evidence And yet, in the beginning, the case did not look particularly difficult.


NY Times suggests they might fail to discover the murderer.

Points out all they did this week is raise suspicion of people they don't have real evidence on yet, even though case didn't look difficult


	The detectives were able to get to work on it only a few hours after the boy was killed. Their search was confined within a narrow area, and clues apparently valuable were numerous. The letter demanding ransom was peculiar enough, both as a speciimen of type-writing and as indicative of the author's education status, to promise help. There were telephone messages, too, that gave hints along the same line as the letter.


Also had glasses, them being too small for a man, druggist saying caller young, letter being plagarized from a detective story, and rental of a gray Winston that was never reported looked at in press if it was ever looked at.

actually they didn't rent a gray Winton, they rented a blue Willys-Knight... why were there so many eyewitness accounts of two men and "human forms" in the back of a gray Winton?


	...Sending the wreath looks more like the act of somebody whose mind had been unbalanced by brooding over the mystery than like anything the murder would do on any theory of his mental quality, and probably it can be dismissed as irrelevant.


NY times now decides the wreath guy can be dismissed


	...Considering the father's wealth, the ransom asked, $10,000, was small. The theory that blackmail was a mere afterthought and subterfuge, to distract attention from other impulses, has some plausibility, for this very reason, but it is a possibility rather than a probability.
		

now says possible the blackmail was to distract from "other impulses", but a "possibility" not a "probability"

NY Times goes on to say NY police better than chicago police, Chicago police "have not enhacned their reputations"

compares case to Staten Island case of "Mrs. Bauer"


	...In Richmond County, however, accepting the jury's verdict as correct, the pursuit, after a little casting about, led straight to the man HOFFMAN, the piling up of evidence agasint him was intelligent and the decision against him seeon became almost inevitable.

	...Dislike of capital punishment may have had something to do with the nature of the verdict reached, and still more the Judge's charge to consider the prisoner's conduct both as to its compatibility with guilt and its incompatilibty with innocence. It is almost impossible to believe that an innocent man so soon would begin to guard against the suspicion which he expected to fall on him and still harder to believe that an innocent man would not have, ready-made, a better alibi than Hoffman was able to invent.

	Staten Island has a right to feel pride in its administration of justice, as illustrated in this case--in the skill of its police, the efficienecy of its District Attorney, the impartiality of its Judge and the commons sense of its jurors.


Not the first time they covered up a "noble" murder/rape and tried to blame it on a "slave"?


...

May 30, 1924, Chicago Tribune pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883812/?terms=franks

headline "FRANKS CASE NEAR SOLUTION"

	MILLIONAIRE'S SON ON GRILL; GLASSES AGREE

	Nathan Leopold Jr. New Suspect.

	Nathan Leopold Jr., 4754 Greenwood avenue, 19 year old student marvel, son of a millionaire, and conencted with some of the wealthiest families in Chicago, was held this morning in the office of State's Attorney Robert E. Crowe, where he was being questioned about the murder and kidnapping of a 13 year old Robert Franks.

	Leopold had been taken to the criminal court building shortly after 1 o'clock after he had been charged with the ownership of the eye glasses which were found on the prairie at 121st street and the Pennsylvania tracks near the culvert in which the body of young Franks was discovered last Thursday.

	Had Been at Death Culvert.

	Leopold admitted the ownership of a similar pair of glasses; that a few days earlier he had been at the spot where Franks' body was found; that he had lost his glasses.

	Further questioning had elcited the admission that he was the owner of a typewriter thought to be similar to the one which the letter demanding a ransom of $10,000 for the return of the kidnapped Franks boy had been written. The officials questioning him had sent for this typewriter, while they continued their interrogation into the early hours in the morning.


leaves it open if he were the murderer so far, could have let him argue he simply lost his glasses, but the typewriter thing makes it sound like they'd already made up their mind

	
	Seven Others Arrested.

	Meantime four other arrests had been made in Chicago and three in Indianapolis as the result of the following up of the story that the kidnapers had used a gray WInton car in carrying out their crime. These arrests, while important, where somehwat dwarfed in significance by the developments in the state's attorney's office.


arrests were still going on anyway, but Chicago Tribune says Leopold arrest more important


	An earlier theory that CHarles Heath, a Chicago druggist, who is apparently dying from poison in a Lousville hospital, held the solution of the mystery had practically been abandoned. Heath's condition is believed to be indirectly due, however, to worry over the fact that he was suspected of knowing something about the Franks case and had been placed under surveillance by the Chicago police.


did they mention Heath before? should check

report now that he was a suspect but this theory abandoned, say he is dying of poison, condition "indirectly due" to worry over being suspect 


	Trace Glasses to Leopold.

	The clew which led to young Leopold being questioned came, as predicted, from tracing the sale of the eye glasses which were found near the body. Almer Coe & Co. had discovered earlier in the week that they were the maker of the glasses. They seared their records and found that a pair of such a prescription had been sold to young Leopold; that the discovered glasses tallied exactly with those they sold to Leopold.


reports earlier in week company that made glasses found out they made them. The "searched their records" and found out a pair was sold to Leopold

	
	...Richard Loeb, son of the late vice president of Sears, Roebck & Co., who was a companion of young Leopold, was also taken to the state's attorney's office, although suspicion was in no way directed against him.


mentions Loeb in questioning but says not under suspicion


	Crowe Conducts Quiz.

	When the boys arrived there State's Attorney Crowe himself began their examination.

	"Have you ever been in the vicinity of the place where young Franks' body was found?" was his first question.

	Leopold did not hesitate.

	"Yes, I have been there fifty times," he said.

	Then he explained.

	"You see, I am interested in ornithology. I frequently go there with classes and with companions."

	Thinks Glasses Are at Home.

	The state's attorney flashed before his eyes the spectacles with the horn rims which have played so important a part in the mystery.

	"Are these your glasses?" He asked. "I don't think so, was the answer. I think mine are at home."

	There was a pause in the inquiry.

	Again detectives visited the Leopold home and searced the premises. They could find no trace of the glasses which young Leopold believed were there, but they did find a case with the name of Almer Coe & Co. printed on the lid.

	With their return and report the questioning turned upon whether it was possible that young Leopold had lost his glasses near the death culvert He admitted that he might have done so.

	"I told you I had been there frequently," he said. "I believe I was there either the Friday or the Saturday just before the murder. I might have dropped them on that occasion."

	Leopold said that young Loeb had sometimes accompanied him on excursions to the vicinity of the culvert, and this was corroborated by young Loeb.


Leopold gave different account on first questioning


	...Then the interrogatory turned to other phases of the Franks case. Leopold was shown the letter in which $10,000 had been demanded of Jacob Franks for the return of his son unharmed.

	"This letter was written by an educated man," said Mr. Crowe. "Do you think that you could have written such a letter?"

	Could Write a Better Letter.

	"Yes, I could easily duplicate it, if I couldn't write a better one," he said. "There is one mistake in the letter. The word kidnaping is spelled kidnapping. I noticed it at the time." Then he admitted owning and operating a typewriter.

	"I've written many articles on birds and nature," he explained.


	...Once Harvard School Student.

	He said he had been a student of the Harvard school, the one attended by young Franks, before going to the university.

	The question drited into a channel which he appeared to find welcome. It was that of perversion.

	"Yes, I have made a study of perversion, although I have never practiced any forms of it," he admitted. "I was a deep student of the writings of an Italian who made a study of perversion and wrote about it during the sixteenth century. At one time I thought of making a free translation of the writings of this author, who created thrity-two different forms of perversion.

	"I was dissuaded by one of the professors of the University of Chicago, who told me such a translation would be too sordid a thing to distribute among my friends, as I had intended to do. I finally gave up the idea, but I don't think he was altogether right. There may have been the sordid side to his writings, but there were some beautiful sides to the work of the old Italian."


Chicago Tribune hanging him up for target practice

get impression author doesn't like him and doesn't want him to get away with it, letting Leopold incriminate himself and putting it in the paper


who was this Renassiance Italian who did a "study of perversion?"

Florence was famous for sodomy of young boys around that time: http://articles.latimes.com/1997/nov/02/books/bk-49205/2

the sodomites would get persecuted (?) by the Catholic church, cut off their testicles and penis https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LGBT_history#Florentine_homosexuality

guessing whatever happened then, justice or not, would fit in with Neitzche whiny narrative of "the christians are holding me back from doing what I want"

In Germany "florentine" became byword for "sodomite," with sodomy referring specifically to the rape of young boys as was done in ancient greece


http://articles.latimes.com/1997/nov/02/books/bk-49205/2
	"In a letter in 1523 to Niccolo Machiavelli," Rocke writes, "Francesco Vettori [Florence's ambassador to the Papal Court], responded to his friend's concerns about his own son Lodovico's intimacy with a younger boy. Vettori recommended indulgence, and recalled their own youthful experience: 'Since we are verging on old age, we might be severe and overly scrupulous, and we do not remember what we did as adolescents. So Lodovico has a boy with him, with whom he amuses himself, jests, takes walks, growls in his ear, goes to bed together. What then? Even in these things perhaps there is nothing bad.' "



judging by LA times article and what is written of culture in Italy around that time, whatever Leopold read on study of "perversion" then probably didn't give him very good guidance...


same article continued:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883823/

	Declares He is an Atheist.

	Leopold then declard that he was an atheist and discussed atheism at some length.

	He was brought back to the Franks case. He denied knowing young Franks, but said he was acquainted with the family by reputation. Young Loeb, who was present during all the questioning said he knew the murdered boy personally and had often played tennis with  him. Young Loeb is taking a history course at the University of Chicago.

	During the course of his somewhat desultyory examination young Leopold only once offered anything that savored of a defense.

	He said that Wednesday afternoon that young Franks disappeared he and another boy, whom he did not name, had gone to Lincoln park.

	"I wwne to study the birds," he said. "After we left Lincoln park we went to the Coconut Grove at 53rd street and Eillis avenue. Then we got a bottle of gin and went riding in Washington park. We picked up a couple of girls and we wook them riding with us, but they were of the kind that go home with t heir boots muddy and we made them do it."

	He said he had arrived home the evening the Franks boy disappeared at about 11 o'clock.


lied and gave alibi, but sounds like Chicago Tribune didn't buy it


goes on to describe police raid of 4 people in connection to the gray Winton, concurrent to this

doesn't write about them in any way that makes them sound guilty

continues (none were Charles Heath)

	
	...When police searched Heath's home they found several postcards from him to his wife. One of them read: "Tell Rodney not to get caught. There is a job for him here in Lousville." The police believe this refers to Rodney Wolfe.


Rodney Wolfe the husband of one of the 4 people arrested, who himself was arrested in Indianapolis


article following this one:


	HEATH, SUSPECT, MAY DIE

	Louisville, Ky, May 29--[Spcial.]--

	Two Chicago detectives are watching at the beside of Charles F. Heath, who is in the City hospital here, suspected of knowledge of the Franks kidnaping and murder in Chicago. Heath is a druggist and lives at 2351 Harper avenue.

	Apparently he has twice tried to commit suicide, and apparently the cause was worry over the suspiciouns that had been entertained against him by the Chicago police.

	Heath is unconscious from some mysterious cause--apparently an overdose at some drug like veronal.


reading between the lines, the Tribune does not sound happy with this. While not outright accusing the Chicago police of wrongdoing, the pin the blame of his death on Chicago police

this story could easily continue later into a story on Chicago police corruption, maybe something an astute reader would notice at the time


	Late last week he was under surveillance of the police in Chicago because he had attempted suicide and was in Mercy hospital. The police had been instructed to look carefully into the cases of all would-be suicides.

	On Sunday, in a manner as yet unexplained, Heath escaped from the hospital. The next heard of him was in Lousville this morning.



how did he escape?


goes on about how maid discovered him unconscious, surgeon decided he was under influence of drug or poison


	...All day he has been unconscious. A number of clippings of Chicago newspapers were found in the man's pocket. All had to do with the Franks mystery.

	A letter, apparently written by Heath, intimated that he intended to commit suicide.

	"Please notify Mrs. C. F. Heath, 6251 Harper avenue, Chicago," the letter read. "Please give me full Masonic rites. Thell them that I will not be with them any more."

	His Condition Improves

	C. C. Krause, who lives at 2620 Portland street, this city, and who said he was a cousin of Heath, appeared at the hospital tonight.

	"I saw Charles last Tuesday afternoon," said Krause. "He came to my house, said that he had sold his drug store in Chicago, and that he had come here for a job. He was in good spirits. He left me Tuesday night at 10:30 o'clock going to his hotel."

	Late tonight physicians at the city hospital said that they believed Health's chances for recovery were improving, but that his life was still in the balance.


reported quote from Krause that Heath was in good spirits, which goes looks bad for police theory of suicide


	TRACE CHICAGO MOVEMENTS

	Investigation in Chicago revealed that Heath had been under surveillance of Chicago police until last Sunday, when he managed to elude the officers detailed to watch his bedside at Mercy hosptial. He had been taken to the hospital the day before following an alleged first attempt at suicide by swallowing three bichlordie of mercury tables and a quantity of veronal at his home.

	The police surveillance had resulted from an order of Cheif of Police Collins that all suicides and attemptd suicides be closely checked following his receipt of an anonymous letter purportedly from the Franks slayer declaring the writer's intention of killing himself.


"alleged suicide" and "purportedly from the slayer"--article invites reader to be skeptical


	A quick checkup had revealed that on the night of May 21, the date of the kidnaping, Heath had been absent from his home until a late hour and that his movements were not readily traceable.

	This check was still under way under the supervision of Captain of Detectives Schoemaker when the officers were surprised on Sunday to learn that Heath was no longer at Mercy Hospital.


this makes it sound like he could have been guilty then escaped

more interesting--if a "quick checkup," and police watching, how did he escape, and why?

if checkup finished earlier, Heath escape would have been even weirder

Heath escaping means that he would have another opportunity to commit "suicide" supposedly outside of police watch

goes on to report he was fired day of kidnapping and quote his wife saying he "moped around for two  days," got a "place with some whole-sale drug house" then found him in a "stupor" that night with veronal and mercury tablets on a table.

Wife says she believes "policemen hovering over his bedside at Mercy hospital freightened him half to death." Goes on to say it was "too much for him" and he is "simply suffering delusions now."

"delusions" quote might do him a favor if they were deciding whether or not he should die at that point

a 2015 article in ChicagoNow would cite Heath as another victim of the Franks murder case


a pg 1 story:


	HOW EYEGLASSES THROW NEW LIGHT ON FRANKS CASE

	State's Attorney Crowe explaiend early today how the search for the owner of the glasses found near the body of Robert Franks led to Nathan Leopold Jr.

	"Realizing that the glasses constitued the most direct clew to the solution of the mystery, I palced Assistant State's Attorney Joseph Savage in charge of that phase of the investigation," Mr. Crowe said. "I told him to devote every effort toward tracing the ownership of the glasses."

	"He found that the glasses had a special type of hinge, one made by the Bobrow Optical company of Brooklyn, N. Y. Comparatively few glasses sold in Chicago have this type of hinge.

	"Mr. Savage then went to the Almer Coe firm of opticians in Wabash avenues Eleminating all prescriptions for glasses filled with those having hinges other than this type, they began a search for records of glasses corresponding in detail to those found near the culvert.

	"The search of their records showed that the prescription for the mystery lenses fitted glasses sold to young Leopold. Our questioning of him resulted."


Crowe says how they searched records to find owner of the glasses, "realizing" they were "the most direct clew," although he doesn't give a timeline.


...


also from NY Times dated May 30th:

pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/104252547.html?pageNumber=1


	LOUSISVILLE, Ky., May 29-A battered photograph of a girl whose appearance closely resembles that of the daughter of Jacob Franks, father of the kidnapped and slain Robert Franks, was found tonight by detectives after a careful search of the room in which Charles Ford Heath of Chicagoy was found unconcious from veronal poisoning.

	Physicians at the hospital late tonight held out little hope that Heath would regain consciousness.


this is all of article

pg 1 article on arrests:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/104252546.pdf


	FIVE ARRESTS MADE IN FRANKS KILLING
	One Is a Wealthy Youth Who Admits Owning Spectacles Found Near Boy's Body.

	TYPEWRITER ALSO A CLUE

	Four Men Arrested in Room Where It Was--Paper Like That of Ransom Note.


	CHICAGO, Friday, May 30. — Five new arrests made in the early hours of this morning appeared to bring nearer to a solution the mystery of the kidnapping and death of Robert Franks, 13-year-old son of Jacob Franks, whose body was found Thursday of last week in a culvert in the Calumet River district. 

	Most important of the arrests was that of the admitted owner of the spectacles which were found near the Franks boy's body. He is Nathan Leopold Jr., 19 years old, only son of Nathan Leopold; reputed millionaire residing at 4,754 Greenwood Avenue, within a few blocks of the Franks residence.

	Leopold, a student at the University of Chicago and an advanced thinker, admitted the ownerhsip of the glasses almost as soon as he was charged with it. He also told States Attorney Robert E. Crowe that he was in the habit of roaming about the prairie in the vicinity of the place where the Frank boy's body was found.

	He said he had been in the neighborhood of the culvert either Friday or Saturday the week before the Franks boy's body was found. Examination develoepd the fact that he considered himself an advanced thinker and that he professed atheism.

	Meantime the detectives made four arrests in a raid in an apartment and seized a portable typewirter and a batch of writing paper similar to that upon which the letter in which a ransom had been demanded for the return of the Franks boy had been written.

	Early yesterday the police thought they had a clue in the attempted suicide at Lousville, Ky., of Charles F. Heath, a Chicago druggist. He was found unconcious in a hotel and had left two farewell notes and a phial, which had contained veronal. A batch of newspaper clippings, describing the Franks slaying, was found among his effects.

	On the way in a police ambulance to the City Hospital, Heath babbled continuously of the Franks case, intimating in the rambling sentences of his delirium that "he knew all about that murder in Chicago," and that he was a "dead ringer for the kidnapper."


reading the Chicago Tribune and NY times on the same story would give the reader very different impressions on who the killer might be and how close police were


article goes on about Heath, attempted suicide, police surveillance and the investigation into his movements on May 21

	
	...The investigation was still under way when the police were surprised on Sunday to learn that Heath was no longer at Mercy Hospital. The hospital authorities insist he had been discharged but the police doubt this.

	Tonight Heath's wife, Mrs. Anna Heath, and his mother, Mrs. Cora Heath, were taken to the State's Attorney's office and examined. Mrs. Heath attributed her husband's suicide attempts to despondency through losing his position in a south side drug store on the day before the slaying. She scorned the suggestion that her husband had killed the Franks boy.




...


May 31, 1924, NY Times pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450417.html
	TWO STUDENTS HELD IN FRANKS SLAYING

	Nathan Leopold Jr., Owner of Spectacles Found Near Body, Offers an Alibi.

	KNEW KIDNAPPED YOUTH

	Companion, Also Millionaire's Son, Bears Out Part of His Story-Their Typing Tested

	CHICAGO, May 30. — Following his arrest early this morning, after ownership of the spectacles found near the body of the kidnapped and slain Robert Franks had been traced to him, Nathan E. Leopold Jr., 19 years old, son of Nathan Leopold, a millionaire box manufacturer, denied any knowledge of the crime.

	He admitted owernship of the spectacles and said he took an unusual interest in literature pertaining to perversion. His chum, Richard Loeb, 18 years old, the son of a millionaire, Albert H. Loeb, Vice President of Sears, Roebuck & Co. corroborated part of his story.

	Leopold admitted that he knew Robert Franks, but said the acquantance was slight on account of the difference in their ages, Leopold being 19 and Franks 13.

	The police were reported late tonight to have found two bottles of poison in Leopold's room, but they gave no explanation of what he had said, if anything, regarding it.

	Sidney Stein, frequently a companion of Leopold, was the alst witness to be called in the investigation into the habits of Leopold and his whereabouts on the evening of May 21, the date on which Frank was kidnapped.


NY Times reports Leopold held, denied knowledge of crime, admitted owning glasses and "unusual interest in literature pertaining to perversion," knew Franks slightly, police found two bottles of "poison" in his room, Sidney Stein called in on habits and whereabouts of Leopold


	Leopold wrote for Milton D. Smith, assistant State's attorney, many samples of his lettering of the address "Mr. Jacob Franks, 2,052 Ellis Avenue, Special Delivery," the object being to compare Leopold's work with that on the letter demanding $10,000 ransom.

	Several specimens of Leopold's typing were examined by H. P. Sutton, a typewriter expert, who stated that the youth's typewriter was not the one used by the ransom letter writer. 



expert Sutton concluded Leopold's typewriter was not used. Loeb would later tell police Leopold typed the ransom letter, and that they destroyed the typewriter http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html


	Leopold, who described himself as the "youngest graduate of the University of Chicago, explained frequent vistis to the swamp where the boy's body was found by his interest in ornithology. He had been there often with "birding" classes, he said, and swelled his allowance of $125 monthyl by teaching three classes in ornithology when he was not studying law at the university.

	The evening of the kidnapping he spent with Loeb, he insisted, first in LIncoln Park and later in riding about with two girls, finally ending the night at a cabaret. Loeb insisted he was not with Leopold that night.

	Leopold presented a manly, straight-forward appearance and an intelligence, quick-thinking mind. "I want you to get this correctly," he said to a reporter. "Judge Crowe asked me whether I had ever read any works dealing either directly or indicrectly with any form of perversion. I replied that I had, and among them mentioned "I ragionamenti" of Pletro Aretino. I also mentioned several others."

	Then he told of his plan to translate that work from Italian to English and "get out a limited edition of some 200 or 300 copies, fully annotated and containing a long preface and a justification of Aretino," which were to be distributed only to scholars and those who had a legitimate interest in it.


NY times sounds like they like Leopold, I guess since his alibi was a "night at a cabaret", the "youngest graduate of the University of Chicago" while "teaching three classes" and his "manly, straightfoward appearance" and "quick-thinking mind." Seems to represent the elitism characteristic of NY Times, and they emphasize that in their report of him.

after mentioning his alibi of "riding about with two girls and night at a carabet," followed by "Loeb insisted he was not with Leopold that night." An early hint they don't like Loeb? in Leopold-Loeb letters, Loeb came across as the "bottom," if that makes sense. According to Neitzche this would mean Loeb is weak and detestable I guess.

Leopold clarified that the work he wanted to translate was "I ragionamenti" by Pletro Aretino but he mentioned "several others" after being asked specifically about reading works of "perversion." Apparently, leopold is responding to the Chicago Tribune report on the interview or similar reports.

The work he wanted to translate was about something related to female prostitutes. Aretino wrote a lot on sex stuff but doesn't seem like sodomy of boys was his thing. He blackmailed people and wrote "pornographic literature" and once blackmailed Michealangelo for being gay (http://rictornorton.co.uk/michela.htm). He was born in Florence and died in Venice.


	He refused to permit a psychiatrist to test his mentality "until I have an opportunity to consult an attorney or obtain my father's permission."

	"My theory of the Franks case is that he was kidnapped for ransom by some one who knew him," he said. "I have been reading the papers about it ever since he was killed."

	"Do you think you should be released?" he was asked.

	"No, it would be criminal on the part of the police to let me go now on account of the glasses. I thought all along that the glasses were the best clue for the police to follow, never thinking they were mine. I didn't know I had lost them but now I am sure I did, and it was on one of my many trips to that vicinity. I think the last time I was there was on the Sunday preceding the Franks murder."

	From an automobile similar to Leopold's a chisel, wrapped with adhesive tape and breaing bloodstains, had been flung on the night of the murder of Franks. The slain boy had been hit over the head with some weapon three times.


Leopold lied hardcore on murdering Franks to NY Times, who published in a positive light toward Leopold. His alibi is that he had lost his glasses there at some point and didn't realize it.


	Nathan Leopold Sr., expressed full confidence in the innocence of his son, in a formal statement saying that it was the desire of both himself andhis son to aid the authorities in running the murderer to earth and that, at the present time, he had no intention of seeking his son't release from custody through court proceedings. Loeb, as well as Leopold, is being held for further examination.





May 31, 1924, NY Times pg 16


small article:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450595.html?pageNumber=16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450595.pdf

	LOUISVILLE, KY., May 30.--C. F. Heath, the Chicago druggist, in a hospital here suffering from poison, was said today to have a chance to recover. Police here hae been unable to connect Heath with the Franks kidnapping case. It is believed that should he regain consciousness he will be unable to throw any light on the mystery.


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/issue.html


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450596.pdf

	INDIANAPOLIS, May 30.--Three men held here who, according to information from Chicago may be wanted there in connection with the Franks case, were arrested Saturday night. A quantity of nitroglycerine, seldge hammers and other tools for blowing safes were found in their hotel room.



...


May 31, 1924, Chicago Tribune pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884134/?terms=Franks

headline "SHAKE LEOPOLD-LOEB ALIBI"


	FRANKS CASE SUSPECTS UPSET BY CHAUFFEUR

	Auto in Garage All Evening, He Says.


	At 3 o'clock this morning Nathan E. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb, sons of rich south side families, held for investigation in the murder of Robert Franks, were making statements to State's Attorney Crowe and Assistant State's Attorney Savage.

	While the reports of their statements were fragmentary it was said they were relating their knowledge of the murder of the Franks boy.

	This came after hours of persistent questioning. The break came after Sven Englund, a chauffeur fro the leopold family, had shattered the alibi of the prisoners by declaring that the automobile of young Leopold had not been out of the garage between the hours of 1 and 10 p. m. on the day of the murder.


Leopold alibi was he was out driving car "with two girls" to a "cabaret" the night of the murder, but Sven Englund shattered with report that Leopold's car was still in the garage.

Chicago tribune says Englund's wife corroborated her husband's story since she got a prescription the day of the murder, and "this was taken to mean that the alibi established by the two youths had suffered seriously."

says Chauffer's statement was told to Loeb, who was "perceptibly disconcerted" and exclaime d"For God's Sake! Is he sure? and kept silence for the moment.

	
	...Had Been Gaining Favor.

	Previously both young men, who had been in custody for ours on suspicion of having knowledge of young Franks' disappearance and death, had steadily been gaining favor with the investigators. Their stories clicked true and their demeanor had been frank and outspoken. There was a feeling that both young men, and particularly Leopold, had been caught in a most remarkable net of circumstances while thoroughly innocent.

	One by one there had been an apparenty weakening of the circumstances that had seemingly incriminated the two millionaries' sons and University of Chicago students, in the murder. They were still in custody; some circumstance sthey had not explained away, but at midnight their straightforward answers had won them belief, and what was more to them for the moment, respect.


Cheufeer testimony a surprise? maybe NY times types thought they'd get away with it, then Englund settled things otherwise.


	Seek Girl's Story.

	State's Attorney Robert E. Crowe had the spectacles that proved Leopold had been at the culvert wehre Robert Franks' body was found. Leopold had an alibi. corroborated by Loeb and needing only the confirmation of two girls, Edna and May, to give preponderance to his claims to having been elsewhere when Robert was kidnaped and killed.

	Both had been drinking the afternoon of Wednesday, May 21, on the lake front off Grace street, left there about 5 p. m. (the time Robert disappeared at 49th street and Ellis avenue) and the drinking continued far into the evening. Both told that to different questioners without having time to consult.

	In the evening, about 8:20 o'clock, at Sixty-third street and Kenwood avenue, they "picked up" the girls, their stories coincided, and at 10:20 p. m. the girls left them at the entrance to the 9 hole golf course in Jackson Park.

	Neither knew the last names of their chance acquantances.


later Loeb would tell authorities "we planned that story" of being drunk with women on night of murder. Loeb addressing Leopold:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"And then the thing I wish to point out.  I have been made a fish right along here.  Now this story that you speak of in your testimony, this story of the finding of all this alibi, all these women, and being drunk in the Coconut Grove and everything, we planned that definately.  It was definately decided that the story was not to go after Wednesday noon, which would be a week after the crime.  We were to protect our story.  We were to just say that we didn't know what we were doing, and there was no evidence.  We felt that you were safe with your glasses after a week had passed, that your glasses being out there would not necessitate an air-tight alibi, because we didn't figure anything else, and we figured that you would be safe enough after a week not to know exactly where you were on that particular Wednesday afternoon."

	"Who felt that?" Crowe asked.

	"I told the same story exactly here to Mr. Savage."

	"All right," said Crowe.

	"When you came down Thursday and you told another story which you had agreed not to tell, I came down to Mr. Crowe and he questioned me, and questioned me about my actions and everything else, and I denied ever being drunk, I denied being with you, Leopold, and I denied being up at the Coconut Grove, and those things being put together made me absolutely certain that you had told the stories you shouldn't have told. 

	"Then he started to talk about the Park, about being out at Lincoln Park.  He mentioned parks.  He brought it around, but I knew what he was driving at.  That was Lincoln Park, and when he did that I stepped in to try to help you out.

	"I think it is a damn sight more than you would have done for me.  I tried to help you out because I thought that you at least, if the worst comes to the worst, would admit what you had done and not try to drag me into the thing in that manner.  Well now, that is all I have to say." 


Loeb says they decided they planned the alibi, decided against it, Leob says he didn't tell it, but Leopold did.

Loeb says he covered for Leopold but "it is a damn sight more than you would have done for me"

Leopold respond with some excuse and that Loeb is a liar


	...The reason for changing the story was, as you remember, I was very indefinate, and I was urged to remember, quite strongly, what I had been doing, and I am sorry that you were made a fish of and stepped into everything and broke down and all that, I am sorry, but it isn't my fault.


get a sense of why NY Times likes him--Loeb has some sembelnce of trust or honor, if it can be called that, while Leopold plotted to use him and make him look like the liar to take the blame, assuming Loeb was telling the truth. Apparently Neitzche would be proud.

working theory is that Neitszchites have continued to blame Loeb and white-wash Leopold in this tradition ever since


Why did the two women corroberate the story?


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884134/
	Insists Glasses Were Clean.

	The young man has not known, or had not taken into consideration, the one feature the police consider strong that the spectacles, when found, bore no indications of having been there longer than a few hours. If lost there on Leopold's last admitted visit to the "death spot," the Sunday previous, police were certain they would be weather beaten, spatter with mud from rain or dew and dust--but they were not.


caught him in a lie saying he left glasses there before murder

goes on about searching for his typewriter (which they had already thrown away)


	...A letter written by Nathan to Richard had at first resulted in embarrasment to both youths. It was signed "Babe," which turned out to be the name Nathan is called at home and by all his schoolmates. A sentence that was regarded as at least peculiar was easily and satisfactorily explained by both. Their manly appearance and evident fearlessness was heavily in their favor.


a letter with a peculiar sentence from Leopold to Loeb "embarrased" them but they explained it away


goes over alibi


	...I met 'Dick' after class and we went downtown and had dinner at Marshall Field's grill. In the afternoon we went up to the north end of Lincoln park. I wanted to see a heron-gull.

	"We drank quite a bit there and when we started south Dick was pretty drunk and I advised him not to go home. ...later we picked up the two girls, whom we later dropped in Jackson park. I took Dick home with me for a few hours, then drove him home about 1 a. m."


Leopold's alibi: Loeb went with him to Lincoln Park because Leopold wanted to see a heron-gull, both drank but dick got too drunk, Leopold giving him advice, picked up two girls but girls didn't want to sleep with them so dropped them off, Leopold drove Loeb home


even the alibi story comes off as panning Loeb

article says Loeb corroborated the alibi


	...Young Rubel Is released.

	Richard rubel, also the son of a wealthy father living at the Madison Park hotel, was questioend because of his acquantance with both Loeb and Leopold, but was released when he convinced the authorities he knew little about either of them and nothing about the Franks murder.


Rubel was the person mentioned in the letter from Leopold to Loeb. In the letter Leopold was talking about their legal jeoprady with regards to an unspecified crime and spoke of Rubel as someone both spoke to in relation to this


	In the course of conversation with policemen and reporters the sentence, "Let him who is without sin cast the first stone," was used by young Leopold.

	"Le him who is not guilty of this crime cast the first stone," young Leopold paraphraised; "get me the stone and I'll throw it."


Leopold was brazen about lying

was Loeb similar? this is important since some contemporary and modern writers on this try to paint Loeb as the mastermind who corrupted Leopold, and Leopold says the same in his memiors


	Regard Heath as Cleared.

	As the questioning of Nathan progressed the police both here and in Lousville announced the conclusion that C. F. Heath, Chicago druggist dying of poison in the Lousville hospital, was not connected with the Franks murder.

	Lieut. William Shoemaker, speaking for the local police, said it had been established that Heath had been at work in a local drug store until 6 o'clock the night of the kidnaping and slaying, and that this practically eliminated him.


earlier it was reported that a check couldn't "trace his movements" on the night of the murder

couldn't they have interviewed his boss at the drug store right away? it's weird this didn't get "established" until after Leopold and Loeb were caught in a lie



on pg 2 another article saying Leobold's fater wants to help the police "for justice and truth"


pg 2


	...IN FICTION THE "CLEW" SOLVES ALL; NOT SO HERE

	It's Like the Story Until the End


article says clues usually don't end up tracing to perp in real life like they do in fiction, but this time they did

goes over how they traced glasses to Leopold

	
	...Last Tuesday Prosecutor Savage and Detective Gourtland carried the spectacles to Almer Coe a& Co.


"Last Tuesday" would be May 27th


	Identify the Glasses

	Mr. Coe, William D. Glennon, secretary of the company, and Jacob Weinstein, the manager, looked at the spectacles. They at once identified them. The frames were made especially for their company by the Brobow Optical Co., of Brooklyn, they said; and the ALmer Coe & Co. "diamond point" mark was on the lenses.

	They recognized the frames by a peculiar hinge on them, the like of which is not on the frames sold by any other Chicago optician.

	"Would it be possible for you to go through your records and trace this particular pair of glass down: to determine the man you sold them to?" was asked.

	Finally the opticians said it could be done.

	Find the Bill of Sale.

	They searched for two days in the records of their four stores. Late Wednesday, the bill of sale for the spectacles sold Leopold on Nov. 1, 1923, was found. The presecrption for the lenses tallied exactyl with the technical description of the eyes fitting the lenses in the "single clew."

	Nathan Leopold Jr., was arrested late Thursday. He is the type of man the oculist told the police would wear such glasses--a student, a scholar, a reader. A man who might suffer at times from eye strain.

	...The slender clew of the murder mystery of fiction had been found in fact.



...


Chicago Tribune May 31, 1924, pg 3


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	BIG EXPERIENCE EITHER WAY, IS NATHAN'S VIEW

	Watches Own Emotions; Upholds Alibi.

	BY MAURINE WATKINS.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maurine_Dallas_Watkins
	Maurine Dallas Watkins (July 27, 1896 – August 10, 1969) was an American journalist and playwright. In the 1920s she wrote the play, Chicago (1926). After her death, it was adapted by Bob Fosse and others as a successful musical for stage, running from 1975 to 1977 in New York, and a 2002 film version.

	...For the Tribune, where Watkins worked for seven months, she covered the murders and the subsequent trials of Belva Gaertner, a twice-divorced cabaret singer, and Beulah Sheriff Annan. Watkins often used acerbically amusing reportage, and focused on the farcical, cynical, and sensational aspects of the two cases, the press and public interest, and the legal proceedings. She highlighted two attractive "jazz babies" claiming to be corrupted by men and liquor. She characterized Beulah as "beauty of the cell block" and Belva as "most stylish of Murderess Row." Both women, after months of press coverage in Chicago's seven daily papers, were found not guilty at trial. Watkins believed they were guilty.


https://etda.libraries.psu.edu/files/final_submissions/9095
	Leopold and Loeb Mute Watkins’s Voice

	As the movie cameras were following Beulah Annan, giving Watkins fodder for didactic, yet humorous, observations on men, women , celebrity and justice, another murder was grabbing the nation’s attention and changing, if only temporarily, Chicago’s bemused attitude toward its criminal element.

	As noted earlier, the kidnapping and “thrill killing” of young Robert Franks by wealthy and brilliant Na than Leopold and Richard Loeb cast a shadow over the city, as everyone from reporters to social scientists to average citizens struggled to understand how intelligent boys from “good” homes could kill just for the experience of having taken a life .

	As also noted previously, the Tribune promised its readers comprehensive coverage by a team of its best reporters – including Watkins, who would provide “a review of the Loeb youth’s life and family.” 96

	Her first bylined story about the murder appeared jus t one day after Watkins’s article about the verdict in the Beulah Annan case, and it was markedly different in tone. In fact, Watkins’s coverage of the young victim’s funeral came close to melodramatic, reading more like a piece by a sob sister than a mob sister. While her coverage of the Annan case contained frequent, mocking references to the “Hula Lou” song, she led her funeral story with a quote from a psalm – “I will lift up mine eyes to the hills” – followed by the slightly maudlin paragraph, “But her mother heart lay buried behind the marble slab with its words of gold: ‘1909 – Robert Franks – 1924.’”

	A few paragraphs later, Watkins described “the little white coffin in the library,” adding, in syrupy prose, “There before the fireplace where he us ed to dream, it stood, covered with a blanket of crimson rosebuds.” The bereaved mother, Watkins noted, was in a mute haze of grief until she met a group of her deceased son’s schoolmates, at which point she “ran her hands hungrily over their faces. Some with the round features of childhood, others slim in adolescence – and four days ago her son had been with them!” 98 The exclamation point, which she’d wielded with sarcasm or to point out hypocrisies in previous articles ma de an already overblown observat ion even more maudlin, in this case.

	Watkins partially regained her more predominant cynical, sarcastic perspective a few days later, when she was among a crowd of reporters who interviewed Nathan Leopold shortly after he was arrested and before he’d co nfessed . Although the Tribune ultimately assigned Genevieve Forbes Herrick the task of tackling the psychological aspects of the case, Watkins produced the first in - depth and perceptive profile of the boy wh o would eventually be charged with the murder an d who took credit for being the “mastermind” behind the killing .

	Discussing her work on the case for the New York World in 1927, Watkins – after noting that she was the only woman reporter to interview Leopold and Loeb on the day before they confessed – r ecalled how she approached her single opportunity to ask a question, calling it “the biggest gamble I ever took” as a journalist. And the query she developed must have seemed like an odd one to at least some of her fellow scr ibes. She asked of Leopold, “‘ What three men do you consider the greatest whoever lived?’”

	Watkins insisted that she wasn’t trying to be esoteric or clever; on the contrary, she told the World that she simply wanted to ask something that would generate a response that would allow her to fill column inches. She explained, “‘I wasn’t thinking about the crime. I was thinking about my story – how I could get two columns out of one question.’”

	Leopold’s response – N ietzs che, Haeckel and Epicurus – proved telling for Watkins, though. She explained that N ietzs che believed in “‘the superior man,’” while Haeckel rejected immortality, and Epicurus “‘advocated the right of the individual to do as he pleased.’” “‘With that sort of philosophy as a foundation,’” Watkins explained, “‘one coul d begin to see how they might have done it . . . At 1 they confessed . . . ’”

	In spite of Watkins’s cla im that the question was somewhat random, she almost certainly had more than just potentially filling space in mind when she asked it. The re sulting a rticle, as well as her analysis of Leopold’s response in her interview with the World , both indicate that she expected the inquiry to yield important insights – as it did.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	...BY MAURINE WATKNIS

	"To regret an experience is to nullify it," wrote Oscar Wilde from the depths of Old Bailey.


http://law2.umkc.edu/faculty/projects/ftrials/wilde/wildeaccount.html
	Old Bailey, the main courthouse in London, had never presented a show quite like the three trials that captivated England and much of the literary world in the spring of 1895.

	...The first criminal trial of Oscar Wilde opened at Old Bailey on April 26, 1895.  Wilde and Alfred Taylor, the procurer of young men for Wilde, faced twenty-five counts of gross indecencies and conspiracy to commit gross indecencies.  A parade of young male witnesses for the prosecution testified regarding their roles in helping Wilde to act out his sexual fantasies.  Although Wilde was not prosecuted for sodomy, there was little doubt by the end of the trial that he might have been.  Almost all of them expressed shame and remorse over their own actions, and Wilde seemed to be left conflicted by their testimony.  (Later Wilde compared his encounters with "feasting with panthers."  Wilde wrote that "the danger was half the excitement.")

	..."The love that dare not speak its name" in this century is such a great affection of an elder for a younger man as there     was between David and Jonathan, such as Plato made the very basis of his philosophy, and such as you find in the sonnets     of Michelangelo and Shakespeare.  It is that deep, spiritual affection that is as pure as it is perfect.  It dictates and     pervades great works of art like those of Shakespeare and Michelangelo, and those two letters of mine, such as they are.      It is in this century misunderstood, so much misunderstood that it may be described as the "Love that dare not speak its     name," and on account of it I am placed where I am now.  It is beautiful, it is fine, it is the noblest form of             affection.  There is nothing unnatural about it.  It is intellectual, and it repeatedly exists between an elder and a         younger man, when the elder man has intellect, and the younger man has all the joy, hope and glamour of life before him.      That it should be so the world does not understand.  The world mocks it and sometimes puts one in the pillory for it.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	And Oscar Wilde was one of the heroes of Nathan Leopold Jr., held for questioning in the Franks case. Oscar Wilde, along with Nietzsche, who said "I love the great destroyers, for they are the great adorers!" Nathan's other heroes are Ernest Haeckel, who denied the immortality of the soul, the freedom of the will, and the existence of a personal God; and Epicurus, who preached the doctrine which bears his name.

	Gives Socrates the Air.

	"I won't add Socrates," said the young man thoughtfully, " for I never though such a lot of that old bird!"

	Now Nathan is having an "experience" that seems to bring him no "regret," no worry, no alarm. A marvelous opportunity to study his own reactions! And with a sense of detachement he watches--as a scientist might--his own curious lack of emotion.


sounds like she gets him, has him pinned

doesn't come off as a fan in this paragraph, more like schadenfreude


	For thirty hours states attorneys hurled questions at him. He caught them lightly and deftly, answering suavely. He has not once taken the defensive. No question has shaken his calm or penetrated his urbanity.

	Reporters, three and four at a time, have asked him questions about love, philosophy, art, sports--relevant and irrelevant. And, Ceasar-like, he answered each in turn rapidly enough to keep the questioner busy writing on his separate question. A pause--long enough to light a cigaret, for Nathan has smoked without stopping--then a swift, decisive answer couched in judicial language, with perhaps a slightly cynical twist and a sudden smile.

	For he has a very winning smile, this slim youth of 19. Slender face, with full eyes whose white shows slightly below the pupil, and lips that are sensitive and mobile.


she sounds like she wants to make him one of her novel characters


	As to Brains He's There!

	Simply--but no "modestly" for modesty is only a "pose!"--he recounted his years of schooling at Miss Spaid's at a public school, at the Harvard school, U. of Chicago, U. of Michigan, then back to U. of Chicago where he recieved his PH. B a year ago. Simply--but not "superiorly" for that betrays and "inferiority complex!"--he named the fifteen languages he had studied, carefully spelling and explaining what they were.


comes off as mocking


	A superior mind. And a mind that knows its own superiority so well that it were needless to boast it--and foolish to conceal.

	An athiest, yes. But he does not reccomend athiesm for "hoi polloi." God, hethinks, is a good thing to hold the common people in check.

	"And I'm not a radical, communist, Socialist, nor bolshevist," he said with a charming laugh. "on questions of reform my temperature is decidedly normal!"

	For he lives in a world of his own creating, and the people around him are more or less shadows.


^^^

	"I belong to no social fraternity," he said. "Yes, I am a member of Phi Beta Kappa. What do I think of It? A ridiculous society, that attempts to unite the two most diverse kinds of brains; the naturally acute mind, and the grind, who wears horn shell glasses and carries a brief case!"

	Books? He has delved deeply in the past, particularly in the sixteenth century--"the wickedest century the world has ever known." Benvenuto Cellini? Yes! And Pietro Aretino, an authority on the erotic.

	"But I have never read a 'bad' book," he said with that slow, calm smile that admits the hearer cannot grasp his meaning, "for there is no such thing!"

	Likes Erotic Books.

	He doesn't care much for modern novels, but considers Cyril Hume's "Wife of a Centaur"--frankly erotic--the best book of the last decade.


sounds like she suspects him of raping Franks


	He has built for himself a world beyond religion, beyond morality, beyond convention--yet he accomodates himself to the world in which he lives. And he does not preach his convictions to others, for he realizes that such meat is only for the strong.


sums him up as Nietszcheite


	With his friends he smokes and drinks and "takes his pleasure where he finds it."

	"A regular fellow!" they say.

	In clear, precise language he dictated to the reporters a statement for the papers: "The police are more than justified in holding me in custody for a limited period, as I am the victim of an unusual set of circumstances."

	Breifly he enumerated: (1) his knowledge of the place where the body was found; (2) the discovery of his glasses in that spot; (3) his visit to the place just pervious to the crime; (4) his evening in the company of two girls he didn't know.

	He leaned back and took another cigaret.

	"And won't you thank President Burton and Dean Woodward of the Law School for their expression of sympathy and confidence in me?" he asked genially.

	"The most brilliant boy of his age I've ever known1" said State's Attorney Robert Crowe of the boy who has met--as a courteous superior--men of all ages and ranks.

	And the most concieted tribe on earth--reporters!--nibble their pencils and coughed suggestingly for spelling and definitions!

	If he's not connected with the crime--what an experience!

	And if he is connected--still it's experience!


sounds like she summed him up accurately as a pompous prick and hates him for it


...


May 31st, 1924 Chicago Tribune page 3


	RICHARD LOEB AS BEST FRIEND, LETTER'S THEME

	Nathan Turned More to Books than Persons.

	Nathan E. Leopold Jr., with his degree of bachelor of philosophy at the age of 19, found himself lonely in this age of "flippers and flappers," though it's said he did not hate "flappers."

	For companions, however, he preferred the tested great of the library for the temporarily famous of the campus.


two different profiles on the same page of Chicago Tribune give two different impressions

the author of this one is not named

	
	From the time that he was a small boy he had been known as "Babe." It was a family pet name which later was "wished on" him by his friends. Just as men over six feet frequently are called "Shorty" and fat men are hailed as "Slim," so the mental prodigy of his circle of friends was called "Babe," it fitted so well his scholastic honors.

	Richard His Best Friend.

	Richard Loeb, also a youth of unusual mental attainments, was his best friend. It had been a long association. It appeared that last November some misunderstanding was about to shatter it. So Nathan wrote an emotional letter about it.


Is that the letter where he threatened to kill him?

	
	...Thus watching birds and living with his friends of the book shevles and the stuffed specimens in his private museum, young Nathan esteemed his friend Richard more than do those who have many friends. So while to Nathan a cop seems a gaunal curiosity though a biped, his friend Richard, who could share his interests, was especially dear.


so far article paints Leopold as a lonely nerd who gets teased with Loeb one of his only friends


goes on to describe letter where Leopold says he threatened to kill Loeb

skips part where he talks about a crime and attempt to blackmail Loeb

comes off as trying to repurpose the letter as evidence of Leopold being lonely and Loeb his only friend (apparently Leopold liked Loeb for different reasons in actuality)


...

June 1 1924, NY Times pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.pdf

	TWO RICH STUDENTS CONFESS TO KILLING FRANKS BOY IN CAR

	Sons of Wealthy Chicagoans Hit Him With a Chisel and Then Gagged Him.

	THEN DISPOSED OF BODY

	Youth's Clothing, Which They Stripped From Him, Burned in Home of One Slayer.

	LONG PLANNED SUCH CRIME

	Once Thought to Kidnap Rosenwald's Grandsom--Chauffeur Upset Their Alibi


says the confessed, Leopold youngest U Chicago grad, Loeb youngest U Michigan, both around 19

	
	...They admitted that they had seized the boy, placed him in a hired automobile and slain him five minutes afterward while the car was driving through a heavily traveled street. First hitting him on the head with a chisel, they insured his death by choking him with a gag. They put acid on his face in an effort to so disfigure it that identity would be destroyed.


says confession admitted they killed Franks five minutes after kidnapping him by chisel then gag

Leopold confession:


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1746-leopoldconfession
	...The next problem was getting the victim to kill.  This was left undecided until the day we decided to pick the most likely-looking subject that came our way.  The particular case happened to be Robert Franks.  Richard was acquainted with Robert and asked him to come over to our car for a moment.

	...As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose. The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat. Here he forced a cloth into his mouth. Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter.


Loeb confession:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"We proceeded south on Ellis Avenue, turned east on 50th Street, and just after we turned off of Ellis Avenue, Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.  I believe he hit him several times, I do not know the exact number.  He began to bleed and was not entirely unconscious.  He was moaning.  I proceeded further east on 50th, and turned, I believe, at Dorchester.  At this point Leopold --"

	"What time was it?"

	"This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  He then took one of the rags and gagged him by sticking it down his throat, I believe. 

	..."We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat.  Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat. 

	..."We dragged the body out of the car, put the body in the road (robe) and carried it over to the culvert.  Leopold carried the feet, I carried the head.  We deposited the body near the culvert,and undressed the body completely.  Our original scheme had been to etherize the body to death."

	"Where did you pour the hydrochloric acid on him?"

	"Right there.  The scheme for etherizing him originated through Leopold, who evidently has some knowledge of such things, and he said that that would be the easiest way of putting him to death, and the least messy.  This, however, we found unnecessary, because the boy was quite dead when we took him there.  We knew he was dead, by the fact that rigor mortis had set in, and also by his eyes, and then when at that same time we poured this hydrochloric acid over him, we noticed no tremor, not a single tremor in his body, therefore we were sure he was dead. 


They confessed they were looking for a little boy to kill by pouring acid on him, NY times reads confeession then reports on it to make it sounds like an accident


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.pdf
	...Ransom and the "adventure" of crime were the motives for the deed, although both recieved liberal allowance from their parents. Long having had kidnaping in mind...

	...Death Penatly for Both Crimes

	Kidnapping is a capital offense under the Illinois laws, so that should they be proved guilty of the kidnaping and murder the two youths could be sentenced to death on two counts.

	"I have a hanging case," said Robert E. Crowe, State's Attorney, after he had reviewed all angles of the confesssions. "The State is ready to go to trial immediately." Chief Justice Caverly of the Criminal Court, stating that he would urge an immediate trial, said: "Justice should be served within thirty days."


skips confessed intent to kill, calls it kidnaping with "ransom and adventure" motive

quotes Crowe saying its a hanging case as if due to a technicality in Illinois law (as if they were setting up for the death penalty debate already?)


	...Mr. Crowe declared the confessions had revealed that the students had no intention of returning the boy to his parents if the ransom had been paid. They expected to destroy all evidences of the crime.


quotes Crowe, previously introduced as hard-nose, and leaves it up to the reader whether or not this is Crowe's opinion--seems slimy

why not say outright what should be headline news on this? killers confess they were looking for a boy to kill and killed him


	The attitude of Leopold and Loeb when they were first arrested inclined the State's Attorney and the police to doubt their guilt. Both asserted their innocence and courted the fullest investigation, even to saying they did not desire freedom until they had been fully cleared, a position endorsed by their parents.


Remember yesterday's front page of NY times was almost gushing about Leopold

sounds like they're trying to cover their ass a little here


	...In offering an alibi, Leopold told of having spent the afternoon with Loeb in his automobile and the evening with Loeb and two girls in riding around and visiting cabarets.

	The suspiciouns of the State's Attorney became strongly aroused when Loeb contradicted Leopold and declared he was not with his chum in the evening.


Chicago Times said Loeb corroborated Leopold's story, NY Times said Loeb tanked it--which is true? (and why the difference?)


goes on to describe Chauffer "blast"ing Leopold's alibi, the elaborate ransom scheme

goes into a lot of detail on the ransom scheme

	...After their amazing confessions had been transcribed the prisoners were taken to the points that figured in their remarkable story.

	...Leopold had pointed to a spot in the Jackson Park lagoon where he said he had dumped the typewriter on which the "erudite" kidnapper's letter was written.

	As he pointed to this spot, the youth of superior intelligence, master of languages, ornithological, and athiest, expressed a wish to kill himself.


the real victim, according to NY Times


	Loeb the First to Break.


going with Loeb the bitch/snitch/Judas theme?

it's like culpability of the crime doesn't register for them, just who comes off to them as "weak" and who as "strong", like Neitzche's mindset


	Soon after 1 o'clock this morning Svin Englund, the Leopold family chauffuer, who had been waiting for four hours to confront the detectives ...There was no expectation that he knew of anything that might have a bearing on the cimre, and the questiosn asked him were merely perfunctory. He was one of a dozen called to verify slight details of th alibi, seemingly and assuredly given by his empoyer's son.

	Of his own volition Englund remakred that the red car driven by young Leopold had not been out of the home garage on the day of the kidnapping.


NY Times sounds upset by this

writes that expectation was Englund would verify the alibi, then offered key detail "on his own volition"


	...His statement startled the examineers. They had been on the point of believing the seemingly puncture-proof alibi and had almost ordered the students released.

	The statement of Englund was reiterated to Loeb. He blanched, trembled, cursed and said:

	"Is he sure?"

	He would not say another word for several minutes. His head, which had been held up high to this point, dropped. His eyes no longer looked back frankly and fearlessly into the eyes of the inquisitors as they had been doing for forty-eight hours. He shifted his head about and would look squarely at no one. Then he suddenly asked for State's Attorney Crowe.

	"I want to talk with him privately," he said, and in a moment was closeted with the prosecutor.


NY Times: Leopold's perfect puncture-proof alibi was ruined by Loeb's comparative lack of psycopathy (more or less)

Loeb an untermench?


	In the meantime Leopold was taken into another office and re-examined by Joseph Savage and Detective Chief Hughes. Word soon came out of both offices that the boys had broken down.

	When Mr. Crowe came out to call in a stenographer to take down Loeb's story he said:

	"This murder is solved. We have obtained a statement from each of the students. They say they killed Robert Franks. They want to tell all."

	"We did it for the experience, through a spirit of adventure," the two declared, as, after thirty hours of grilling, they finally signed the statements they had made. They added they were after the easy money, the $10,000 they had demanded of Jacob Franks for his son who was already dead.


	...The killing was deliberate and decided on in advance of the seizure of the boy, murder as well as ransom being part of the "adventure." Failing in other means, they intended to kill him with ether or acid.


does end up saying the intended to kill a kid with acid


	...In their confessions each of the students charge the other with wielding the chisel, which was thrown out of the car a short distance from the spot and later found.

	At the same time a gag was thrust into Franks's mouth so tightly that if the blows had not killed him he was strangled to death.


mentions each blaming the other for hitting him with chisel


	...Leopold Talked of Suicide.

	"Id like to jump off this bridge," Leopold pleaded as the car in which he, in custody of Chief Hughes and State's Attorney Crowe were riding, was driven over the high bridge in Jackson Park, while the scnes of the crime were being visited.

	The squad of detectives who had spent the morning with Leopold and Loeb checking up the details of their confessions hedged in about the young man.

	"If you ever wnent over this bridge you'd never come back," Chief Hughes said.

	That would suit me," Leopold replied, and gave a futile jerk toward the side before he settled back, surrounded by detectives.

	Leopold was apparently unaffected by the disvoery that he was one of the kidnappers and slayers. He made his confession to Mr. Crowe without nevousness, as if it were an every day occurance, and afterward posed nonchalantly for photographers, lighting a cigarrette as the cameras clicked.


NY Times makes Leopold out as a sort of crime-novel anti-hero


	..."Let's eat," suggested leopold and ordered a sandwich, pie and coffee, when he entered the cigar store with the detectives. A moment later Loeb came in, was recognized by Mrs. Barish and collapsed in a faint. He was carried back to the automobile and revived.


not very ubermensch-like of Loeb


	...The confessions, according to the police, point to Leopold, who smoked and smiled even while hew as telling how the Frnaks boy was slain, as the leader in the crime.

	Loeb's confession was interrupted while he put his head in his hands and sobbed. Leopold reads and speaks fifteen different languages. During his college course he made a habit of taking twice the ordinary number of hours of study.


NY times says Leopold the leader of the crime, contrary to some modern tellings

this is contrary to another apparent propaganda piece published the day before in Chicago Tribune, which was sneaky in using the Leopold-Loeb letter to make Loeb look like the ringleader by leaving some things out

article has a lot of contrasting Leopold "noble"-like behavior and Loeb "slave"-like behavior according to Neitzche


goes on to quote Franks saying they probably had ransom motive and should be in asylum


	...Julius Rosenwald, millionaire philanthropist, called at the State's Attorney's office when the news of the confession became known. He said he had come because his grandson had been mentioned in the newspapers in connection with the confessions as one of the boys picked as a possible victim.

	"I have come here," Mr. Rosenwald said, "to find out about that."

	He did not say anything about the identity of his grandoms but, referring to the slaers' confessed motive--ransom--continued:

	"It does not seem possible that two boy with some much money at their command should do a ting like this, especially for the motive assigned to them."


did Rosenwald influence how the case played out?


goes on to recall crime, including some callous parts:


	...The boy had been dead over five hours when this offer to spare his life was made.

	Despite the threat Mr. Ranks and Mr. Ettelson went to the Detective Bureau early in the morning, consulted Acting Lieutenant Robert Welling. It was decided to have the telephone watched but further plans were put off until morning for fear of the boy's safety.

	Lietenant Welling was asked to say nothing. Because of this no report of the missing boy was put on the Detective Bureau blotter. And it was becaus of this that the body of a boy, which was found in a ditch at 119th Street and the Pennsylvania ralroad tracks at 9:30 o'clock was not connected at once with the disappearance of Robert Franks.


blame Franks for investigation being slow initially?


continues with summary of recent events, ends with:


	...Their stories at first seemed to be beyond question, but the evidence of the Leopold chauffeur as to the car they alleged they used proved their undoing.



...



Chicago Tribune, June 1, 1924, pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354886108/

Headline "CLINCH YOUTHS' CONFESSIONS"

	TAKE LOEB AND LEOPOLD ON FRANKS DEATH ROUTE

	Find Little Victim's Boots; Dive for Type-writer; Crowe Says he Ha Case for a Hanging.

	AN UNPRECEDENTED CRIME

	In view of the fact that the solving of the Franks kidnaping and death brings to notice a crime that is unique in Chicago's annals and perhaps unprecedented in American criminal history, The Tribune this morning gives to the report of the case many columns of space for news, comment, and pictures.

	The diabolical spirit evinced in the planned kidnaping and murder; the wealth and prominence of the families whose sons are involved; the high mental attainments of the yourths; the suggestions of perversion;



article very different tone from NY Times

already one big difference: "suggestion of perversion" near headline, missing from NY Times article. The confession had important info on that; they confessed to removing Franks pants early before the rest of his clothes.


	the strange quirks indicated in the confession taht the child was slain for ransom, for experience, for the satisfaction of a desire for "deep plotting," combined to set the case in a class by itself.

	The Tribune has aimed to set the story forth in these general lines: the day's news developments following the early morning confession, told by Orville Dwyer; a consideration of the spychology and psyciatry of the case by Miss Genevieve Forbes; a review of the Loeb youth's life and family, by Miss Maurine Watkins; of the Leopold youth and his family, by Miss Maureen McKernan; the detective steps by which the case was worked out, by John Herrick; the Franks family, by Paul Augsburg; and other miscellaneous features of the crime.


	BY ORVILLE DWYER


opens saying expected to send to gallows, typewriter evidence, "the strongest case I have ever experienced"

says Leopold and Loeb "had broken down at precisely the same minute"


	...Brings Silk Pajamas.

	Leopold's valet arrived at the hotel last night with silk pajams for each of the boys and a change of clothes. These were left for the boys, as they were still sleeping. When Leopold and Loeb awakened after their first sleep they were asked if they were hungry.

	"Yes, I am very hungry," said Leopold. A turkey dinner was served a short itme later by waiters from the hotel. The policemen on gurad saw that all of the kinves and forks were removed when the waiters came for the trays.

	Soon after their meal the prisoners retired and were reported to be "sleeping like babies" by Sergeant Thomas O'Malley of the state's attoreny's office, who had been left in charge of the guard.


night and day between this an NY Times

this one seems like the kind of article elite wouldn't like? it's not calling for a dictatorship of the proletariat or anything

goes on to describe search uncovering incontrovertible evidence


	...Only Disputed Points

	State's Attorney Crowe declared the only conflicting statements in the two confessions were those dealing with which of the two youths had struck young Franks over the head with the cold chisel--the blow that kocked him unconscious.

	In order to clear this up the state's attorney brought them face to face and read their statements. Each accused the other of hatching the plot and of striking the blows that rendered young Franks unconscious.

	Nathan Striker of Blow?

	Thus it was finally settled and both boys agreed that Richard, who was driving, had called the boy into the car. Nathan had knocked him unconscious with the chisel and stuffed the gag into this mouth.


says both agreed Loeb was driving, called into car, and Leopold knocked him "unconscious" and stuffed gag into his mouth

how did history end up remembering his as Loeb did it?


goes on to report them with police retracing crime

reports same story of Loeb fainting, but more detail, says it was after store owner identified him as "Mr. Mason"


goes over their visit to different places, "VISIT DEATH CHISEL STORE"

reports on suicide wish by Leopold:


	...It was here that Nathan expressed a wistful desire to step off into the unkown.

	'I'd like to jump off this bridge," he said. Chief of Detectives Hughes grasped him by the arm. "If you ever went over this bridge," the chief said, "you never would come back." And he took a tighter hold on the student's arm.

	"That would suit me," Leopold replied as they led him off the bridge and back into the automobile.


tribune telling makes Leopold look more like a little bitch

NY times makes him out like some brooding anti-hero, "surrounded by detectives" like the guy from The Professional

continues going over finding grusome details of murder

has them quoted saying they threw Franks shoes and belt buckle out of window of car

goes over Englund testimony:


	...Englund calmly shatered the car alibi.

	"That's not right," he said. "That Willys-Knight was in the Leopold garage all day from 1 o'clock in the afternoon until 10 o'clock that night."


NY Times emphasized Englund waiting there for four hours, this was his employer's son, nobody expected him to do anything but verify the alibi and was one of 12 expected to do so

Chicago Tribune just "he calmy shattered their alibi", which makes him sound badass


their story on Loeb being told is in some places word-for-word for NY times


next article (on page 2):

	Confession Bares Crime Plot of Amazing Depth, Cruelty

	Last night the signed confessions of Nathan E. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb were sealed by State's Attorney Crowe and placed in a safety deposit vault, there to remain until the two millionaires' sons are brought to trial for the murder of young Robert Franks. They may be read to the grand jurors but the contents, word for word, will not be given to the public until they become a part of the court record of a murder trial without a parallel in criminal annals.


confession transcript not available to journalists? I guess they got details from interviewing people involved


	But quotations taken here and there from the statements, liberally from memory, by State's Attorney Crowe and his assistants give some idea of the amazing business-like manner in which the youthful scholars planned and executed their crime and the equally amazing frankness with which they recounted the details of the thing "that would give one a thrill."

	Planned Since Last Fall.

	"We had planned since last fall--some time in November, I think--to kidnap some rich boy, kill him and get money from his father for ransom."


opens up right away with "we planned to kill a boy"


goes on to quote one of them saying they planned to hit him on head and gag him


	...HE WAS WEAK

	"It was easier than we thought. He was weak. When he started to resist we hit him on the head and stuffed the gag into his mouth. We didn't need to use the ether. He must have been dead within five minutes after we started--while we were still going along 50th street."


this quote doesn't show up anywhere in confession: http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html

paraphrase at best

don't think they ever say anything like "it was easy"/"he was weak"

	
	[Which one hit him? That was the only point in the confession in which the old human failing of attempting to "pass the buck" cropped out. The boys each accepted half the blame, but they had to be brought together before this one point was cleared up.]

	"You hit him first, Dick." Leopold said.

	"No, Babe, don't you remember? I was driving. I couldn't have hit him first because he was in the back seat with you? I was the one that called him by name and got him into the car. You didn't know him Don't you remember?"

	That point was cleared up.


from the transcript:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	[Loeb:] At this time I was driving.

	"We proceeded north on Ellis Avenue until we caught a glimpse of Robert Franks coming south on the west side of Ellis Avenue.  As we passed him, he was just coming across or past 48th Street.  We turned down 48th Street and turned the car around, Leopold getting into the back seat.  I drove the car, then, south on Ellis Avenue, parallel to where young Franks was, stopped the car, and while remaining in my seat, opened the front door and called to Franks that I would give him a ride home.  He said, no, he would just as soon walk, but I told him that I would like to talk with him about a tennis racket, so he got in the car. 

	...Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.

	..."This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  


Loeb says he's driving, Leopold in back seat, Loeb opened front door, Franks got in car in front seat, Leopold "reached his arm around" and hit him, later pulled him into back seat and gagged him


	[Leopold:] "Everything that he read there is true, is it?" Schoemaker asked.

	"Yes, sir."

	"I have some corrections," Leopold said.  "In the first place, the date as given by Mr. Loeb is about a month or two at the most before the crime took place.  As I remember it quite distinctly, we started planning this thing as early as November 1923.

	"In the second place, the suggestion was his, not mine.

	"In the third place, the Rent-A-Car is at 14th and not 16th Street.  The little restaurant to which he refers is also at 13th, not 1538 Wabash.  The hardware store to which he refers is not at 47th, but between 55th and 56th, on Cottage Grove Avenue.

	"I did not bind the chisel with tape; he did.  The hip boots were not my brother's, but mine.  The place that he mentioned getting the car was at 14th and not 16th Street.

	"At the time the Franks boy entered our car, I was driving, not Mr. Loeb and Mr. Loeb was in the back seat.  It was Mr. Loeb who struck him with the chisel, and not I.


when read to him Leopold had some corrections, some trivial, but some major: Loeb planned it and Leopold was driving, says Loeb hit Franks


	[Leopold:] "Richard Loeb.  He replied no, but Richard said, well, come in a minute.  I want to ask you about a certain tennis racket.  After he had gotten in, I stepped on the gas, proceeded south on Ellis Avenue to 50th Street.  In the meantime Richard asked Robert if he minded if we took him around the block, to which Robert said, no.  As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose.  The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat.  Here he forced a cloth into his mouth.  Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter.  We proceeded out to Calumet Boulevard in Indiana, drove along this road that leads to Gary, being a rather deserted place.  We even stopped to buy a couple of sandwiches and some drinks for supper." 

	..."Then Dick opened the front door and yelled, 'Hey, Bob.'  He came over to the car and Dick asked him if he couldn't give him a lift home.  He declined, but Dick said, 'Come in a minute.  I want to talk to you about a tennis racket.'"

	"That was the time he got into the car."

	"Yes."

	"Where were you sitting at that time?"

	"I was sitting at the driver's wheel.  Dick was in the rear seat." 


Leopold's original confession was that he was driving, Leob was in back seat and opened front door to call to Franks, Loeb hit him and pulled him into back seat


	[Loeb:] "Well, I think that will be enough.  Are there any corrections you wish to make?"

	Richard said, "There are certain corrections that Leopold has made in mine that are not important, such as 14th street, and the boots being his, instead of his brother's, which don't amount to a damn, I mean it don't make any difference, they are not important, and don't affect the case.  However, I would like to say this.

	"In the first place he says that that chisel was wrapped by me.  It was wrapped by him, and wrapped by him in Jackson Park.  He brought it in and put it in the car and he wrapped that chisel while waiting there in Jackson Park in that little nine hole golf house.  All right. 

	"In the second place he mentioned that the idea of the thing, that the main thing was to get the place and the means of throwing that package, and he stuck on that idea of the train and it was his idea.  But he doesn't mention the method of the killing, that he had that very well conceived and planned out, as evidenced by the ether in the car, which was absolutely the notion that he followed through.  The boy was to be etherized to death, and he was supposed to do that, because I don't know a damn thing about it and he does.  He has a number of times chloriformed birds and things like that, and he knows ornithology and I don't know a damn thing about that.

	..."So there are one or two other things.  In the first place I never touched that body after the hydrochloric acid was poured on that body.  After the hydrochloric acid was poured on that body you stepped into that culvert with your boots on and you took hold of the feet and gave the body a push and the body splashed in there and it splashed on your pants too, and you worried about it."

	"Who hit him with a chisel?" interrupted Crowe.

	"He did."

	"Who is 'he'?" Crowe asked, getting it all down in the record.

	"Nathan Leopold Jr.  He was sitting up in the front seat.  I said he was sitting in the front seat.  I mean I was sitting up in the front seat," Richard fumbled.  "That is obviously a mistake.  I am getting excited.  This Franks boy got up in the front seat.  Now he was a boy that I knew.  If I was sitting in the back seat he would have gotten into the back seat with me.  He was a boy I know, and i would have opened the door and motioned him in that way.  As it was, he got in the front seat with me because I knew the boy and I opened the front door.  He didn't see Babe [Nathan Leopold] until he was inside the car.  He stood at the same place.  I introduced him to this Franks boy and then took him into the car.  I took him into the car and when he got in the car I said, 'you know Babe?  This is Bobby Franks'.  


Loeb appears annoyed and Leopolds small corrections. starts of with correciton Leopold wrapped the chisel. Says Leopold didn't mention planned method of killing, which Loeb says was to ether him and that was Leopold's job since Leopold was ornithologist and chloroformed birds. Loeb apparenty sees the killing as happening sometime after being struck in the head (says Franks "unconsicous" during ride).

Loeb insits he never touched the body after the acid was poured on it, and that Leopold grabbed the body by his feet

at this point Crowe interrupts: "who hit him with a chisel?"

Loeb says Leopold sitting in back seat, argues Franks would get in front seat since Leob was driving and Franks knew Loeb. Loeb says he opened the front door and motioned for Franks to get in.


	...[Leopold:] "Have you got anything to say to that?" asked Mr. Savage.

	"Yes I have," responded Leopold.

	"Nathan wants to say a word," said Mr. Savage.

	"His correction about what car I was driving down I think is correct.  Those are all absurd dirty lies.  He is trying to get out of this mess.  I can explain to you myself exactly how I opened the door to let the Franks boy in, and he got up from the back seat, leaned over forward and spoke to the boy from the back.  I was driving the car.  I am absolutely positive.


Leopold responds that Loeb is lying and trying to get out of it. He reasserts that he was driving and Loeb was in the back seat, but this time says he himself opened the front door.



Does this clear things up like Chicago Tribune says?

Leopold tends to change his story

but the transcript doesn't show the point being "cleared up," just clues pointing one way

why are their quotes so wrong?

they say upfront its from Crowe and associates from memory


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354886127/
	...And the clothing:

	"We drove around with him in the car for nearly four hours, until it got heavy dusk. Then we began undressing him in the car; took off everything but the underwear and stockings before we got to the culvert."


from confession:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	We followed that for only a short distance, then turned down another deserted road, leading west.  We stopped the car, got out, removed young Franks' shoes, hid them in some bushes, and removed his pants and stockings, placing them in the car.  We did this in order that we might be saved the trouble of too much undressing him later on.


some of the bogus quotes make it sound worse "he was weak/it was easy," but on this hides key thing that pointed to rape

how did they get this wrong? Crowe would later point to the quote about clothes in court to argue there was rape. If this was Crowe, or he was there, how did he get in completely backwards in telling to the press?


	...Why did they do it?

	"Well, it was the kind of a thing there would be a thrill in and we wanted some easy money. We made a few mistakes. I should have picked up my glasses. I didn't know I dropped them. We thought we had the whole thing airtight, but it wasn't. That's all."




...


Chicago Tribune June 1 pg 3

genevieve forbes wrote a long article psychoanalyzing them

keeps comparing to Oscar wilde, said they should have written a book instead, and the main character of what they acted out was dumb for dropping glasses, Leopold more bold, hints at both being messed up for being smart at early age somehow. "dangers of precocity"

article gets sort-of poetic in some places (never trust a poet)

Forbes did cool story here that got Ellis Island commisioner fired: http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/commentary/ct-genevieve-forbes-ellis-island-immigration-flashback-perspec-0417-jm-20160414-story.html

this article on her written 2016 by Emilie Le Beau Lucchesi


from Forbes article:

	
	...It may or may not be significant that two weeks before the Frnaks boy was kidnaped Leopold changed his seat in his class on criminal law. For the entire semester he had sat in the front row. Several weeks ago he slipped into a seat in the very back of the room.


apparently not going for the "Leopold the Ubermench" thing

author goes on to speculate Leopold left the eyeglasses there on purpose

article ends asking: "What next?"



this is weird:


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1997-06-08/news/9706300069_1_circulation-prospective-wives-women
	In 1921, Genevieve Forbes traveled steerage from Ireland posing as an immigrant. Her disclosures on the new arrivals' treatment led to a congressional hearing and a shakeup at Ellis Island.

	She was the first woman to interview Al Capone. "The people want booze, and I sell 'em what they want," he told her. She covered the Leopold-Loeb murder case. The trial judge thoughtfully delayed the sentencing over a weekend to accommodate her wedding to John Herrick, a fellow Tribune reporter on the case.


another pg 3 article:

	SEARCH FOR NEW THRILLS MOTIVE, SLAYERS ASSERT

	Delusions of Being Great Minds Responsible

	BY JOHN HERRICK.


opens up slamming Leopold and Loeb for their perverted fantasy world be shattered by a pair of glasses

	...Chauffeuer Supplies Key.

	A chauffeur who know, "because he had to repair the brakes," destroyed an alibi conceived by minds which had fed on text books as readily as novels, had searched for the key to understanding in the works of erotic writers and had pampered emotion for emotion's sake--destroyed it with the story of a "slip" which the most illiterate criminal would not have overllooked.

	A workman taking an unused path began the train of investigation which finally wrote into the criminal records of the city of Chicago the solution of one of the strangest crimes of local history--a solution as baffling in intangibility of motive as the crime itself.


writing style weird

remember Herrick the one who wrote the story with poetry about a "grey ghost" whispering the name "babe[y]" into Frank Sr.'s ear, ".Always Considered as "Baby.""

he later married forbes and judge dealayed Leopold Loeb case for their wedding

in these first passages emphasizes strangnesss of coincidences that led to Leopold's arrest

reminiscent of Joel Achenbach reporting on how "the martian" movie came about, sounded incrediulous and mocked the idea of story behind it


	...Crime Drama Unique.

	Never in Chcago, probably neverin the records of crime in any city int he world, has there ben a similar case.

	...In this crime, Leopold, to whom the confessions point as the leader--Leopold, who smoked and smiled even while he was telling the story of striking the Frnaks boy over the head--is the youngest student ever graduated from the University of Chicago. He is 19.


emphasizes drama of crime and romantacizes a bit

implies Leopold confessed to striking Franks, but that was not in confession and reported in same paper they blamed each other, then later reported resolved to say Leopold.

plays up mysteriousness of Leopold


	Loeb, the same age, who broke down first, whose tale of the murder was interrupted while he buried his face in his  hands and sobbed, was the youngest graduate of the University of Michigan.

	Leopold reads and speaks fiteen languages. During his college courses he habitually took twice the ordinary number of hours of study.

	PUZZLED FOR MOTIVE


says authorities cna't figure it out, they say they did for adventure and experience, "turned to the psychoanalyst as the only one who could straighten out the tangle of these minds"

	
	...And the psychologists had their theory. THey pictured these two, with thier brilliance of mind and their precocity, building up a structure of egotism. Theirs were the great minds of the world. And they had the ability to stand aside and watch themselves as they reacted to one stimuls after another.

	They had run through a scale of emotions, perverted emotions mostly. Then they had sought one more, and they picked on kidnaping and murder.


	...The need of money might have something to do with it, but stronger than this was the vision of seeing a whole city in turmoil. The "great minds," aloof on their self-constructed pedastal, were going to watch the "little minds" run about trying to solve this magnicent riddle of a dead boy hidden in the water of a ditch.

	So Robert Franks was killed.

	And so these adolescent spectators of their own emotions stood on the sidelines as the hunt for the killers went on. It was Leopold who went to the funeral of the object of their experiment, and who revisted the culvert in the swamp and helped the police in their investigations. Loeb took newspaper men in his car as they scoured the south side for news.

	The pair of glasses and the almost intense energy of the state's attorney's office and the police department that showed these intellects that they were not after all greater than the rest of the world they professed to scorn.

	Never in its history has theh drab old Criminal Court building, where criminals from petty theies to husband killers have been grilled and have had their day in court, seen the spectacle it saw early yesterday morning.


says motive might have been to watch "little minds" of city scramble

goes on to summarize case

summary misses some things

writing on glasses interestig

	...Places Glasses on Boy

	Strangely, it was these which postponed identification for a time. An undertaker's assistant, believing them to have been worn by the slain boy, palced them over the dead face.

	...GLASSES TO FORE

	Mr. Franks insisted on making a personal trip before he would believe the body was that of his son. And it was as he looked at the dead figure of his son, that the glasses suddenly became the focal point of the inquiry.


Franks father said "never wore glasses" no later than May 23rd, the search for owner of glasses didn't start till May 27th.


	...But Heath, too was eliminated.

	It was then that the spectacles, lost sight of for a time, became the center of interest. 



pg 4


	JACOB FRANKS THINKS SLAYERS OF SON INSANE

	Should Be Placed in Asylum, He Says.

	BY PAUL AUGSBURG.


qutoes J Franks, goes on about his life, disbelieve of Mrs. Franks


pg 5


	LEOPOLD FAMILY A BIG FACTOR IN CITY'S BUSINESS

	Stock Springs from German Refugees of '48.

	BY MAUREEN M'KERNAN.


goes over Leopold family, wealth, connections

grandfather Samuel F. Leopold came one of a "band of German Jews, most of them professional men, all highly idealistic, and well educated, who came to America under the leadership of Carl Schurz in the late '40's and early '50s"

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carl_Schurz
	Breaking with Republican President Ulysses S. Grant, Schurz helped establish the Liberal Republican Party. The party advocated civil service reform and opposed Grant's efforts to protect African American civil rights in the Southern United States during Reconstruction.
	
	...Schurz moved to New York City after Hayes left office in 1881 and briefly served as the editor of the New York Evening Post and The Nation, and later became the editorial writer for Harper's Weekly.

	...U.S. Senator

	...In 1870, Schurz helped form the Liberal Republican Party, which opposed President Ulysses S. Grant's annexation of Santo Domingo and his use of the military to destroy the Ku Klux Klan in the South under the Enforcement Acts.


back to notes from article:

leopold sr married Florence Foreman

"as early as 1876 Nathan E. Leopold was known in transportation circles."

became pres of steamship comany, member of shipping comapny Leopold & Austrian

sisters intermarried with some of the city's largest fortunes

Florence Foreman daughter of Gerhart Foreman, Chicago banker.

her sisters are Mrs. Arthur Schwab, Mr.s Julius Rosneberg, and Mr.s Henry Steele.

	
"The daughers of that Samuel Leopold who fled Germany because he was too much of an idealist, married as well and as wisely as did their brother."

aunts on fathers side are Mr.s Sam Steele, Mrs. P.D. Block, Mrs. Henry Greenebaum, and Mrs. Leo Strauss

uncle Oscar G. Foreman


pg 5


	'DICK INNOCENT,' LOEBS PROTEST; PLAN DEFENSE

	Old Family Aghast at Confession.

	BY MAURINE WATKINS.

	"He couldn't have done it. We know he's innocent."

	That's what they said at first, the nearest relatives and friends of young Dick Loeb, in spite of the boy's confession to the murder of little Robert Franks.

	"Loeb" as the name of a murderer falls strangely on Chicago ears. For the people of that name are written in the book of Chicago's history as buildings and leaders in philanthropy, charity and educational movements.

	Abert H. Loeb, young Richard's father, is connected closely by business and social ties with Julis Rosenwald, the Jewish philanthropist. And the boy's uncle is Jacob M. Loeb, for many years a member of the board of education and its spritied president from 1916-1919.


goes over loeb family

came from Germany after unscucessfl revolution of 1848 "cultured immigrants of the higher type."

	...the real impetus to his career came when Ernest Magerstadt was made sheriff and appointed young Loeb, then a struggling lawyer, as his attorney.

	Through his partner he met the latter's brother-in-law, Julias Rosenwald, of Sears, Roebuck & Co., and in 1901 he gave up his law practice to become secretary of the concern. Seven years later he became vice president and treasurer, an office which he now fills.


smarired Anna Bohnen, "an active social and welfare worker"


	...Father Built Golf Course for Son.

	When he came home that June, his father, proud of the boy's brillian scholastic record, built a miniature nine hole golf course in the "back yard" at 5017 Ellis avenue. And there young Loeb "went around" with his friends. And in that same yard he played tennis--tennis with young "Bobby" Franks!

	Last fall Richard reentered Chicago university to work on his master's dgeree in history and there renewed his friendship with Nathan Leopold, who was studying law in the university and also teaching ornithology.

	Both were sons of wealthy parents; both had position among the Jewish "400"; both had brilliant minds.


https://books.google.com/books?id=7XkzdlMKTcgC&pg=PA134&lpg=PA134&dq=%22Jewish+400%22&source=bl&ots=BTRuGCV5KS&sig=z2jwB82xirWcPnzkBNUaIZW5kSI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjLoYnBw4baAhUL44MKHeAtArMQ6AEIOTAG#v=onepage&q=%22Jewish%20400%22&f=false
	Listing the German-Jewish forebears of both families along with their various intermarriages to members of other rich Chicago Jewish families, journalists concluded that the Leopold and Loeb clans formed part of an elite and somewhat mysterious "Jewish '400'." In a comparable commentary, another reported asserted that "Nathan Leopold, Jr. is related to every branch of a little royalty of wealth which Chicago has long recognized."


back to article:


	Of the two, Leopold seems to have the more dominating personality and the training--not by practice, but by philosophical thought--that would best fit him to plan such a crime. Leob's education was along general lines, but Leopold had specialized at an age when specialization is dangerous.

	And to this shadowy world, where he ruled as king, he admitted Loeb--for "Narcissus" mast have his mirror!

	...Were they bored by a life which left them nothing to be desired, no obsticles to overcome, no goal to attain?

	Needed New Thrills?

	Were they jaded by the jazz-life of gin and girls so taht they needed so terrible a thing as murder to give them new thrills ?


author pointing to "affluenza?


	...A confession which the family still refused to believe--Mr. Loeb, confined to his bed, his wife weeping alone, and the two brothers hurrying from their homes.

	"He is innocent," they say, "and confessed merely to get sleep. It can be repudiated when he comes to trial!"

	Attorney Charles Adler has been in conference all day Saturday; he is associated with James Hamilton Lewis and it is possible that the ex-senator may be cheif counsel for the defense.

	Mr.s Jacob Loeb, the boy's aunt, is in San Francisco. As she called the Chronicle for "latest developments in the case," this message flashed over the wire from State Attorney Robert E. Crowe:

	"We have a hanging case and are ready to go to the jury today!"


I like this author


pg 5:

no author listed


	SLAYERS EVOLVE ELABORATE PLAN TO GET RANSOM

	Would Hae Had Cash Tossed from Train.

	Prosecutors and detectices ...characterized the plans of Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb ... as perhaps the most elaborate and most likely of success ever evolved in a kidnapping plot.

	No band of hardened, veteran criminals, it was stated, ever plotted more carefull, with more acumen. had Jacob Franks followed out their instructions ... it is almost certain, the detectives said, they would not have been apprehened and in addition, gone free with the money.

	Had Elaborate Plan


Leopold and Loeb's plan sucked

why write this?


...


https://chicagology.com/notorious-chicago/leopoldloeb/

some summarys and clippings from reporting on the case


http://history.journalism.ku.edu/1920/1920.shtml
1924 — Leopold and Loeb
	Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb

	Another "trial of the century." The two teenagers from highly privileged Chicago families, Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb, kidnapped, killed and mutilated a 14-year-old neighbor. The case challenged previously held notions of juvenile killers with below-average IQs. Leopold would describe the pair as evil geniuses who were above normal standards of morality. Their attorney, Clarence Darrow, introduced the psychiatric defense into the legal system. The jury and the press accepted Darrow's argument that society, schools and violent social conditions were to blame, and the killers avoided execution.

...


------




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/04/104700039.html?pageNumber=6
	Indications of a Third Murder.
	CHICAGO, June 3 (Associated Press). — An unofficial investigation has begun into the possibility that Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb may have been connected with the death several months ago of Melvin Wolf, who left the home of his wealthy grandparents to mail a letter and whose body was found in Lake Michigan. Relatives were never satisfied with the decision of authorities that he committed suicide.


in same issue as "FRANKS WOULD HANG MURDERERS HIMSELF"



Chicago Tribune Jun 3rd:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354887975/
	LEOPOLD, LOEB LINKED WITH TRACY MURDER

	Jail Doors Closed on Accused Pair.

	...Chief of Detectives Hughes and Detectives Johnson, Crot, and Gourtland announce that evidence is being sought to support the charge that Loeb and Leopold shot and killed Freeman Louis Tracy, a student of the University of Chicago, on Nov. 25.

	BY JAME DOHERTY

	...Two incidents had tended to direct strong suspicion against the youths. These were Ream's recognition of them and the finding of two automatic revolvers in Leopold's room yesterday.

	Tracy's body was found on the morning of Nov. 25, 1923, a steel jacketed bullet through the temple.

	...Ream had been accosted at about 2 a. m. Nov. 20 ...He said two men in a large touring car forced him into the automobile at pistol points, beat him into unconsciousness

	...Suspects Other Thrills.

	...working on the theory Leopold and Loeb had not performed their first experiment on a human body when they kidnaped Robert Franks





https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/06/104040295.html
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.
	FRIDAY, JUNE 6, 1924, P. 16

	What is reported to have been the consensus of opinion among the psychiatrists now convened at Atlantic City as to the Franks murder case is to the effect that the real responsibility for the act of LEOPOLD and LOEB rests with their parents.


Tribune June 16


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354904868/?terms=Franks
	TWO EXPERTS SEE ABNORMALITY IN FRANKS SLAYERS

	..."abnormal" and should not be hanged for the "experiment" they practiced

	...Leopold. It was he who engineered the entire plot and worked out all the intricate details, the aliensts believe. And for what reason?

	Leopold is an experimenter in human emotions, say the mental examienrs. He wanted to kill a human being so he could learn "what a man who has committed a cold blooded murder thinks about." He was curious to know how it felt to wake up the morning after and realize he had taken the life of a fellow human.

	He had practically no moral sense, some of the intricate tests to which has been submitted during the alst three days revealed, it was said.

	...He believes that persons of unusual intelelctual attainments, who have been carefully trained, are above ordinay laws of mankind and that it is not wrong for them to do waht might be wrong to a duller person.

	...He May Be Cured.

	His case, it was declared, is subject to treatment and may be cured. It is necessary that such eprsons be put under great restraint and supervision of mental and physical specialists who understand dealing with abnormalities.

	Both youths present the most amazing pathological case that has come to the attention of the doctors who have had them under observation, it was agreed. 




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/07/19/104700989.html
	LOEB SLAYER, HE ADMITS.
	SATURDAY, JULY 19, 1924, P. 4

	Loeb admits he did the actual killing


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/07/28/119042184.html
	LOEB 'MASTER MIND' OF FRANKS SLAYING, ALIENISTS REPORT
	MONDAY, JULY 28, 1924, P. 1

	CHICAGO, July 27. -- Richard A. Loeb was the "master mind," Nathan F. Leopold Jr. was a mental slave, according to the psychiatric report, based on their examinations of the slayers of Robert Franks by Dr. Carl M. Bowman of Boston and Dr. H.S.… More



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/08/07/104046570.html
	EXPERT SAYS LOEB ADMITTED HE WAS THE ACTUAL SLAYER
	" He Told Me He Struck the Blow" That Killed Boy, Dr. Glueck Testifies.
	CHICAGO, Aug. 6 (Associated Press). — The defense in the trial of the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks temporarily exhausted its source of expert testimony today, forced an early adjournment, and tomorrow will introduce the first of its lay witnesses, who will continue to give Judge John B. Caverly evidence on which is based the plea for mitigation in the punishment of Nathan F. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb. 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/08/08/99454344.html?pageNumber=1
	STATE ACCUSES GIRL OF LYING FOR LOEB
	FOUR CHUMS TESTIFY
	Crowe Cries 'Perjury' as Former Sweetheart Declares Youth 'Irrational and Infantile.'
	CHICAGO, Aug. 7 (Associated Press). — The prosecution tonight claimed a rout of five witnesses called by the defense today to testify in furtherance of its plea for mitigation when Judge John R. Caverly sentences Nathan F. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb for kidnapping and murdering young Robert Franks. 


I think this is the article Meg Greenfield wrote about

sets up Crowe as bad guy, a running theme in NY Times articles since May


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/07/98807256.html?pageNumber=175
	LOEB CASE INTRODUCES NEW PSYCHOLOGY
	Judge Caverly's Rulings Mark Modern Era in Criminal Procedure
	JUDGE CAVERLY'S procedure in the Leopold-Loeb case at Chicago is an expression of a marked tendency, daily becoming more manifest, to place at the service of our courts the new knowledge of human psychology they must have if they are to do justice to the community as well as to the offender. 

	...Judge Caverly met the issue presented to him like a man of the modern world. He may nto have known much about the new psychology--few of us do--but he was not, like the State's Attoreny, content to repose on the wisdom of the nineteenth century. He, at least, was willing to learn, so he admitted to the evidence.


remember they brought in a bunch of "eiminent psychologists" and tried to get Frued on the stand


	He was untroubled by the fact, of which he cannot have been wholly unconcsious, that in so doing he was opening the steel-barred doors of the criminal courts to a new concept of responsibility for crime. For that is what his decision amounted to.

	...What makes the CHicago hearing most momentous for criminal procedure is the fact that three or four of the best of those specialists--men who are in the forefront of this epoch-making enterprise of discovery--contibuted their wisdom to the proceedings. These men were not of the ordinary run of "alienists", who make a buisness of testifying in capital cases on the legal issue of insanity. They are among the makers of the new science of human nature.

	It is not for a layman to say whether they were right or wrong in the interpretation of the mental conditions of the two defendants. Buy if they were wrong, nobdoy could be right.

	It might be well to emphasize at this point that Judge Caverly was well within the law, as well as far-sighted and courages, in deciding to admit evidence in mitigation of the Leopold-Loeb crime. No informed and reasonable mind can doubt that the procedure he adopted was legally correct from a technical standpoit. The prevailling impress that, after a plea of guilty, no trial is necessary is sound.

	...Whatever Judge Caverly's decision next Wednesday may be, the Leopold-Loeb case will go down in the annals of criminal procedure as a triumph for modern ideas of justice enlightened by the science of human psychology. That it should have received such precedented publicity will make its influence on criminal jurispudence so much the more profound.



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/12/301992222.html?pageNumber=19
	Governor Has Pardoning Power.
	SPRINGFIELD, Ill., Sept. 11 — It is within the power of the Governor to pardon Richard A. Loeb and Nathan F. Leopold Jr., according to a statement made in the executive office of Governor Small today.



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/15/104051208.html?pageNumber=16
	LEOPOLD AND LOEB CALLED MODERNISTS
	Should Have Been Put to Death, Says Rev. Dr. John Roach Straton.
	The Franks murder case was the subject of sermons yesterday by the Rev. Dr. John Roach Straton at the Calvary Baptist Church and the Rev. Charles Francis Potter at the West Side Unitarian Church. Dr. Straton last night criticized the sentence of Leopold and Loeb, the two slayers, to life imprisonment as being "too lenient," and said that the case marked an "almost criminal breakdown in the efficiency of our criminal law." 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/10/02/101615982.html?pageNumber=26
	FRANKS CASE JUDGE FOUND IN HOSPITAL
	Friend of Caverly Says He Had Nervous Breakdown After Decision — Now Improving.
	CHICAGO, Oct., 1. — Judge John R. Caverly, who on Sept. 10, sentenced Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold Jr., to life imprisonment for the murder of Robert Franks, was stricken with a nervous breakdown immediately at the close of the trial, but is much improved in a hospital here, former Judge C.A. McDonald announced today after visiting the Judge. 


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/10/28/101618547.html?pageNumber=1
	Albert Loeb, Father of Franks's Slayer, Dies In Chicago Home Where Crime Was Planned
	CHICAGO, Oct. 27. — Albert H. Loeb, father of Richard A. Loeb, who, with Nathan F. Leopold Jr., is serving a life sentence in Joliet Prison for the kidnapping and murder of Robert Franks, died tonight in his Chicago home, within a short distance of the residence which had housed the victim of the crime that shortened his life. 

	...Before he collapsed under the knowledge that his favorite was a boy lsayer Mr. Loeb, as Vice President of Sears, Roebuck & Co., the Chicago mail-order house, was rated as one of Chicago's keenest business men.

------



https://books.google.com/books?id=tnKBCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA22&lpg=PA22&dq=Leopold+Carl+Sandburg+released+from+prison&source=bl&ots=BJXBqz8Phs&sig=6n64Ma7XG-zJBMxeqZtmu7sd4Os&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiZ-YK00YbaAhWMiYMKHWdICSwQ6AEIXzAJ#v=onepage&q=Leopold%20Carl%20Sandburg%20released%20from%20prison&f=false
	...In time, inmates who participated in the malaria experiments were given some consideration toward release by the Illinoise governor, but political issues constantly inhibited parole boards from freeing Leopold. One board chaired by Joseph Lohman, a former Cook County (Chicago) sheriff who later serverd as dean of the school of Criminlolgy at the University of California, Berkely, seemd on the verge of releasing Leopold after a number of impressive witnesses testified on his behalf. But that board was fired, and a different one appointed within hours after a new governor was sworn in on January 1, 1953. It would be another five years before Leopold was released. That release was helepd greatly by the appearance before the parle board, speaking for Leopold, of the eminent poet Carl Sandburg and Father Eligius Wier, the Catholoc chaplain when Leopold was admitted to Joliet and his friend thereafter.

	Others supporting Leopold included Hans Mattick, who had worked closely with Leopold when Mattick served in the prison as a sociologist-actuary, offering predictions on the likelihood of the success of individual inmames if they were to be paroled.





https://www.newspapers.com/image/139972792/
	LEOPOLD REWNEWS PLEA FOR PAROLE

	Puts Blame on Loeb.

	Leopold told the board he was led into the 91924 murder of 14-year-old Bobby Franks in Chicago by his idol, Richard Loeb.

	"I wish to God I could explain more," Leopold said.

	Leopold, son of a wealthy family, said when the murder occured he was 19 and an "intelligent savage" with no more sense. Loeb, who was killed in a prison browl in 1936, plotted the crime, Leopold said.

	He made his plea for parole after his attorney had presented witnesses, affidavits, letters an dother evidence in favor of supervised freedom for Leopold.

	...Among the supporters for Leopold's plea was Carl Sandburg, 80-year-old poet and historian, who told the board Leopold would be a good risk for parole.

	"I told warden (Joseph) Ragen some time ago I wanted to meet Leopold," Sandburg testified. "I told him I regarded him as a hero."

	Newsmen got the impression that Sandburg was classifying Leopold as a hero. However, Sandburg told newsmen later he said he referred to warden Ragen as a hero and not to Leopold.



------


http://www.thecrimson.com/article/1957/11/29/the-parole-of-the-century-pthe/
	The Parole of the Century
	NO WRITER ATTRIBUTED November 29, 1957

	The case of Nathan Leopold, participant in the sensational Loeb-Leopold murder of 1923, comes before the Illinois Parole Board this January. Last year, Leopold's parole was granted, only to be vetoed by Governor William J. Stratton. The explanation for Stratton's refusal to parole Leopold was that it is politically inexpedient; public antipathy to his release is believed to be great.

	There is more at stake in this case than the release or continued imprisonment of one man. To refuse a deserved parole damages the whole penal system of this country. Public pressure should not be allowed to determine the validity of the parole system. Even the people who believe in retributive penal justice should be satisfied by the thirty-five years Leopold has served. 

	...Meyer Levin, who intelligently examined the Loeb-Leopold case in his recent book Compulsion, believes that the murder served as a catharsis for Leopold's psychic problems, releasing him into a normal mental life. 

	...It is often argued that the release of people like Leopold removes much of the fear of punishment deterring acts of crime. Anyone at all familiar with the motivations of criminals knows that fear of punishment plays little part in the anticipation of a criminal act. There is no reason to assume that the release of Leopold or of anyone else will have any effect whatsoever on the crime rate. 

	...These are more positive arguments for Leopold's release. Besides being a model prisoner, Leopold has redesigned the prison library, learned to be a medical technician, taught classes in prison, served in cancer experiments, and participated on the board for parole prediction on which he has written two published articles. Leopold, who speaks thirty-six languages, is obviously intelligent and could be a potentially very valuable member of society. Indeed, he has often reiterated that, if released, he will go to Puerto Rico and serve as a medical technician for the natives in the manner of Albert Schweitzer. 

	Even if Leopold were totally lacking in intellectual abilities or altruistic purpose, there would be no logical reason for not granting him a parole. It is quite obvious that Leopold would long ago have been released if he had not participated in the "Crime of the Century," and if his parole would not raise a public clamor. It is to be hoped that Governor Stratton can transcend political expediency and not again veto the expected parole. If he does block Leopold's release, he is in effect declaring invalid the idea of the parole system.



https://www.wsws.org/en/articles/2001/09/loeb-s08.html
	A landmark in the fight against capital punishment in the US
	Lessons of the 1924 Leopold and Loeb murder case
	By Shannon Jones 



https://books.google.com/books?id=c8ptkc_pdkQC&pg=PA515&lpg=PA515&dq=%22Nathan+Leopold,+Sr%22&source=bl&ots=br-RjtwoE5&sig=vRwYjZYrOI8XI8p0zynveC0ZxsI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjNidSiqv_ZAhUF24MKHXpODxkQ6AEIYzAN#v=onepage&q=%22Nathan%20Leopold%2C%20Sr%22&f=false
	Irving Stone re-created a scene, and dialogue, in which Loeb throws his arms around Darrow, begging him to "Save their lives! Get them a life sentence" and promising, "Money's no object. We'll pay you anything you ask." Stone and others place the nocturnal visit on June 2







https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/leopold-and-loebs-criminal-minds-996498/
	Leopold and Loeb’s Criminal Minds
	In defense of murderers Leopold and Loeb, attorney Clarence Darrow thwarted a nation’s call for vengeance


	By Simon Baatz
	Smithsonian Magazine | Subscribe
	August 

	...Loeb wanted to commit a crime that would set all of Chicago talking. What could be more sensational than the kidnapping and murder of a child? If they demanded a ransom from the parents, so much the better. It would be a difficult and complex task to obtain the ransom without being caught. To kidnap a child would be an act of daring—and no one, Loeb proclaimed, would ever know who had accomplished it.

	...Darrow’s opposition to capital punishment found its greatest source of inspiration in the new scientific disciplines of the early 20th century. “Science and evolution teach us that man is an animal, a little higher than the other orders of animals; that he is governed by the same natural laws that govern the rest of the universe,” he wrote in the magazine Everyman in 1915. Darrow saw confirmation of these views in the field of dynamic psychiatry, which emphasized infantile sexuality and unconscious impulses and denied that human actions were freely chosen and rationally arranged. Individuals acted less on the basis of free will and more as a consequence of childhood experiences that found their expression in adult life. How, therefore, Darrow reasoned, could any individual be responsible for his or her actions if they were predetermined?


...




------

